
--**--**--
 not overwise or clever--at least, not beyond such a matter as knowing
 the signs of the weather; and the process by which rapidity and
 dexterity of any kind were acquired was so wholly hidden, that they
 partook of the nature of conjuring.  In this way it came to pass that
 those scattered linen-weavers--emigrants from the town into the
 country--were to the last regarded as aliens by their rustic
 neighbours, and usually contracted the eccentric habits which belong to
 a state of loneliness.
 
 In the early years of this century, such a linen-weaver, named Silas
 Marner, worked at his vocation in a stone cottage that stood among the
 nutty hedgerows near the village of Raveloe, and not far from the edge
 of a deserted stone-pit.  The questionable sound of Silas's loom, so
 unlike the natural cheerful trotting of the winnowing-machine, or the
 simpler rhythm of the flail, had a half-fearful fascination for the
 Raveloe boys, who would often leave off their nutting or birds'-nesting
 to peep in at the window of the stone cottage, counterbalancing a
 certain awe at the mysterious action of the loom, by a pleasant sense
 of scornful superiority, drawn from the mockery of its alternating
 noises, along with the bent, tread-mill attitude of the weaver.  But
 sometimes it happened that Marner, pausing to adjust an irregularity in
 his thread, became aware of the small scoundrels, and, though chary of
 his time, he liked their intrusion so ill that he would descend from
 his loom, and, opening the door, would fix on them a gaze that was
 always enough to make them take to their legs in terror.  For how was
 it possible to believe that those large brown protuberant eyes in Silas
 Marner's pale face really saw nothing very distinctly that was not
 close to them, and not rather that their dreadful stare could dart
--**--**--
 not fall down.  A fit was a stroke, wasn't it?  and it was in the
 nature of a stroke to partly take away the use of a man's limbs and
 throw him on the parish, if he'd got no children to look to.  No, no;
 it was no stroke that would let a man stand on his legs, like a horse
 between the shafts, and then walk off as soon as you can say "Gee!"
 But there might be such a thing as a man's soul being loose from his
 body, and going out and in, like a bird out of its nest and back; and
 that was how folks got over-wise, for they went to school in this
 shell-less state to those who could teach them more than their
 neighbours could learn with their five senses and the parson.  And
 where did Master Marner get his knowledge of herbs from--and charms
 too, if he liked to give them away?  Jem Rodney's story was no more
 than what might have been expected by anybody who had seen how Marner
 had cured Sally Oates, and made her sleep like a baby, when her heart
 had been beating enough to burst her body, for two months and more,
 while she had been under the doctor's care.  He might cure more folks
 if he would; but he was worth speaking fair, if it was only to keep him
 from doing you a mischief.
 
 It was partly to this vague fear that Marner was indebted for
 protecting him from the persecution that his singularities might have
 drawn upon him, but still more to the fact that, the old linen-weaver
 in the neighbouring parish of Tarley being dead, his handicraft made
 him a highly welcome settler to the richer housewives of the district,
 and even to the more provident cottagers, who had their little stock of
--**--**--
 triumph that lurked in the narrow slanting eyes and compressed lips of
 William Dane.  One of the most frequent topics of conversation between
 the two friends was Assurance of salvation: Silas confessed that he
 could never arrive at anything higher than hope mingled with fear, and
 listened with longing wonder when William declared that he had
 possessed unshaken assurance ever since, in the period of his
 conversion, he had dreamed that he saw the words "calling and election
 sure" standing by themselves on a white page in the open Bible.  Such
 colloquies have occupied many a pair of pale-faced weavers, whose
 unnurtured souls have been like young winged things, fluttering
 forsaken in the twilight.
 
 It had seemed to the unsuspecting Silas that the friendship had
 suffered no chill even from his formation of another attachment of a
 closer kind.  For some months he had been engaged to a young
 servant-woman, waiting only for a little increase to their mutual
 savings in order to their marriage; and it was a great delight to him
 that Sarah did not object to William's occasional presence in their
 Sunday interviews.  It was at this point in their history that Silas's
 cataleptic fit occurred during the prayer-meeting; and amidst the
 various queries and expressions of interest addressed to him by his
 fellow-members, William's suggestion alone jarred with the general
 sympathy towards a brother thus singled out for special dealings.  He
 observed that, to him, this trance looked more like a visitation of
 Satan than a proof of divine favour, and exhorted his friend to see
 that he hid no accursed thing within his soul.  Silas, feeling bound to
 accept rebuke and admonition as a brotherly office, felt no resentment,
 but only pain, at his friend's doubts concerning him; and to this was
 soon added some anxiety at the perception that Sarah's manner towards
--**--**--
 At last, when everyone rose to depart, he went towards William Dane and
 said, in a voice shaken by agitation--
 
 "The last time I remember using my knife, was when I took it out to cut
 a strap for you.  I don't remember putting it in my pocket again.
 _You_ stole the money, and you have woven a plot to lay the sin at my
 door.  But you may prosper, for all that: there is no just God that
 governs the earth righteously, but a God of lies, that bears witness
 against the innocent."
 
 There was a general shudder at this blasphemy.
 
 William said meekly, "I leave our brethren to judge whether this is the
 voice of Satan or not.  I can do nothing but pray for you, Silas."
 
 Poor Marner went out with that despair in his soul--that shaken trust
 in God and man, which is little short of madness to a loving nature.
 In the bitterness of his wounded spirit, he said to himself, "_She_
 will cast me off too."  And he reflected that, if she did not believe
 the testimony against him, her whole faith must be upset as his was.
 To people accustomed to reason about the forms in which their religious
 feeling has incorporated itself, it is difficult to enter into that
 simple, untaught state of mind in which the form and the feeling have
 never been severed by an act of reflection.  We are apt to think it
 inevitable that a man in Marner's position should have begun to
 question the validity of an appeal to the divine judgment by drawing
 lots; but to him this would have been an effort of independent thought
 such as he had never known; and he must have made the effort at a
 moment when all his energies were turned into the anguish of
--**--**--
 souls have been nourished.  Minds that have been unhinged from their
 old faith and love, have perhaps sought this Lethean influence of
 exile, in which the past becomes dreamy because its symbols have all
 vanished, and the present too is dreamy because it is linked with no
 memories.  But even _their_ experience may hardly enable them
 thoroughly to imagine what was the effect on a simple weaver like Silas
 Marner, when he left his own country and people and came to settle in
 Raveloe.  Nothing could be more unlike his native town, set within
 sight of the widespread hillsides, than this low, wooded region, where
 he felt hidden even from the heavens by the screening trees and
 hedgerows.  There was nothing here, when he rose in the deep morning
 quiet and looked out on the dewy brambles and rank tufted grass, that
 seemed to have any relation with that life centring in Lantern Yard,
 which had once been to him the altar-place of high dispensations.  The
 whitewashed walls; the little pews where well-known figures entered
 with a subdued rustling, and where first one well-known voice and then
 another, pitched in a peculiar key of petition, uttered phrases at once
 occult and familiar, like the amulet worn on the heart; the pulpit
 where the minister delivered unquestioned doctrine, and swayed to and
 fro, and handled the book in a long accustomed manner; the very pauses
 between the couplets of the hymn, as it was given out, and the
 recurrent swell of voices in song: these things had been the channel of
 divine influences to Marner--they were the fostering home of his
 religious emotions--they were Christianity and God's kingdom upon
 earth.  A weaver who finds hard words in his hymn-book knows nothing of
 abstractions; as the little child knows nothing of parental love, but
--**--**--
 sight more than that?  The Wise Woman had words that she muttered to
 herself, so that you couldn't hear what they were, and if she tied a
 bit of red thread round the child's toe the while, it would keep off
 the water in the head.  There were women in Raveloe, at that present
 time, who had worn one of the Wise Woman's little bags round their
 necks, and, in consequence, had never had an idiot child, as Ann
 Coulter had.  Silas Marner could very likely do as much, and more; and
 now it was all clear how he should have come from unknown parts, and be
 so "comical-looking". But Sally Oates must mind and not tell the
 doctor, for he would be sure to set his face against Marner: he was
 always angry about the Wise Woman, and used to threaten those who went
 to her that they should have none of his help any more.
 
 Silas now found himself and his cottage suddenly beset by mothers who
 wanted him to charm away the whooping-cough, or bring back the milk,
 and by men who wanted stuff against the rheumatics or the knots in the
 hands; and, to secure themselves against a refusal, the applicants
 brought silver in their palms.  Silas might have driven a profitable
 trade in charms as well as in his small list of drugs; but money on
 this condition was no temptation to him: he had never known an impulse
 towards falsity, and he drove one after another away with growing
 irritation, for the news of him as a wise man had spread even to
 Tarley, and it was long before people ceased to take long walks for the
 sake of asking his aid.  But the hope in his wisdom was at length
 changed into dread, for no one believed him when he said he knew no
--**--**--
 with his loom and his money when he made his journeys through the
 fields and the lanes to fetch and carry home his work, so that his
 steps never wandered to the hedge-banks and the lane-side in search of
 the once familiar herbs: these too belonged to the past, from which his
 life had shrunk away, like a rivulet that has sunk far down from the
 grassy fringe of its old breadth into a little shivering thread, that
 cuts a groove for itself in the barren sand.
 
 But about the Christmas of that fifteenth year, a second great change
 came over Marner's life, and his history became blent in a singular
 manner with the life of his neighbours.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 The greatest man in Raveloe was Squire Cass, who lived in the large red
 house with the handsome flight of stone steps in front and the high
 stables behind it, nearly opposite the church.  He was only one among
 several landed parishioners, but he alone was honoured with the title
 of Squire; for though Mr. Osgood's family was also understood to be of
 timeless origin--the Raveloe imagination having never ventured back to
 that fearful blank when there were no Osgoods--still, he merely owned
 the farm he occupied; whereas Squire Cass had a tenant or two, who
 complained of the game to him quite as if he had been a lord.
 
 It was still that glorious war-time which was felt to be a peculiar
 favour of Providence towards the landed interest, and the fall of
 prices had not yet come to carry the race of small squires and yeomen
 down that road to ruin for which extravagant habits and bad husbandry
 were plentifully anointing their wheels.  I am speaking now in relation
 to Raveloe and the parishes that resembled it; for our old-fashioned
--**--**--
 the Squire, or else tell him I gave it you; for he's threatening to
 distrain for it, and it'll all be out soon, whether I tell him or not.
 He said, just now, before he went out, he should send word to Cox to
 distrain, if Fowler didn't come and pay up his arrears this week.  The
 Squire's short o' cash, and in no humour to stand any nonsense; and you
 know what he threatened, if ever he found you making away with his
 money again.  So, see and get the money, and pretty quickly, will you?"
 
 "Oh!"  said Dunsey, sneeringly, coming nearer to his brother and
 looking in his face.  "Suppose, now, you get the money yourself, and
 save me the trouble, eh?  Since you was so kind as to hand it over to
 me, you'll not refuse me the kindness to pay it back for me: it was
 your brotherly love made you do it, you know."
 
 Godfrey bit his lips and clenched his fist.  "Don't come near me with
 that look, else I'll knock you down."
 
 "Oh no, you won't," said Dunsey, turning away on his heel, however.
 "Because I'm such a good-natured brother, you know. I might get you
 turned out of house and home, and cut off with a shilling any day.  I
 might tell the Squire how his handsome son was married to that nice
 young woman, Molly Farren, and was very unhappy because he couldn't
 live with his drunken wife, and I should slip into your place as
 comfortable as could be.  But you see, I don't do it--I'm so easy and
 good-natured.  You'll take any trouble for me. You'll get the hundred
 pounds for me--I know you will."
 
 "How can I get the money?"  said Godfrey, quivering.  "I haven't a
 shilling to bless myself with.  And it's a lie that you'd slip into my
--**--**--
 time.  She's been threatening to come herself and tell him.  So, don't
 flatter yourself that your secrecy's worth any price you choose to ask.
 You drain me of money till I have got nothing to pacify _her_ with, and
 she'll do as she threatens some day.  It's all one.  I'll tell my
 father everything myself, and you may go to the devil."
 
 Dunsey perceived that he had overshot his mark, and that there was a
 point at which even the hesitating Godfrey might be driven into
 decision.  But he said, with an air of unconcern--
 
 "As you please; but I'll have a draught of ale first."  And ringing the
 bell, he threw himself across two chairs, and began to rap the
 window-seat with the handle of his whip.
 
 Godfrey stood, still with his back to the fire, uneasily moving his
 fingers among the contents of his side-pockets, and looking at the
 floor.  That big muscular frame of his held plenty of animal courage,
 but helped him to no decision when the dangers to be braved were such
 as could neither be knocked down nor throttled.  His natural
 irresolution and moral cowardice were exaggerated by a position in
 which dreaded consequences seemed to press equally on all sides, and
 his irritation had no sooner provoked him to defy Dunstan and
 anticipate all possible betrayals, than the miseries he must bring on
 himself by such a step seemed more unendurable to him than the present
 evil.  The results of confession were not contingent, they were
 certain; whereas betrayal was not certain. From the near vision of that
 certainty he fell back on suspense and vacillation with a sense of
 repose.  The disinherited son of a small squire, equally disinclined to
 dig and to beg, was almost as helpless as an uprooted tree, which, by
--**--**--
 You know I'm a jewel for 'ticing people into bargains.  For which
 reason I advise you to let _me_ sell Wildfire.  I'd ride him to the
 hunt to-morrow for you, with pleasure.  I shouldn't look so handsome as
 you in the saddle, but it's the horse they'll bid for, and not the
 rider."
 
 "Yes, I daresay--trust my horse to you!"
 
 "As you please," said Dunstan, rapping the window-seat again with an
 air of great unconcern.  "It's _you_ have got to pay Fowler's money;
 it's none of my business.  You received the money from him when you
 went to Bramcote, and _you_ told the Squire it wasn't paid. I'd nothing
 to do with that; you chose to be so obliging as to give it me, that was
 all.  If you don't want to pay the money, let it alone; it's all one to
 me.  But I was willing to accommodate you by undertaking to sell the
 horse, seeing it's not convenient to you to go so far to-morrow."
 
 Godfrey was silent for some moments.  He would have liked to spring on
 Dunstan, wrench the whip from his hand, and flog him to within an inch
 of his life; and no bodily fear could have deterred him; but he was
 mastered by another sort of fear, which was fed by feelings stronger
 even than his resentment.  When he spoke again, it was in a
 half-conciliatory tone.
 
 "Well, you mean no nonsense about the horse, eh?  You'll sell him all
 fair, and hand over the money?  If you don't, you know, everything 'ull
 go to smash, for I've got nothing else to trust to. And you'll have
 less pleasure in pulling the house over my head, when your own skull's
 to be broken too."
 
 "Aye, aye," said Dunstan, rising; "all right.  I thought you'd come
--**--**--
 leaves ruder minds to the perpetual urgent companionship of their own
 griefs and discontents.  The lives of those rural forefathers, whom we
 are apt to think very prosaic figures--men whose only work was to ride
 round their land, getting heavier and heavier in their saddles, and who
 passed the rest of their days in the half-listless gratification of
 senses dulled by monotony--had a certain pathos in them nevertheless.
 Calamities came to _them_ too, and their early errors carried hard
 consequences: perhaps the love of some sweet maiden, the image of
 purity, order, and calm, had opened their eyes to the vision of a life
 in which the days would not seem too long, even without rioting; but
 the maiden was lost, and the vision passed away, and then what was left
 to them, especially when they had become too heavy for the hunt, or for
 carrying a gun over the furrows, but to drink and get merry, or to
 drink and get angry, so that they might be independent of variety, and
 say over again with eager emphasis the things they had said already any
 time that twelvemonth? Assuredly, among these flushed and dull-eyed men
 there were some whom--thanks to their native human-kindness--even riot
 could never drive into brutality; men who, when their cheeks were
 fresh, had felt the keen point of sorrow or remorse, had been pierced
 by the reeds they leaned on, or had lightly put their limbs in fetters
 from which no struggle could loose them; and under these sad
 circumstances, common to us all, their thoughts could find no
 resting-place outside the ever-trodden round of their own petty history.
 
 That, at least, was the condition of Godfrey Cass in this
 six-and-twentieth year of his life.  A movement of compunction, helped
 by those small indefinable influences which every personal relation
--**--**--
 frighten or persuade the old fellow into lending the money on the
 excellent security of the young Squire's prospects?  The resource
 occurred to him now as so easy and agreeable, especially as Marner's
 hoard was likely to be large enough to leave Godfrey a handsome surplus
 beyond his immediate needs, and enable him to accommodate his faithful
 brother, that he had almost turned the horse's head towards home again.
 Godfrey would be ready enough to accept the suggestion: he would snatch
 eagerly at a plan that might save him from parting with Wildfire. But
 when Dunstan's meditation reached this point, the inclination to go on
 grew strong and prevailed.  He didn't want to give Godfrey that
 pleasure: he preferred that Master Godfrey should be vexed. Moreover,
 Dunstan enjoyed the self-important consciousness of having a horse to
 sell, and the opportunity of driving a bargain, swaggering, and
 possibly taking somebody in.  He might have all the satisfaction
 attendant on selling his brother's horse, and not the less have the
 further satisfaction of setting Godfrey to borrow Marner's money.  So
 he rode on to cover.
 
 Bryce and Keating were there, as Dunstan was quite sure they would
 be--he was such a lucky fellow.
 
 "Heyday!"  said Bryce, who had long had his eye on Wildfire, "you're on
 your brother's horse to-day: how's that?"
 
 "Oh, I've swopped with him," said Dunstan, whose delight in lying,
 grandly independent of utility, was not to be diminished by the
 likelihood that his hearer would not believe him--"Wildfire's mine now."
 
 "What!  has he swopped with you for that big-boned hack of yours?" said
 Bryce, quite aware that he should get another lie in answer.
 
 "Oh, there was a little account between us," said Dunsey, carelessly,
 "and Wildfire made it even.  I accommodated him by taking the horse,
--**--**--
 about what happened behind them, and far-off stragglers, who were as
 likely as not to pass quite aloof from the line of road in which
 Wildfire had fallen.  Dunstan, whose nature it was to care more for
 immediate annoyances than for remote consequences, no sooner recovered
 his legs, and saw that it was all over with Wildfire, than he felt a
 satisfaction at the absence of witnesses to a position which no
 swaggering could make enviable. Reinforcing himself, after his shake,
 with a little brandy and much swearing, he walked as fast as he could
 to a coppice on his right hand, through which it occurred to him that
 he could make his way to Batherley without danger of encountering any
 member of the hunt. His first intention was to hire a horse there and
 ride home forthwith, for to walk many miles without a gun in his hand,
 and along an ordinary road, was as much out of the question to him as
 to other spirited young men of his kind.  He did not much mind about
 taking the bad news to Godfrey, for he had to offer him at the same
 time the resource of Marner's money; and if Godfrey kicked, as he
 always did, at the notion of making a fresh debt from which he himself
 got the smallest share of advantage, why, he wouldn't kick long:
 Dunstan felt sure he could worry Godfrey into anything.  The idea of
 Marner's money kept growing in vividness, now the want of it had become
 immediate; the prospect of having to make his appearance with the muddy
 boots of a pedestrian at Batherley, and to encounter the grinning
 queries of stablemen, stood unpleasantly in the way of his impatience
 to be back at Raveloe and carry out his felicitous plan; and a casual
--**--**--
 had he left a light?  That was a strange forgetfulness in a miser.
 Dunstan knocked still more loudly, and, without pausing for a reply,
 pushed his fingers through the latch-hole, intending to shake the door
 and pull the latch-string up and down, not doubting that the door was
 fastened. But, to his surprise, at this double motion the door opened,
 and he found himself in front of a bright fire which lit up every
 corner of the cottage--the bed, the loom, the three chairs, and the
 table--and showed him that Marner was not there.
 
 Nothing at that moment could be much more inviting to Dunsey than the
 bright fire on the brick hearth: he walked in and seated himself by it
 at once.  There was something in front of the fire, too, that would
 have been inviting to a hungry man, if it had been in a different stage
 of cooking.  It was a small bit of pork suspended from the
 kettle-hanger by a string passed through a large door-key, in a way
 known to primitive housekeepers unpossessed of jacks.  But the pork had
 been hung at the farthest extremity of the hanger, apparently to
 prevent the roasting from proceeding too rapidly during the owner's
 absence.  The old staring simpleton had hot meat for his supper, then?
 thought Dunstan.  People had always said he lived on mouldy bread, on
 purpose to check his appetite.  But where could he be at this time, and
 on such an evening, leaving his supper in this stage of preparation,
 and his door unfastened?  Dunstan's own recent difficulty in making his
 way suggested to him that the weaver had perhaps gone outside his
 cottage to fetch in fuel, or for some such brief purpose, and had
 slipped into the Stone-pit.  That was an interesting idea to Dunstan,
--**--**--
 He would hasten out into the darkness, and then consider what he should
 do with the bags.  He closed the door behind him immediately, that he
 might shut in the stream of light: a few steps would be enough to carry
 him beyond betrayal by the gleams from the shutter-chinks and the
 latch-hole.  The rain and darkness had got thicker, and he was glad of
 it; though it was awkward walking with both hands filled, so that it
 was as much as he could do to grasp his whip along with one of the
 bags.  But when he had gone a yard or two, he might take his time.  So
 he stepped forward into the darkness.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 When Dunstan Cass turned his back on the cottage, Silas Marner was not
 more than a hundred yards away from it, plodding along from the village
 with a sack thrown round his shoulders as an overcoat, and with a horn
 lantern in his hand.  His legs were weary, but his mind was at ease,
 free from the presentiment of change.  The sense of security more
 frequently springs from habit than from conviction, and for this reason
 it often subsists after such a change in the conditions as might have
 been expected to suggest alarm.  The lapse of time during which a given
 event has not happened, is, in this logic of habit, constantly alleged
 as a reason why the event should never happen, even when the lapse of
 time is precisely the added condition which makes the event imminent.
 A man will tell you that he has worked in a mine for forty years unhurt
 by an accident as a reason why he should apprehend no danger, though
 the roof is beginning to sink; and it is often observable, that the
--**--**--
 trembling hand all about the hole, trying to think it possible that his
 eyes had deceived him; then he held the candle in the hole and examined
 it curiously, trembling more and more.  At last he shook so violently
 that he let fall the candle, and lifted his hands to his head, trying
 to steady himself, that he might think.  Had he put his gold somewhere
 else, by a sudden resolution last night, and then forgotten it?  A man
 falling into dark waters seeks a momentary footing even on sliding
 stones; and Silas, by acting as if he believed in false hopes, warded
 off the moment of despair.  He searched in every corner, he turned his
 bed over, and shook it, and kneaded it; he looked in his brick oven
 where he laid his sticks.  When there was no other place to be
 searched, he kneeled down again and felt once more all round the hole.
 There was no untried refuge left for a moment's shelter from the
 terrible truth.
 
 Yes, there was a sort of refuge which always comes with the prostration
 of thought under an overpowering passion: it was that expectation of
 impossibilities, that belief in contradictory images, which is still
 distinct from madness, because it is capable of being dissipated by the
 external fact.  Silas got up from his knees trembling, and looked round
 at the table: didn't the gold lie there after all?  The table was bare.
 Then he turned and looked behind him--looked all round his dwelling,
 seeming to strain his brown eyes after some possible appearance of the
 bags where he had already sought them in vain.  He could see every
 object in his cottage--and his gold was not there.
 
 Again he put his trembling hands to his head, and gave a wild ringing
--**--**--
 
 The Rainbow, in Marner's view, was a place of luxurious resort for rich
 and stout husbands, whose wives had superfluous stores of linen; it was
 the place where he was likely to find the powers and dignities of
 Raveloe, and where he could most speedily make his loss public.  He
 lifted the latch, and turned into the bright bar or kitchen on the
 right hand, where the less lofty customers of the house were in the
 habit of assembling, the parlour on the left being reserved for the
 more select society in which Squire Cass frequently enjoyed the double
 pleasure of conviviality and condescension.  But the parlour was dark
 to-night, the chief personages who ornamented its circle being all at
 Mrs. Osgood's birthday dance, as Godfrey Cass was.  And in consequence
 of this, the party on the high-screened seats in the kitchen was more
 numerous than usual; several personages, who would otherwise have been
 admitted into the parlour and enlarged the opportunity of hectoring and
 condescension for their betters, being content this evening to vary
 their enjoyment by taking their spirits-and-water where they could
 themselves hector and condescend in company that called for beer.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 The conversation, which was at a high pitch of animation when Silas
 approached the door of the Rainbow, had, as usual, been slow and
 intermittent when the company first assembled.  The pipes began to be
 puffed in a silence which had an air of severity; the more important
 customers, who drank spirits and sat nearest the fire, staring at each
 other as if a bet were depending on the first man who winked; while the
 beer-drinkers, chiefly men in fustian jackets and smock-frocks, kept
 their eyelids down and rubbed their hands across their mouths, as if
 their draughts of beer were a funereal duty attended with embarrassing
--**--**--
 her--contradick me who will."
 
 The farrier looked fierce, and the mild butcher's conversational spirit
 was roused a little.
 
 "I'm not for contradicking no man," he said; "I'm for peace and
 quietness.  Some are for cutting long ribs--I'm for cutting 'em short
 myself; but _I_ don't quarrel with 'em.  All I say is, it's a lovely
 carkiss--and anybody as was reasonable, it 'ud bring tears into their
 eyes to look at it."
 
 "Well, it's the cow as I drenched, whatever it is," pursued the
 farrier, angrily; "and it was Mr. Lammeter's cow, else you told a lie
 when you said it was a red Durham."
 
 "I tell no lies," said the butcher, with the same mild huskiness as
 before, "and I contradick none--not if a man was to swear himself
 black: he's no meat o' mine, nor none o' my bargains.  All I say is,
 it's a lovely carkiss.  And what I say, I'll stick to; but I'll quarrel
 wi' no man."
 
 "No," said the farrier, with bitter sarcasm, looking at the company
 generally; "and p'rhaps you aren't pig-headed; and p'rhaps you didn't
 say the cow was a red Durham; and p'rhaps you didn't say she'd got a
 star on her brow--stick to that, now you're at it."
 
 "Come, come," said the landlord; "let the cow alone.  The truth lies
 atween you: you're both right and both wrong, as I allays say. And as
 for the cow's being Mr. Lammeter's, I say nothing to that; but this I
 say, as the Rainbow's the Rainbow.  And for the matter o' that, if the
 talk is to be o' the Lammeters, _you_ know the most upo' that head, eh,
 Mr. Macey?  You remember when first Mr. Lammeter's father come into
 these parts, and took the Warrens?"
 
 Mr. Macey, tailor and parish-clerk, the latter of which functions
--**--**--
 shouldn't share the Christmas money--that's where it is.  But I shall
 speak to Mr. Crackenthorp; I'll not be put upon by no man."
 
 "Nay, nay, Tookey," said Ben Winthrop.  "We'll pay you your share to
 keep out of it--that's what we'll do.  There's things folks 'ud pay to
 be rid on, besides varmin."
 
 "Come, come," said the landlord, who felt that paying people for their
 absence was a principle dangerous to society; "a joke's a joke.  We're
 all good friends here, I hope.  We must give and take. You're both
 right and you're both wrong, as I say.  I agree wi' Mr. Macey here, as
 there's two opinions; and if mine was asked, I should say they're both
 right.  Tookey's right and Winthrop's right, and they've only got to
 split the difference and make themselves even."
 
 The farrier was puffing his pipe rather fiercely, in some contempt at
 this trivial discussion.  He had no ear for music himself, and never
 went to church, as being of the medical profession, and likely to be in
 requisition for delicate cows.  But the butcher, having music in his
 soul, had listened with a divided desire for Tookey's defeat and for
 the preservation of the peace.
 
 "To be sure," he said, following up the landlord's conciliatory view,
 "we're fond of our old clerk; it's nat'ral, and him used to be such a
 singer, and got a brother as is known for the first fiddler in this
 country-side.  Eh, it's a pity but what Solomon lived in our village,
 and could give us a tune when we liked; eh, Mr. Macey?  I'd keep him in
 liver and lights for nothing--that I would."
 
 "Aye, aye," said Mr. Macey, in the height of complacency; "our family's
 been known for musicianers as far back as anybody can tell. But them
--**--**--
 were likely to remember that marriage?"  said the landlord, in a
 congratulatory tone.
 
 "I should think there did--a _very_ partic'lar thing," said Mr. Macey,
 nodding sideways.  "For Mr. Drumlow--poor old gentleman, I was fond on
 him, though he'd got a bit confused in his head, what wi' age and wi'
 taking a drop o' summat warm when the service come of a cold morning.
 And young Mr. Lammeter, he'd have no way but he must be married in
 Janiwary, which, to be sure, 's a unreasonable time to be married in,
 for it isn't like a christening or a burying, as you can't help; and so
 Mr. Drumlow--poor old gentleman, I was fond on him--but when he come to
 put the questions, he put 'em by the rule o' contrairy, like, and he
 says, "Wilt thou have this man to thy wedded wife?"  says he, and then
 he says, "Wilt thou have this woman to thy wedded husband?" says he.
 But the partic'larest thing of all is, as nobody took any notice on it
 but me, and they answered straight off "yes", like as if it had been me
 saying "Amen" i' the right place, without listening to what went
 before."
 
 "But _you_ knew what was going on well enough, didn't you, Mr. Macey?
 You were live enough, eh?"  said the butcher.
 
 "Lor bless you!"  said Mr. Macey, pausing, and smiling in pity at the
 impotence of his hearer's imagination--"why, I was all of a tremble: it
 was as if I'd been a coat pulled by the two tails, like; for I couldn't
 stop the parson, I couldn't take upon me to do that; and yet I said to
 myself, I says, "Suppose they shouldn't be fast married, 'cause the
 words are contrairy?"  and my head went working like a mill, for I was
--**--**--
 might as well bet a man as he wouldn't catch the rheumatise if he stood
 up to 's neck in the pool of a frosty night.  It 'ud be fine fun for a
 man to win his bet as he'd catch the rheumatise. Folks as believe in
 Cliff's Holiday aren't agoing to ventur near it for a matter o' ten
 pound."
 
 "If Master Dowlas wants to know the truth on it," said Mr. Macey, with
 a sarcastic smile, tapping his thumbs together, "he's no call to lay
 any bet--let him go and stan' by himself--there's nobody 'ull hinder
 him; and then he can let the parish'ners know if they're wrong."
 
 "Thank you!  I'm obliged to you," said the farrier, with a snort of
 scorn.  "If folks are fools, it's no business o' mine.  _I_ don't want
 to make out the truth about ghos'es: I know it a'ready. But I'm not
 against a bet--everything fair and open.  Let any man bet me ten pound
 as I shall see Cliff's Holiday, and I'll go and stand by myself.  I
 want no company.  I'd as lief do it as I'd fill this pipe."
 
 "Ah, but who's to watch you, Dowlas, and see you do it?  That's no fair
 bet," said the butcher.
 
 "No fair bet?"  replied Mr. Dowlas, angrily.  "I should like to hear
 any man stand up and say I want to bet unfair.  Come now, Master Lundy,
 I should like to hear you say it."
 
 "Very like you would," said the butcher.  "But it's no business o'
 mine.  You're none o' my bargains, and I aren't a-going to try and
 'bate your price.  If anybody 'll bid for you at your own vallying, let
 him.  I'm for peace and quietness, I am."
 
 "Yes, that's what every yapping cur is, when you hold a stick up at
--**--**--
 the pale thin figure of Silas Marner was suddenly seen standing in the
 warm light, uttering no word, but looking round at the company with his
 strange unearthly eyes.  The long pipes gave a simultaneous movement,
 like the antennae of startled insects, and every man present, not
 excepting even the sceptical farrier, had an impression that he saw,
 not Silas Marner in the flesh, but an apparition; for the door by which
 Silas had entered was hidden by the high-screened seats, and no one had
 noticed his approach. Mr. Macey, sitting a long way off the ghost,
 might be supposed to have felt an argumentative triumph, which would
 tend to neutralize his share of the general alarm.  Had he not always
 said that when Silas Marner was in that strange trance of his, his soul
 went loose from his body?  Here was the demonstration: nevertheless, on
 the whole, he would have been as well contented without it.  For a few
 moments there was a dead silence, Marner's want of breath and agitation
 not allowing him to speak.  The landlord, under the habitual sense that
 he was bound to keep his house open to all company, and confident in
 the protection of his unbroken neutrality, at last took on himself the
 task of adjuring the ghost.
 
 "Master Marner," he said, in a conciliatory tone, "what's lacking to
 you?  What's your business here?"
 
 "Robbed!"  said Silas, gaspingly.  "I've been robbed!  I want the
 constable--and the Justice--and Squire Cass--and Mr. Crackenthorp."
 
 "Lay hold on him, Jem Rodney," said the landlord, the idea of a ghost
 subsiding; "he's off his head, I doubt.  He's wet through."
 
 Jem Rodney was the outermost man, and sat conveniently near Marner's
 standing-place; but he declined to give his services.
 
 "Come and lay hold on him yourself, Mr. Snell, if you've a mind," said
--**--**--
 you--I won't accuse anybody--only," he added, lifting up his hands to
 his head, and turning away with bewildered misery, "I try--I try to
 think where my guineas can be."
 
 "Aye, aye, they're gone where it's hot enough to melt 'em, I doubt,"
 said Mr. Macey.
 
 "Tchuh!"  said the farrier.  And then he asked, with a cross-examining
 air, "How much money might there be in the bags, Master Marner?"
 
 "Two hundred and seventy-two pounds, twelve and sixpence, last night
 when I counted it," said Silas, seating himself again, with a groan.
 
 "Pooh!  why, they'd be none so heavy to carry.  Some tramp's been in,
 that's all; and as for the no footmarks, and the bricks and the sand
 being all right--why, your eyes are pretty much like a insect's, Master
 Marner; they're obliged to look so close, you can't see much at a time.
 It's my opinion as, if I'd been you, or you'd been me--for it comes to
 the same thing--you wouldn't have thought you'd found everything as you
 left it.  But what I vote is, as two of the sensiblest o' the company
 should go with you to Master Kench, the constable's--he's ill i' bed, I
 know that much--and get him to appoint one of us his deppity; for
 that's the law, and I don't think anybody 'ull take upon him to
 contradick me there.  It isn't much of a walk to Kench's; and then, if
 it's me as is deppity, I'll go back with you, Master Marner, and
 examine your premises; and if anybody's got any fault to find with
 that, I'll thank him to stand up and say it out like a man."
 
 By this pregnant speech the farrier had re-established his
 self-complacency, and waited with confidence to hear himself named as
 one of the superlatively sensible men.
--**--**--
 be made out by justices and constables."
 
 "Now, don't you be for overshooting the mark, Tookey," said Mr. Macey,
 nodding his head aside admonishingly.  "That's what you're allays at;
 if I throw a stone and hit, you think there's summat better than
 hitting, and you try to throw a stone beyond. What I said was against
 the tinder-box: I said nothing against justices and constables, for
 they're o' King George's making, and it 'ud be ill-becoming a man in a
 parish office to fly out again' King George."
 
 While these discussions were going on amongst the group outside the
 Rainbow, a higher consultation was being carried on within, under the
 presidency of Mr. Crackenthorp, the rector, assisted by Squire Cass and
 other substantial parishioners.  It had just occurred to Mr. Snell, the
 landlord--he being, as he observed, a man accustomed to put two and two
 together--to connect with the tinder-box, which, as deputy-constable,
 he himself had had the honourable distinction of finding, certain
 recollections of a pedlar who had called to drink at the house about a
 month before, and had actually stated that he carried a tinder-box
 about with him to light his pipe.  Here, surely, was a clue to be
 followed out.  And as memory, when duly impregnated with ascertained
 facts, is sometimes surprisingly fertile, Mr. Snell gradually recovered
 a vivid impression of the effect produced on him by the pedlar's
 countenance and conversation.  He had a "look with his eye" which fell
 unpleasantly on Mr. Snell's sensitive organism.  To be sure, he didn't
 say anything particular--no, except that about the tinder-box--but it
 isn't what a man says, it's the way he says it. Moreover, he had a
 swarthy foreignness of complexion which boded little honesty.
 
 "Did he wear ear-rings?"  Mr. Crackenthorp wished to know, having some
--**--**--
 "Home?  no.  What has happened?  Be quick.  What has he done with my
 horse?"
 
 "Ah, I thought it was yours, though he pretended you had parted with it
 to him."
 
 "Has he thrown him down and broken his knees?"  said Godfrey, flushed
 with exasperation.
 
 "Worse than that," said Bryce.  "You see, I'd made a bargain with him
 to buy the horse for a hundred and twenty--a swinging price, but I
 always liked the horse.  And what does he do but go and stake him--fly
 at a hedge with stakes in it, atop of a bank with a ditch before it.
 The horse had been dead a pretty good while when he was found.  So he
 hasn't been home since, has he?"
 
 "Home?  no," said Godfrey, "and he'd better keep away.  Confound me for
 a fool!  I might have known this would be the end of it."
 
 "Well, to tell you the truth," said Bryce, "after I'd bargained for the
 horse, it did come into my head that he might be riding and selling the
 horse without your knowledge, for I didn't believe it was his own.  I
 knew Master Dunsey was up to his tricks sometimes. But where can he be
 gone?  He's never been seen at Batherley.  He couldn't have been hurt,
 for he must have walked off."
 
 "Hurt?"  said Godfrey, bitterly.  "He'll never be hurt--he's made to
 hurt other people."
 
 "And so you _did_ give him leave to sell the horse, eh?"  said Bryce.
 
 "Yes; I wanted to part with the horse--he was always a little too hard
 in the mouth for me," said Godfrey; his pride making him wince under
 the idea that Bryce guessed the sale to be a matter of necessity.  "I
 was going to see after him--I thought some mischief had happened.  I'll
--**--**--
 matter.  The old Squire was accustomed to his son's frequent absence
 from home, and thought neither Dunstan's nor Wildfire's non-appearance
 a matter calling for remark.  Godfrey said to himself again and again,
 that if he let slip this one opportunity of confession, he might never
 have another; the revelation might be made even in a more odious way
 than by Dunstan's malignity: _she_ might come as she had threatened to
 do.  And then he tried to make the scene easier to himself by
 rehearsal: he made up his mind how he would pass from the admission of
 his weakness in letting Dunstan have the money to the fact that Dunstan
 had a hold on him which he had been unable to shake off, and how he
 would work up his father to expect something very bad before he told
 him the fact.  The old Squire was an implacable man: he made
 resolutions in violent anger, and he was not to be moved from them
 after his anger had subsided--as fiery volcanic matters cool and harden
 into rock.  Like many violent and implacable men, he allowed evils to
 grow under favour of his own heedlessness, till they pressed upon him
 with exasperating force, and then he turned round with fierce severity
 and became unrelentingly hard.  This was his system with his tenants:
 he allowed them to get into arrears, neglect their fences, reduce their
 stock, sell their straw, and otherwise go the wrong way,--and then,
 when he became short of money in consequence of this indulgence, he
 took the hardest measures and would listen to no appeal.  Godfrey knew
 all this, and felt it with the greater force because he had constantly
 suffered annoyance from witnessing his father's sudden fits of
 unrelentingness, for which his own habitual irresolution deprived him
--**--**--
 
 "What!  broke his knees?"  said the Squire, after taking a draught of
 ale.  "I thought you knew how to ride better than that, sir. I never
 threw a horse down in my life.  If I had, I might ha' whistled for
 another, for _my_ father wasn't quite so ready to unstring as some
 other fathers I know of.  But they must turn over a new leaf--_they_
 must.  What with mortgages and arrears, I'm as short o' cash as a
 roadside pauper.  And that fool Kimble says the newspaper's talking
 about peace.  Why, the country wouldn't have a leg to stand on.  Prices
 'ud run down like a jack, and I should never get my arrears, not if I
 sold all the fellows up.  And there's that damned Fowler, I won't put
 up with him any longer; I've told Winthrop to go to Cox this very day.
 The lying scoundrel told me he'd be sure to pay me a hundred last
 month.  He takes advantage because he's on that outlying farm, and
 thinks I shall forget him."
 
 The Squire had delivered this speech in a coughing and interrupted
 manner, but with no pause long enough for Godfrey to make it a pretext
 for taking up the word again.  He felt that his father meant to ward
 off any request for money on the ground of the misfortune with
 Wildfire, and that the emphasis he had thus been led to lay on his
 shortness of cash and his arrears was likely to produce an attitude of
 mind the utmost unfavourable for his own disclosure. But he must go on,
 now he had begun.
 
 "It's worse than breaking the horse's knees--he's been staked and
 killed," he said, as soon as his father was silent, and had begun to
 cut his meat.  "But I wasn't thinking of asking you to buy me another
--**--**--
 Squire, whose memory consisted in certain strong impressions unmodified
 by detail; "but I know, one while you seemed to be thinking o'
 marrying, and I didn't offer to put any obstacles in your way, as some
 fathers would.  I'd as lieve you married Lammeter's daughter as
 anybody.  I suppose, if I'd said you nay, you'd ha' kept on with it;
 but, for want o' contradiction, you've changed your mind.  You're a
 shilly-shally fellow: you take after your poor mother.  She never had a
 will of her own; a woman has no call for one, if she's got a proper man
 for her husband.  But _your_ wife had need have one, for you hardly
 know your own mind enough to make both your legs walk one way.  The
 lass hasn't said downright she won't have you, has she?"
 
 "No," said Godfrey, feeling very hot and uncomfortable; "but I don't
 think she will."
 
 "Think!  why haven't you the courage to ask her?  Do you stick to it,
 you want to have _her_--that's the thing?"
 
 "There's no other woman I want to marry," said Godfrey, evasively.
 
 "Well, then, let me make the offer for you, that's all, if you haven't
 the pluck to do it yourself.  Lammeter isn't likely to be loath for his
 daughter to marry into _my_ family, I should think. And as for the
 pretty lass, she wouldn't have her cousin--and there's nobody else, as
 I see, could ha' stood in your way."
 
 "I'd rather let it be, please sir, at present," said Godfrey, in alarm.
 "I think she's a little offended with me just now, and I should like to
 speak for myself.  A man must manage these things for himself."
 
 "Well, speak, then, and manage it, and see if you can't turn over a new
 leaf.  That's what a man must do when he thinks o' marrying."
--**--**--
 embarrassment of being obliged absolutely to decline her when she
 seemed to be within his reach.  He fled to his usual refuge, that of
 hoping for some unforeseen turn of fortune, some favourable chance
 which would save him from unpleasant consequences--perhaps even justify
 his insincerity by manifesting its prudence. And in this point of
 trusting to some throw of fortune's dice, Godfrey can hardly be called
 specially old-fashioned.  Favourable Chance, I fancy, is the god of all
 men who follow their own devices instead of obeying a law they believe
 in.  Let even a polished man of these days get into a position he is
 ashamed to avow, and his mind will be bent on all the possible issues
 that may deliver him from the calculable results of that position.  Let
 him live outside his income, or shirk the resolute honest work that
 brings wages, and he will presently find himself dreaming of a possible
 benefactor, a possible simpleton who may be cajoled into using his
 interest, a possible state of mind in some possible person not yet
 forthcoming. Let him neglect the responsibilities of his office, and he
 will inevitably anchor himself on the chance that the thing left undone
 may turn out not to be of the supposed importance.  Let him betray his
 friend's confidence, and he will adore that same cunning complexity
 called Chance, which gives him the hope that his friend will never
 know.  Let him forsake a decent craft that he may pursue the
 gentilities of a profession to which nature never called him, and his
 religion will infallibly be the worship of blessed Chance, which he
 will believe in as the mighty creator of success.  The evil principle
 deprecated in that religion is the orderly sequence by which the seed
 brings forth a crop after its kind.
--**--**--
 originality into the channel of nightmare, are great preservatives
 against a dangerous spontaneity of waking thought.
 
 When the robbery was talked of at the Rainbow and elsewhere, in good
 company, the balance continued to waver between the rational
 explanation founded on the tinder-box, and the theory of an
 impenetrable mystery that mocked investigation.  The advocates of the
 tinder-box-and-pedlar view considered the other side a muddle-headed
 and credulous set, who, because they themselves were wall-eyed,
 supposed everybody else to have the same blank outlook; and the
 adherents of the inexplicable more than hinted that their antagonists
 were animals inclined to crow before they had found any corn--mere
 skimming-dishes in point of depth--whose clear-sightedness consisted in
 supposing there was nothing behind a barn-door because they couldn't
 see through it; so that, though their controversy did not serve to
 elicit the fact concerning the robbery, it elicited some true opinions
 of collateral importance.
 
 But while poor Silas's loss served thus to brush the slow current of
 Raveloe conversation, Silas himself was feeling the withering
 desolation of that bereavement about which his neighbours were arguing
 at their ease.  To any one who had observed him before he lost his
 gold, it might have seemed that so withered and shrunken a life as his
 could hardly be susceptible of a bruise, could hardly endure any
 subtraction but such as would put an end to it altogether.  But in
 reality it had been an eager life, filled with immediate purpose which
 fenced him in from the wide, cheerless unknown.  It had been a clinging
 life; and though the object round which its fibres had clung was a dead
 disrupted thing, it satisfied the need for clinging.  But now the fence
 was broken down--the support was snatched away.  Marner's thoughts
 could no longer move in their old round, and were baffled by a blank
--**--**--
 'em again and again, and they took the water just as well.  And that's
 reasonable; for if Old Harry's a mind to do a bit o' kindness for a
 holiday, like, who's got anything against it?  That's my thinking; and
 I've been clerk o' this parish forty year, and I know, when the parson
 and me does the cussing of a Ash Wednesday, there's no cussing o' folks
 as have a mind to be cured without a doctor, let Kimble say what he
 will.  And so, Master Marner, as I was saying--for there's windings i'
 things as they may carry you to the fur end o' the prayer-book afore
 you get back to 'em--my advice is, as you keep up your sperrits; for as
 for thinking you're a deep un, and ha' got more inside you nor 'ull
 bear daylight, I'm not o' that opinion at all, and so I tell the
 neighbours.  For, says I, you talk o' Master Marner making out a
 tale--why, it's nonsense, that is: it 'ud take a 'cute man to make a
 tale like that; and, says I, he looked as scared as a rabbit."
 
 During this discursive address Silas had continued motionless in his
 previous attitude, leaning his elbows on his knees, and pressing his
 hands against his head.  Mr. Macey, not doubting that he had been
 listened to, paused, in the expectation of some appreciatory reply, but
 Marner remained silent.  He had a sense that the old man meant to be
 good-natured and neighbourly; but the kindness fell on him as sunshine
 falls on the wretched--he had no heart to taste it, and felt that it
 was very far off him.
 
 "Come, Master Marner, have you got nothing to say to that?"  said Mr.
 Macey at last, with a slight accent of impatience.
--**--**--
 the parish who would not have held that to go to church every Sunday in
 the calendar would have shown a greedy desire to stand well with
 Heaven, and get an undue advantage over their neighbours--a wish to be
 better than the "common run", that would have implied a reflection on
 those who had had godfathers and godmothers as well as themselves, and
 had an equal right to the burying-service.  At the same time, it was
 understood to be requisite for all who were not household servants, or
 young men, to take the sacrament at one of the great festivals: Squire
 Cass himself took it on Christmas-day; while those who were held to be
 "good livers" went to church with greater, though still with moderate,
 frequency.
 
 Mrs. Winthrop was one of these: she was in all respects a woman of
 scrupulous conscience, so eager for duties that life seemed to offer
 them too scantily unless she rose at half-past four, though this threw
 a scarcity of work over the more advanced hours of the morning, which
 it was a constant problem with her to remove.  Yet she had not the
 vixenish temper which is sometimes supposed to be a necessary condition
 of such habits: she was a very mild, patient woman, whose nature it was
 to seek out all the sadder and more serious elements of life, and
 pasture her mind upon them.  She was the person always first thought of
 in Raveloe when there was illness or death in a family, when leeches
 were to be applied, or there was a sudden disappointment in a monthly
 nurse.  She was a "comfortable woman"--good-looking,
 fresh-complexioned, having her lips always slightly screwed, as if she
 felt herself in a sick-room with the doctor or the clergyman present.
 But she was never whimpering; no one had seen her shed tears; she was
--**--**--
 kills the sound."
 
 "Yes, I did; I heard 'em," said Silas, to whom Sunday bells were a mere
 accident of the day, and not part of its sacredness.  There had been no
 bells in Lantern Yard.
 
 "Dear heart!"  said Dolly, pausing before she spoke again.  "But what a
 pity it is you should work of a Sunday, and not clean yourself--if you
 _didn't_ go to church; for if you'd a roasting bit, it might be as you
 couldn't leave it, being a lone man.  But there's the bakehus, if you
 could make up your mind to spend a twopence on the oven now and
 then,--not every week, in course--I shouldn't like to do that
 myself,--you might carry your bit o' dinner there, for it's nothing but
 right to have a bit o' summat hot of a Sunday, and not to make it as
 you can't know your dinner from Saturday.  But now, upo' Christmas-day,
 this blessed Christmas as is ever coming, if you was to take your
 dinner to the bakehus, and go to church, and see the holly and the yew,
 and hear the anthim, and then take the sacramen', you'd be a deal the
 better, and you'd know which end you stood on, and you could put your
 trust i' Them as knows better nor we do, seein' you'd ha' done what it
 lies on us all to do."
 
 Dolly's exhortation, which was an unusually long effort of speech for
 her, was uttered in the soothing persuasive tone with which she would
 have tried to prevail on a sick man to take his medicine, or a basin of
 gruel for which he had no appetite.  Silas had never before been
 closely urged on the point of his absence from church, which had only
 been thought of as a part of his general queerness; and he was too
--**--**--
 with two dark spots in it.
 
 "And he's got a voice like a bird--you wouldn't think," Dolly went on;
 "he can sing a Christmas carril as his father's taught him; and I take
 it for a token as he'll come to good, as he can learn the good tunes so
 quick.  Come, Aaron, stan' up and sing the carril to Master Marner,
 come."
 
 Aaron replied by rubbing his forehead against his mother's shoulder.
 
 "Oh, that's naughty," said Dolly, gently.  "Stan' up, when mother tells
 you, and let me hold the cake till you've done."
 
 Aaron was not indisposed to display his talents, even to an ogre, under
 protecting circumstances; and after a few more signs of coyness,
 consisting chiefly in rubbing the backs of his hands over his eyes, and
 then peeping between them at Master Marner, to see if he looked anxious
 for the "carril", he at length allowed his head to be duly adjusted,
 and standing behind the table, which let him appear above it only as
 far as his broad frill, so that he looked like a cherubic head
 untroubled with a body, he began with a clear chirp, and in a melody
 that had the rhythm of an industrious hammer
 
   "God rest you, merry gentlemen,
   Let nothing you dismay,
   For Jesus Christ our Savior
   Was born on Christmas-day."
 
 
 Dolly listened with a devout look, glancing at Marner in some
 confidence that this strain would help to allure him to church.
 
 "That's Christmas music," she said, when Aaron had ended, and had
 secured his piece of cake again.  "There's no other music equil to the
 Christmas music--"Hark the erol angils sing."  And you may judge what
 it is at church, Master Marner, with the bassoon and the voices, as you
 can't help thinking you've got to a better place a'ready--for I
--**--**--
 Creed, which was discriminated from the others only as being longer and
 of exceptional virtue, since it was only read on rare
 occasions--brought a vague exulting sense, for which the grown men
 could as little have found words as the children, that something great
 and mysterious had been done for them in heaven above and in earth
 below, which they were appropriating by their presence.  And then the
 red faces made their way through the black biting frost to their own
 homes, feeling themselves free for the rest of the day to eat, drink,
 and be merry, and using that Christian freedom without diffidence.
 
 At Squire Cass's family party that day nobody mentioned Dunstan--nobody
 was sorry for his absence, or feared it would be too long. The doctor
 and his wife, uncle and aunt Kimble, were there, and the annual
 Christmas talk was carried through without any omissions, rising to the
 climax of Mr. Kimble's experience when he walked the London hospitals
 thirty years back, together with striking professional anecdotes then
 gathered.  Whereupon cards followed, with aunt Kimble's annual failure
 to follow suit, and uncle Kimble's irascibility concerning the odd
 trick which was rarely explicable to him, when it was not on his side,
 without a general visitation of tricks to see that they were formed on
 sound principles: the whole being accompanied by a strong steaming
 odour of spirits-and-water.
 
 But the party on Christmas-day, being a strictly family party, was not
 the pre-eminently brilliant celebration of the season at the Red House.
 It was the great dance on New Year's Eve that made the glory of Squire
 Cass's hospitality, as of his forefathers', time out of mind.  This was
 the occasion when all the society of Raveloe and Tarley, whether old
 acquaintances separated by long rutty distances, or cooled
--**--**--
 mud under the stamp of Dobbin's foot.  A painter would, perhaps, have
 preferred her in those moments when she was free from
 self-consciousness; but certainly the bloom on her cheeks was at its
 highest point of contrast with the surrounding drab when she arrived at
 the door of the Red House, and saw Mr. Godfrey Cass ready to lift her
 from the pillion.  She wished her sister Priscilla had come up at the
 same time behind the servant, for then she would have contrived that
 Mr. Godfrey should have lifted off Priscilla first, and, in the
 meantime, she would have persuaded her father to go round to the
 horse-block instead of alighting at the door-steps.  It was very
 painful, when you had made it quite clear to a young man that you were
 determined not to marry him, however much he might wish it, that he
 would still continue to pay you marked attentions; besides, why didn't
 he always show the same attentions, if he meant them sincerely, instead
 of being so strange as Mr. Godfrey Cass was, sometimes behaving as if
 he didn't want to speak to her, and taking no notice of her for weeks
 and weeks, and then, all on a sudden, almost making love again?
 Moreover, it was quite plain he had no real love for her, else he would
 not let people have _that_ to say of him which they did say. Did he
 suppose that Miss Nancy Lammeter was to be won by any man, squire or no
 squire, who led a bad life?  That was not what she had been used to see
 in her own father, who was the soberest and best man in that
 country-side, only a little hot and hasty now and then, if things were
 not done to the minute.
--**--**--
 reasonable to suppose that they showed their necks from a love of
 display, but rather from some obligation not inconsistent with sense
 and modesty.  She felt convinced, as she opened her box, that this must
 be her aunt Osgood's opinion, for Miss Nancy's mind resembled her
 aunt's to a degree that everybody said was surprising, considering the
 kinship was on Mr. Osgood's side; and though you might not have
 supposed it from the formality of their greeting, there was a devoted
 attachment and mutual admiration between aunt and niece.  Even Miss
 Nancy's refusal of her cousin Gilbert Osgood (on the ground solely that
 he was her cousin), though it had grieved her aunt greatly, had not in
 the least cooled the preference which had determined her to leave Nancy
 several of her hereditary ornaments, let Gilbert's future wife be whom
 she might.
 
 Three of the ladies quickly retired, but the Miss Gunns were quite
 content that Mrs. Osgood's inclination to remain with her niece gave
 them also a reason for staying to see the rustic beauty's toilette. And
 it was really a pleasure--from the first opening of the bandbox, where
 everything smelt of lavender and rose-leaves, to the clasping of the
 small coral necklace that fitted closely round her little white neck.
 Everything belonging to Miss Nancy was of delicate purity and
 nattiness: not a crease was where it had no business to be, not a bit
 of her linen professed whiteness without fulfilling its profession; the
 very pins on her pincushion were stuck in after a pattern from which
 she was careful to allow no aberration; and as for her own person, it
 gave the same idea of perfect unvarying neatness as the body of a
 little bird.  It is true that her light-brown hair was cropped behind
--**--**--
 to ascertain that the back view was equally faultless.
 
 "What do you think o' _these_ gowns, aunt Osgood?"  said Priscilla,
 while Nancy helped her to unrobe.
 
 "Very handsome indeed, niece," said Mrs. Osgood, with a slight increase
 of formality.  She always thought niece Priscilla too rough.
 
 "I'm obliged to have the same as Nancy, you know, for all I'm five
 years older, and it makes me look yallow; for she never _will_ have
 anything without I have mine just like it, because she wants us to look
 like sisters.  And I tell her, folks 'ull think it's my weakness makes
 me fancy as I shall look pretty in what she looks pretty in.  For I
 _am_ ugly--there's no denying that: I feature my father's family.  But,
 law!  I don't mind, do you?"  Priscilla here turned to the Miss Gunns,
 rattling on in too much preoccupation with the delight of talking, to
 notice that her candour was not appreciated.  "The pretty uns do for
 fly-catchers--they keep the men off us.  I've no opinion o' the men,
 Miss Gunn--I don't know what _you_ have.  And as for fretting and
 stewing about what _they_'ll think of you from morning till night, and
 making your life uneasy about what they're doing when they're out o'
 your sight--as I tell Nancy, it's a folly no woman need be guilty of,
 if she's got a good father and a good home: let her leave it to them as
 have got no fortin, and can't help themselves.  As I say, Mr.
 Have-your-own-way is the best husband, and the only one I'd ever
 promise to obey.  I know it isn't pleasant, when you've been used to
 living in a big way, and managing hogsheads and all that, to go and put
 your nose in by somebody else's fireside, or to sit down by yourself to
--**--**--
 see how you'll master your husband and never raise your voice above the
 singing o' the kettle all the while.  I like to see the men mastered!"
 
 "Don't talk _so_, Priscy," said Nancy, blushing.  "You know I don't
 mean ever to be married."
 
 "Oh, you never mean a fiddlestick's end!"  said Priscilla, as she
 arranged her discarded dress, and closed her bandbox.  "Who shall _I_
 have to work for when father's gone, if you are to go and take notions
 in your head and be an old maid, because some folks are no better than
 they should be?  I haven't a bit o' patience with you--sitting on an
 addled egg for ever, as if there was never a fresh un in the world.
 One old maid's enough out o' two sisters; and I shall do credit to a
 single life, for God A'mighty meant me for it.  Come, we can go down
 now.  I'm as ready as a mawkin _can_ be--there's nothing awanting to
 frighten the crows, now I've got my ear-droppers in."
 
 As the two Miss Lammeters walked into the large parlour together, any
 one who did not know the character of both might certainly have
 supposed that the reason why the square-shouldered, clumsy,
 high-featured Priscilla wore a dress the facsimile of her pretty
 sister's, was either the mistaken vanity of the one, or the malicious
 contrivance of the other in order to set off her own rare beauty.  But
 the good-natured self-forgetful cheeriness and common-sense of
 Priscilla would soon have dissipated the one suspicion; and the modest
 calm of Nancy's speech and manners told clearly of a mind free from all
 disavowed devices.
 
 Places of honour had been kept for the Miss Lammeters near the head of
 the principal tea-table in the wainscoted parlour, now looking fresh
--**--**--
 son, so that his practice might one day be handed over to a successor
 with the incongruous name of Taylor or Johnson.  But in that case the
 wiser people in Raveloe would employ Dr. Blick of Flitton--as less
 unnatural.
 
 "Did you speak to me, my dear?"  said the authentic doctor, coming
 quickly to his wife's side; but, as if foreseeing that she would be too
 much out of breath to repeat her remark, he went on immediately--"Ha,
 Miss Priscilla, the sight of you revives the taste of that
 super-excellent pork-pie.  I hope the batch isn't near an end."
 
 "Yes, indeed, it is, doctor," said Priscilla; "but I'll answer for it
 the next shall be as good.  My pork-pies don't turn out well by chance."
 
 "Not as your doctoring does, eh, Kimble?--because folks forget to take
 your physic, eh?"  said the Squire, who regarded physic and doctors as
 many loyal churchmen regard the church and the clergy--tasting a joke
 against them when he was in health, but impatiently eager for their aid
 when anything was the matter with him.  He tapped his box, and looked
 round with a triumphant laugh.
 
 "Ah, she has a quick wit, my friend Priscilla has," said the doctor,
 choosing to attribute the epigram to a lady rather than allow a
 brother-in-law that advantage over him.  "She saves a little pepper to
 sprinkle over her talk--that's the reason why she never puts too much
 into her pies.  There's my wife now, she never has an answer at her
 tongue's end; but if I offend her, she's sure to scarify my throat with
 black pepper the next day, or else give me the colic with watery
 greens.  That's an awful tit-for-tat."  Here the vivacious doctor made
 a pathetic grimace.
 
 "Did you ever hear the like?"  said Mrs. Kimble, laughing above her
--**--**--
 Bob obeyed, and Solomon walked in, fiddling as he walked, for he would
 on no account break off in the middle of a tune.
 
 "Here, Solomon," said the Squire, with loud patronage.  "Round here, my
 man.  Ah, I knew it was "The flaxen-headed ploughboy": there's no finer
 tune."
 
 Solomon Macey, a small hale old man with an abundant crop of long white
 hair reaching nearly to his shoulders, advanced to the indicated spot,
 bowing reverently while he fiddled, as much as to say that he respected
 the company, though he respected the key-note more.  As soon as he had
 repeated the tune and lowered his fiddle, he bowed again to the Squire
 and the rector, and said, "I hope I see your honour and your reverence
 well, and wishing you health and long life and a happy New Year.  And
 wishing the same to you, Mr. Lammeter, sir; and to the other gentlemen,
 and the madams, and the young lasses."
 
 As Solomon uttered the last words, he bowed in all directions
 solicitously, lest he should be wanting in due respect.  But thereupon
 he immediately began to prelude, and fell into the tune which he knew
 would be taken as a special compliment by Mr. Lammeter.
 
 "Thank ye, Solomon, thank ye," said Mr. Lammeter when the fiddle paused
 again.  "That's "Over the hills and far away", that is.  My father used
 to say to me, whenever we heard that tune, "Ah, lad, _I_ come from over
 the hills and far away."  There's a many tunes I don't make head or
 tail of; but that speaks to me like the blackbird's whistle.  I suppose
 it's the name: there's a deal in the name of a tune."
 
 But Solomon was already impatient to prelude again, and presently broke
 with much spirit into "Sir Roger de Coverley", at which there was a
--**--**--
 if I can't find faut wi' the brewing.  I should like you to pick me out
 a finer-limbed young fellow nor Master Godfrey--one as 'ud knock you
 down easier, or 's more pleasanter-looksed when he's piert and merry."
 
 "Tchuh!"  said Mr. Macey, provoked to increased severity, "he isn't
 come to his right colour yet: he's partly like a slack-baked pie.  And
 I doubt he's got a soft place in his head, else why should he be turned
 round the finger by that offal Dunsey as nobody's seen o' late, and let
 him kill that fine hunting hoss as was the talk o' the country?  And
 one while he was allays after Miss Nancy, and then it all went off
 again, like a smell o' hot porridge, as I may say. That wasn't my way
 when _I_ went a-coorting."
 
 "Ah, but mayhap Miss Nancy hung off, like, and your lass didn't," said
 Ben.
 
 "I should say she didn't," said Mr. Macey, significantly. "Before I
 said "sniff", I took care to know as she'd say "snaff", and pretty
 quick too.  I wasn't a-going to open _my_ mouth, like a dog at a fly,
 and snap it to again, wi' nothing to swaller."
 
 "Well, I think Miss Nancy's a-coming round again," said Ben, "for
 Master Godfrey doesn't look so down-hearted to-night.  And I see he's
 for taking her away to sit down, now they're at the end o' the dance:
 that looks like sweethearting, that does."
 
 The reason why Godfrey and Nancy had left the dance was not so tender
 as Ben imagined.  In the close press of couples a slight accident had
 happened to Nancy's dress, which, while it was short enough to show her
 neat ankle in front, was long enough behind to be caught under the
 stately stamp of the Squire's foot, so as to rend certain stitches at
--**--**--
 
 "That's very ill-natured of you," said Godfrey, standing by her without
 any sign of intended departure, "to be sorry you've danced with me."
 
 "Oh, no, sir, I don't mean to say what's ill-natured at all," said
 Nancy, looking distractingly prim and pretty.  "When gentlemen have so
 many pleasures, one dance can matter but very little."
 
 "You know that isn't true.  You know one dance with you matters more to
 me than all the other pleasures in the world."
 
 It was a long, long while since Godfrey had said anything so direct as
 that, and Nancy was startled.  But her instinctive dignity and
 repugnance to any show of emotion made her sit perfectly still, and
 only throw a little more decision into her voice, as she said--
 
 "No, indeed, Mr. Godfrey, that's not known to me, and I have very good
 reasons for thinking different.  But if it's true, I don't wish to hear
 it."
 
 "Would you never forgive me, then, Nancy--never think well of me, let
 what would happen--would you never think the present made amends for
 the past?  Not if I turned a good fellow, and gave up everything you
 didn't like?"
 
 Godfrey was half conscious that this sudden opportunity of speaking to
 Nancy alone had driven him beside himself; but blind feeling had got
 the mastery of his tongue.  Nancy really felt much agitated by the
 possibility Godfrey's words suggested, but this very pressure of
 emotion that she was in danger of finding too strong for her roused all
 her power of self-command.
 
 "I should be glad to see a good change in anybody, Mr. Godfrey," she
 answered, with the slightest discernible difference of tone, "but it
 'ud be better if no change was wanted."
 
 "You're very hard-hearted, Nancy," said Godfrey, pettishly.  "You might
 encourage me to be a better fellow.  I'm very miserable--but you've no
--**--**--
 rocked in a lace-trimmed cradle.
 
 But the complete torpor came at last: the fingers lost their tension,
 the arms unbent; then the little head fell away from the bosom, and the
 blue eyes opened wide on the cold starlight.  At first there was a
 little peevish cry of "mammy", and an effort to regain the pillowing
 arm and bosom; but mammy's ear was deaf, and the pillow seemed to be
 slipping away backward.  Suddenly, as the child rolled downward on its
 mother's knees, all wet with snow, its eyes were caught by a bright
 glancing light on the white ground, and, with the ready transition of
 infancy, it was immediately absorbed in watching the bright living
 thing running towards it, yet never arriving.  That bright living thing
 must be caught; and in an instant the child had slipped on all-fours,
 and held out one little hand to catch the gleam.  But the gleam would
 not be caught in that way, and now the head was held up to see where
 the cunning gleam came from.  It came from a very bright place; and the
 little one, rising on its legs, toddled through the snow, the old grimy
 shawl in which it was wrapped trailing behind it, and the queer little
 bonnet dangling at its back--toddled on to the open door of Silas
 Marner's cottage, and right up to the warm hearth, where there was a
 bright fire of logs and sticks, which had thoroughly warmed the old
 sack (Silas's greatcoat) spread out on the bricks to dry.  The little
 one, accustomed to be left to itself for long hours without notice from
 its mother, squatted down on the sack, and spread its tiny hands
 towards the blaze, in perfect contentment, gurgling and making many
 inarticulate communications to the cheerful fire, like a new-hatched
--**--**--
 had been taken away!  He felt his heart begin to beat violently, and
 for a few moments he was unable to stretch out his hand and grasp the
 restored treasure.  The heap of gold seemed to glow and get larger
 beneath his agitated gaze.  He leaned forward at last, and stretched
 forth his hand; but instead of the hard coin with the familiar
 resisting outline, his fingers encountered soft warm curls.  In utter
 amazement, Silas fell on his knees and bent his head low to examine the
 marvel: it was a sleeping child--a round, fair thing, with soft yellow
 rings all over its head.  Could this be his little sister come back to
 him in a dream--his little sister whom he had carried about in his arms
 for a year before she died, when he was a small boy without shoes or
 stockings?  That was the first thought that darted across Silas's blank
 wonderment.  _Was_ it a dream?  He rose to his feet again, pushed his
 logs together, and, throwing on some dried leaves and sticks, raised a
 flame; but the flame did not disperse the vision--it only lit up more
 distinctly the little round form of the child, and its shabby clothing.
 It was very much like his little sister. Silas sank into his chair
 powerless, under the double presence of an inexplicable surprise and a
 hurrying influx of memories.  How and when had the child come in
 without his knowledge?  He had never been beyond the door.  But along
 with that question, and almost thrusting it away, there was a vision of
 the old home and the old streets leading to Lantern Yard--and within
 that vision another, of the thoughts which had been present with him in
 those far-off scenes. The thoughts were strange to him now, like old
--**--**--
 him, they must see that he was white-lipped and trembling.
 
 But now all eyes at that end of the room were bent on Silas Marner; the
 Squire himself had risen, and asked angrily, "How's this?--what's
 this?--what do you do coming in here in this way?"
 
 "I'm come for the doctor--I want the doctor," Silas had said, in the
 first moment, to Mr. Crackenthorp.
 
 "Why, what's the matter, Marner?"  said the rector.  "The doctor's
 here; but say quietly what you want him for."
 
 "It's a woman," said Silas, speaking low, and half-breathlessly, just
 as Godfrey came up.  "She's dead, I think--dead in the snow at the
 Stone-pits--not far from my door."
 
 Godfrey felt a great throb: there was one terror in his mind at that
 moment: it was, that the woman might _not_ be dead.  That was an evil
 terror--an ugly inmate to have found a nestling-place in Godfrey's
 kindly disposition; but no disposition is a security from evil wishes
 to a man whose happiness hangs on duplicity.
 
 "Hush, hush!"  said Mr. Crackenthorp.  "Go out into the hall there.
 I'll fetch the doctor to you.  Found a woman in the snow--and thinks
 she's dead," he added, speaking low to the Squire. "Better say as
 little about it as possible: it will shock the ladies.  Just tell them
 a poor woman is ill from cold and hunger. I'll go and fetch Kimble."
 
 By this time, however, the ladies had pressed forward, curious to know
 what could have brought the solitary linen-weaver there under such
 strange circumstances, and interested in the pretty child, who, half
 alarmed and half attracted by the brightness and the numerous company,
 now frowned and hid her face, now lifted up her head again and looked
 round placably, until a touch or a coaxing word brought back the frown,
--**--**--
 
 "No, I'll stay, now I'm once out--I'll stay outside here," said
 Godfrey, when they came opposite Marner's cottage.  "You can come and
 tell me if I can do anything."
 
 "Well, sir, you're very good: you've a tender heart," said Dolly, going
 to the door.
 
 Godfrey was too painfully preoccupied to feel a twinge of self-reproach
 at this undeserved praise.  He walked up and down, unconscious that he
 was plunging ankle-deep in snow, unconscious of everything but
 trembling suspense about what was going on in the cottage, and the
 effect of each alternative on his future lot.  No, not quite
 unconscious of everything else.  Deeper down, and half-smothered by
 passionate desire and dread, there was the sense that he ought not to
 be waiting on these alternatives; that he ought to accept the
 consequences of his deeds, own the miserable wife, and fulfil the
 claims of the helpless child.  But he had not moral courage enough to
 contemplate that active renunciation of Nancy as possible for him: he
 had only conscience and heart enough to make him for ever uneasy under
 the weakness that forbade the renunciation.  And at this moment his
 mind leaped away from all restraint toward the sudden prospect of
 deliverance from his long bondage.
 
 "Is she dead?"  said the voice that predominated over every other
 within him.  "If she is, I may marry Nancy; and then I shall be a good
 fellow in future, and have no secrets, and the child--shall be taken
 care of somehow."  But across that vision came the other
 possibility--"She may live, and then it's all up with me."
 
 Godfrey never knew how long it was before the door of the cottage
 opened and Mr. Kimble came out.  He went forward to meet his uncle,
 prepared to suppress the agitation he must feel, whatever news he was
--**--**--
 "Ah, I see it's not the same woman I saw," he said, as he came up.
 "It's a pretty little child: the old fellow seems to want to keep it;
 that's strange for a miser like him.  But I gave him a trifle to help
 him out: the parish isn't likely to quarrel with him for the right to
 keep the child."
 
 "No; but I've seen the time when I might have quarrelled with him for
 it myself.  It's too late now, though.  If the child ran into the fire,
 your aunt's too fat to overtake it: she could only sit and grunt like
 an alarmed sow.  But what a fool you are, Godfrey, to come out in your
 dancing shoes and stockings in this way--and you one of the beaux of
 the evening, and at your own house!  What do you mean by such freaks,
 young fellow?  Has Miss Nancy been cruel, and do you want to spite her
 by spoiling your pumps?"
 
 "Oh, everything has been disagreeable to-night.  I was tired to death
 of jigging and gallanting, and that bother about the hornpipes.  And
 I'd got to dance with the other Miss Gunn," said Godfrey, glad of the
 subterfuge his uncle had suggested to him.
 
 The prevarication and white lies which a mind that keeps itself
 ambitiously pure is as uneasy under as a great artist under the false
 touches that no eye detects but his own, are worn as lightly as mere
 trimmings when once the actions have become a lie.
 
 Godfrey reappeared in the White Parlour with dry feet, and, since the
 truth must be told, with a sense of relief and gladness that was too
 strong for painful thoughts to struggle with.  For could he not venture
 now, whenever opportunity offered, to say the tenderest things to Nancy
--**--**--
 do, that they do; and I think you're in the right on it to keep the
 little un, Master Marner, seeing as it's been sent to you, though
 there's folks as thinks different.  You'll happen be a bit moithered
 with it while it's so little; but I'll come, and welcome, and see to it
 for you: I've a bit o' time to spare most days, for when one gets up
 betimes i' the morning, the clock seems to stan' still tow'rt ten,
 afore it's time to go about the victual.  So, as I say, I'll come and
 see to the child for you, and welcome."
 
 "Thank you... kindly," said Silas, hesitating a little.  "I'll be glad
 if you'll tell me things.  But," he added, uneasily, leaning forward to
 look at Baby with some jealousy, as she was resting her head backward
 against Dolly's arm, and eyeing him contentedly from a distance--"But I
 want to do things for it myself, else it may get fond o' somebody else,
 and not fond o' me.  I've been used to fending for myself in the
 house--I can learn, I can learn."
 
 "Eh, to be sure," said Dolly, gently.  "I've seen men as are wonderful
 handy wi' children.  The men are awk'ard and contrairy mostly, God help
 'em--but when the drink's out of 'em, they aren't unsensible, though
 they're bad for leeching and bandaging--so fiery and unpatient.  You
 see this goes first, next the skin," proceeded Dolly, taking up the
 little shirt, and putting it on.
 
 "Yes," said Marner, docilely, bringing his eyes very close, that they
 might be initiated in the mysteries; whereupon Baby seized his head
 with both her small arms, and put her lips against his face with
 purring noises.
 
 "See there," said Dolly, with a woman's tender tact, "she's fondest o'
--**--**--
 different, bless 'em, I should ha' been glad for one of 'em to be a
 little gell; and to think as I could ha' taught her to scour, and mend,
 and the knitting, and everything. But I can teach 'em this little un,
 Master Marner, when she gets old enough."
 
 "But she'll be _my_ little un," said Marner, rather hastily. "She'll be
 nobody else's."
 
 "No, to be sure; you'll have a right to her, if you're a father to her,
 and bring her up according.  But," added Dolly, coming to a point which
 she had determined beforehand to touch upon, "you must bring her up
 like christened folks's children, and take her to church, and let her
 learn her catechise, as my little Aaron can say off--the "I believe",
 and everything, and "hurt nobody by word or deed",--as well as if he
 was the clerk.  That's what you must do, Master Marner, if you'd do the
 right thing by the orphin child."
 
 Marner's pale face flushed suddenly under a new anxiety.  His mind was
 too busy trying to give some definite bearing to Dolly's words for him
 to think of answering her.
 
 "And it's my belief," she went on, "as the poor little creatur has
 never been christened, and it's nothing but right as the parson should
 be spoke to; and if you was noways unwilling, I'd talk to Mr. Macey
 about it this very day.  For if the child ever went anyways wrong, and
 you hadn't done your part by it, Master Marner--'noculation, and
 everything to save it from harm--it 'ud be a thorn i' your bed for ever
 o' this side the grave; and I can't think as it 'ud be easy lying down
 for anybody when they'd got to another world, if they hadn't done their
--**--**--
 him away from his weaving, and made him think all its pauses a holiday,
 reawakening his senses with her fresh life, even to the old
 winter-flies that came crawling forth in the early spring sunshine, and
 warming him into joy because _she_ had joy.
 
 And when the sunshine grew strong and lasting, so that the buttercups
 were thick in the meadows, Silas might be seen in the sunny midday, or
 in the late afternoon when the shadows were lengthening under the
 hedgerows, strolling out with uncovered head to carry Eppie beyond the
 Stone-pits to where the flowers grew, till they reached some favourite
 bank where he could sit down, while Eppie toddled to pluck the flowers,
 and make remarks to the winged things that murmured happily above the
 bright petals, calling "Dad-dad's" attention continually by bringing
 him the flowers. Then she would turn her ear to some sudden bird-note,
 and Silas learned to please her by making signs of hushed stillness,
 that they might listen for the note to come again: so that when it
 came, she set up her small back and laughed with gurgling triumph.
 Sitting on the banks in this way, Silas began to look for the once
 familiar herbs again; and as the leaves, with their unchanged outline
 and markings, lay on his palm, there was a sense of crowding
 remembrances from which he turned away timidly, taking refuge in
 Eppie's little world, that lay lightly on his enfeebled spirit.
 
 As the child's mind was growing into knowledge, his mind was growing
 into memory: as her life unfolded, his soul, long stupefied in a cold
 narrow prison, was unfolding too, and trembling gradually into full
 consciousness.
 
 It was an influence which must gather force with every new year: the
 tones that stirred Silas's heart grew articulate, and called for more
--**--**--
 had left his scissors on a ledge which Eppie's arm was long enough to
 reach; and now, like a small mouse, watching her opportunity, she stole
 quietly from her corner, secured the scissors, and toddled to the bed
 again, setting up her back as a mode of concealing the fact.  She had a
 distinct intention as to the use of the scissors; and having cut the
 linen strip in a jagged but effectual manner, in two moments she had
 run out at the open door where the sunshine was inviting her, while
 poor Silas believed her to be a better child than usual.  It was not
 until he happened to need his scissors that the terrible fact burst
 upon him: Eppie had run out by herself--had perhaps fallen into the
 Stone-pit.  Silas, shaken by the worst fear that could have befallen
 him, rushed out, calling "Eppie!"  and ran eagerly about the unenclosed
 space, exploring the dry cavities into which she might have fallen, and
 then gazing with questioning dread at the smooth red surface of the
 water.  The cold drops stood on his brow. How long had she been out?
 There was one hope--that she had crept through the stile and got into
 the fields, where he habitually took her to stroll.  But the grass was
 high in the meadow, and there was no descrying her, if she were there,
 except by a close search that would be a trespass on Mr. Osgood's crop.
 Still, that misdemeanour must be committed; and poor Silas, after
 peering all round the hedgerows, traversed the grass, beginning with
 perturbed vision to see Eppie behind every group of red sorrel, and to
 see her moving always farther off as he approached.  The meadow was
 searched in vain; and he got over the stile into the next field,
--**--**--
 place."
 
 The weaving must stand still a long while this morning, for now Eppie
 must be washed, and have clean clothes on; but it was to be hoped that
 this punishment would have a lasting effect, and save time in
 future--though, perhaps, it would have been better if Eppie had cried
 more.
 
 In half an hour she was clean again, and Silas having turned his back
 to see what he could do with the linen band, threw it down again, with
 the reflection that Eppie would be good without fastening for the rest
 of the morning.  He turned round again, and was going to place her in
 her little chair near the loom, when she peeped out at him with black
 face and hands again, and said, "Eppie in de toal-hole!"
 
 This total failure of the coal-hole discipline shook Silas's belief in
 the efficacy of punishment.  "She'd take it all for fun," he observed
 to Dolly, "if I didn't hurt her, and that I can't do, Mrs. Winthrop.
 If she makes me a bit o' trouble, I can bear it. And she's got no
 tricks but what she'll grow out of."
 
 "Well, that's partly true, Master Marner," said Dolly, sympathetically;
 "and if you can't bring your mind to frighten her off touching things,
 you must do what you can to keep 'em out of her way.  That's what I do
 wi' the pups as the lads are allays a-rearing.  They _will_ worry and
 gnaw--worry and gnaw they will, if it was one's Sunday cap as hung
 anywhere so as they could drag it.  They know no difference, God help
 'em: it's the pushing o' the teeth as sets 'em on, that's what it is."
 
 So Eppie was reared without punishment, the burden of her misdeeds
 being borne vicariously by father Silas.  The stone hut was made a soft
--**--**--
 parental looks and tones, to the red lady-birds and the round pebbles.
 
 Silas began now to think of Raveloe life entirely in relation to Eppie:
 she must have everything that was a good in Raveloe; and he listened
 docilely, that he might come to understand better what this life was,
 from which, for fifteen years, he had stood aloof as from a strange
 thing, with which he could have no communion: as some man who has a
 precious plant to which he would give a nurturing home in a new soil,
 thinks of the rain, and the sunshine, and all influences, in relation
 to his nursling, and asks industriously for all knowledge that will
 help him to satisfy the wants of the searching roots, or to guard leaf
 and bud from invading harm.  The disposition to hoard had been utterly
 crushed at the very first by the loss of his long-stored gold: the
 coins he earned afterwards seemed as irrelevant as stones brought to
 complete a house suddenly buried by an earthquake; the sense of
 bereavement was too heavy upon him for the old thrill of satisfaction
 to arise again at the touch of the newly-earned coin.  And now
 something had come to replace his hoard which gave a growing purpose to
 the earnings, drawing his hope and joy continually onward beyond the
 money.
 
 In old days there were angels who came and took men by the hand and led
 them away from the city of destruction.  We see no white-winged angels
 now.  But yet men are led away from threatening destruction: a hand is
 put into theirs, which leads them forth gently towards a calm and
 bright land, so that they look no more backward; and the hand may be a
 little child's.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV
 
 There was one person, as you will believe, who watched with keener
--**--**--
 man and the plainly dressed woman who are a little behind--Nancy having
 observed that they must wait for "father and Priscilla"--and now they
 all turn into a narrower path leading across the churchyard to a small
 gate opposite the Red House.  We will not follow them now; for may
 there not be some others in this departing congregation whom we should
 like to see again--some of those who are not likely to be handsomely
 clad, and whom we may not recognize so easily as the master and
 mistress of the Red House?
 
 But it is impossible to mistake Silas Marner.  His large brown eyes
 seem to have gathered a longer vision, as is the way with eyes that
 have been short-sighted in early life, and they have a less vague, a
 more answering gaze; but in everything else one sees signs of a frame
 much enfeebled by the lapse of the sixteen years.  The weaver's bent
 shoulders and white hair give him almost the look of advanced age,
 though he is not more than five-and-fifty; but there is the freshest
 blossom of youth close by his side--a blonde dimpled girl of eighteen,
 who has vainly tried to chastise her curly auburn hair into smoothness
 under her brown bonnet: the hair ripples as obstinately as a brooklet
 under the March breeze, and the little ringlets burst away from the
 restraining comb behind and show themselves below the bonnet-crown.
 Eppie cannot help being rather vexed about her hair, for there is no
 other girl in Raveloe who has hair at all like it, and she thinks hair
 ought to be smooth.  She does not like to be blameworthy even in small
 things: you see how neatly her prayer-book is folded in her spotted
 handkerchief.
 
 That good-looking young fellow, in a new fustian suit, who walks behind
--**--**--
 we're talking about.  And I'll have a bit o' rosemary, and bergamot,
 and thyme, because they're so sweet-smelling; but there's no lavender
 only in the gentlefolks' gardens, I think."
 
 "That's no reason why you shouldn't have some," said Aaron, "for I can
 bring you slips of anything; I'm forced to cut no end of 'em when I'm
 gardening, and throw 'em away mostly.  There's a big bed o' lavender at
 the Red House: the missis is very fond of it."
 
 "Well," said Silas, gravely, "so as you don't make free for us, or ask
 for anything as is worth much at the Red House: for Mr. Cass's been so
 good to us, and built us up the new end o' the cottage, and given us
 beds and things, as I couldn't abide to be imposin' for garden-stuff or
 anything else."
 
 "No, no, there's no imposin'," said Aaron; "there's never a garden in
 all the parish but what there's endless waste in it for want o'
 somebody as could use everything up.  It's what I think to myself
 sometimes, as there need nobody run short o' victuals if the land was
 made the most on, and there was never a morsel but what could find its
 way to a mouth.  It sets one thinking o' that--gardening does.  But I
 must go back now, else mother 'ull be in trouble as I aren't there."
 
 "Bring her with you this afternoon, Aaron," said Eppie; "I shouldn't
 like to fix about the garden, and her not know everything from the
 first--should _you_, father?"
 
 "Aye, bring her if you can, Aaron," said Silas; "she's sure to have a
 word to say as'll help us to set things on their right end."
 
 Aaron turned back up the village, while Silas and Eppie went on up the
--**--**--
 in the living-room, and the small space was well filled with decent
 furniture, all bright and clean enough to satisfy Dolly Winthrop's eye.
 The oaken table and three-cornered oaken chair were hardly what was
 likely to be seen in so poor a cottage: they had come, with the beds
 and other things, from the Red House; for Mr. Godfrey Cass, as every
 one said in the village, did very kindly by the weaver; and it was
 nothing but right a man should be looked on and helped by those who
 could afford it, when he had brought up an orphan child, and been
 father and mother to her--and had lost his money too, so as he had
 nothing but what he worked for week by week, and when the weaving was
 going down too--for there was less and less flax spun--and Master
 Marner was none so young.  Nobody was jealous of the weaver, for he was
 regarded as an exceptional person, whose claims on neighbourly help
 were not to be matched in Raveloe.  Any superstition that remained
 concerning him had taken an entirely new colour; and Mr. Macey, now a
 very feeble old man of fourscore and six, never seen except in his
 chimney-corner or sitting in the sunshine at his door-sill, was of
 opinion that when a man had done what Silas had done by an orphan
 child, it was a sign that his money would come to light again, or
 leastwise that the robber would be made to answer for it--for, as Mr.
 Macey observed of himself, his faculties were as strong as ever.
 
 Silas sat down now and watched Eppie with a satisfied gaze as she
 spread the clean cloth, and set on it the potato-pie, warmed up slowly
 in a safe Sunday fashion, by being put into a dry pot over a
--**--**--
 arrived at the climax of the sad story--the drawing of lots, and its
 false testimony concerning him; and this had to be repeated in several
 interviews, under new questions on her part as to the nature of this
 plan for detecting the guilty and clearing the innocent.
 
 "And yourn's the same Bible, you're sure o' that, Master Marner--the
 Bible as you brought wi' you from that country--it's the same as what
 they've got at church, and what Eppie's a-learning to read in?"
 
 "Yes," said Silas, "every bit the same; and there's drawing o' lots in
 the Bible, mind you," he added in a lower tone.
 
 "Oh, dear, dear," said Dolly in a grieved voice, as if she were hearing
 an unfavourable report of a sick man's case.  She was silent for some
 minutes; at last she said--
 
 "There's wise folks, happen, as know how it all is; the parson knows,
 I'll be bound; but it takes big words to tell them things, and such as
 poor folks can't make much out on.  I can never rightly know the
 meaning o' what I hear at church, only a bit here and there, but I know
 it's good words--I do.  But what lies upo' your mind--it's this, Master
 Marner: as, if Them above had done the right thing by you, They'd never
 ha' let you be turned out for a wicked thief when you was innicent."
 
 "Ah!"  said Silas, who had now come to understand Dolly's phraseology,
 "that was what fell on me like as if it had been red-hot iron; because,
 you see, there was nobody as cared for me or clave to me above nor
 below.  And him as I'd gone out and in wi' for ten year and more, since
 when we was lads and went halves--mine own familiar friend in whom I
--**--**--
 full-growed, and left the helpless children; and there's the breaking
 o' limbs; and them as 'ud do right and be sober have to suffer by them
 as are contrairy--eh, there's trouble i' this world, and there's things
 as we can niver make out the rights on. And all as we've got to do is
 to trusten, Master Marner--to do the right thing as fur as we know, and
 to trusten.  For if us as knows so little can see a bit o' good and
 rights, we may be sure as there's a good and a rights bigger nor what
 we can know--I feel it i' my own inside as it must be so.  And if you
 could but ha' gone on trustening, Master Marner, you wouldn't ha' run
 away from your fellow-creaturs and been so lone."
 
 "Ah, but that 'ud ha' been hard," said Silas, in an under-tone; "it 'ud
 ha' been hard to trusten then."
 
 "And so it would," said Dolly, almost with compunction; "them things
 are easier said nor done; and I'm partly ashamed o' talking."
 
 "Nay, nay," said Silas, "you're i' the right, Mrs. Winthrop--you're i'
 the right.  There's good i' this world--I've a feeling o' that now; and
 it makes a man feel as there's a good more nor he can see, i' spite o'
 the trouble and the wickedness.  That drawing o' the lots is dark; but
 the child was sent to me: there's dealings with us--there's dealings."
 
 This dialogue took place in Eppie's earlier years, when Silas had to
 part with her for two hours every day, that she might learn to read at
 the dame school, after he had vainly tried himself to guide her in that
 first step to learning.  Now that she was grown up, Silas had often
 been led, in those moments of quiet outpouring which come to people who
--**--**--
 and again asked Silas to tell her how her mother looked, whom she was
 like, and how he had found her against the furze bush, led towards it
 by the little footsteps and the outstretched arms.  The furze bush was
 there still; and this afternoon, when Eppie came out with Silas into
 the sunshine, it was the first object that arrested her eyes and
 thoughts.
 
 "Father," she said, in a tone of gentle gravity, which sometimes came
 like a sadder, slower cadence across her playfulness, "we shall take
 the furze bush into the garden; it'll come into the corner, and just
 against it I'll put snowdrops and crocuses, 'cause Aaron says they
 won't die out, but'll always get more and more."
 
 "Ah, child," said Silas, always ready to talk when he had his pipe in
 his hand, apparently enjoying the pauses more than the puffs, "it
 wouldn't do to leave out the furze bush; and there's nothing prettier,
 to my thinking, when it's yallow with flowers.  But it's just come into
 my head what we're to do for a fence--mayhap Aaron can help us to a
 thought; but a fence we must have, else the donkeys and things 'ull
 come and trample everything down.  And fencing's hard to be got at, by
 what I can make out."
 
 "Oh, I'll tell you, daddy," said Eppie, clasping her hands suddenly,
 after a minute's thought.  "There's lots o' loose stones about, some of
 'em not big, and we might lay 'em atop of one another, and make a wall.
 You and me could carry the smallest, and Aaron 'ud carry the rest--I
 know he would."
 
 "Eh, my precious un," said Silas, "there isn't enough stones to go all
 round; and as for you carrying, why, wi' your little arms you couldn't
 carry a stone no bigger than a turnip.  You're dillicate made, my
--**--**--
 difference.  I shall get older and helplesser, and be a burden on you,
 belike, if I don't go away from you altogether.  Not as I mean you'd
 think me a burden--I know you wouldn't--but it 'ud be hard upon you;
 and when I look for'ard to that, I like to think as you'd have somebody
 else besides me--somebody young and strong, as'll outlast your own
 life, and take care on you to the end."  Silas paused, and, resting his
 wrists on his knees, lifted his hands up and down meditatively as he
 looked on the ground.
 
 "Then, would you like me to be married, father?"  said Eppie, with a
 little trembling in her voice.
 
 "I'll not be the man to say no, Eppie," said Silas, emphatically; "but
 we'll ask your godmother.  She'll wish the right thing by you and her
 son too."
 
 "There they come, then," said Eppie.  "Let us go and meet 'em. Oh, the
 pipe!  won't you have it lit again, father?"  said Eppie, lifting that
 medicinal appliance from the ground.
 
 "Nay, child," said Silas, "I've done enough for to-day.  I think,
 mayhap, a little of it does me more good than so much at once."
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII
 
 While Silas and Eppie were seated on the bank discoursing in the
 fleckered shade of the ash tree, Miss Priscilla Lammeter was resisting
 her sister's arguments, that it would be better to take tea at the Red
 House, and let her father have a long nap, than drive home to the
 Warrens so soon after dinner.  The family party (of four only) were
 seated round the table in the dark wainscoted parlour, with the Sunday
 dessert before them, of fresh filberts, apples, and pears, duly
 ornamented with leaves by Nancy's own hand before the bells had rung
 for church.
--**--**--
 the best of husbands."
 
 "Oh, I know," said Priscilla, smiling sarcastically, "I know the way o'
 wives; they set one on to abuse their husbands, and then they turn
 round on one and praise 'em as if they wanted to sell 'em.  But
 father'll be waiting for me; we must turn now."
 
 The large gig with the steady old grey was at the front door, and Mr.
 Lammeter was already on the stone steps, passing the time in recalling
 to Godfrey what very fine points Speckle had when his master used to
 ride him.
 
 "I always _would_ have a good horse, you know," said the old gentleman,
 not liking that spirited time to be quite effaced from the memory of
 his juniors.
 
 "Mind you bring Nancy to the Warrens before the week's out, Mr. Cass,"
 was Priscilla's parting injunction, as she took the reins, and shook
 them gently, by way of friendly incitement to Speckle.
 
 "I shall just take a turn to the fields against the Stone-pits, Nancy,
 and look at the draining," said Godfrey.
 
 "You'll be in again by tea-time, dear?"
 
 "Oh, yes, I shall be back in an hour."
 
 It was Godfrey's custom on a Sunday afternoon to do a little
 contemplative farming in a leisurely walk.  Nancy seldom accompanied
 him; for the women of her generation--unless, like Priscilla, they took
 to outdoor management--were not given to much walking beyond their own
 house and garden, finding sufficient exercise in domestic duties.  So,
 when Priscilla was not with her, she usually sat with Mant's Bible
 before her, and after following the text with her eyes for a little
 while, she would gradually permit them to wander as her thoughts had
 already insisted on wandering.
 
 But Nancy's Sunday thoughts were rarely quite out of keeping with the
 devout and reverential intention implied by the book spread open before
--**--**--
 blame.  The vindication of the loved object is the best balm affection
 can find for its wounds:--"A man must have so much on his mind," is the
 belief by which a wife often supports a cheerful face under rough
 answers and unfeeling words.  And Nancy's deepest wounds had all come
 from the perception that the absence of children from their hearth was
 dwelt on in her husband's mind as a privation to which he could not
 reconcile himself.
 
 Yet sweet Nancy might have been expected to feel still more keenly the
 denial of a blessing to which she had looked forward with all the
 varied expectations and preparations, solemn and prettily trivial,
 which fill the mind of a loving woman when she expects to become a
 mother.  Was there not a drawer filled with the neat work of her hands,
 all unworn and untouched, just as she had arranged it there fourteen
 years ago--just, but for one little dress, which had been made the
 burial-dress?  But under this immediate personal trial Nancy was so
 firmly unmurmuring, that years ago she had suddenly renounced the habit
 of visiting this drawer, lest she should in this way be cherishing a
 longing for what was not given.
 
 Perhaps it was this very severity towards any indulgence of what she
 held to be sinful regret in herself, that made her shrink from applying
 her own standard to her husband.  "It is very different--it is much
 worse for a man to be disappointed in that way: a woman can always be
 satisfied with devoting herself to her husband, but a man wants
 something that will make him look forward more--and sitting by the fire
 is so much duller to him than to a woman."  And always, when Nancy
 reached this point in her meditations--trying, with predetermined
--**--**--
 it was clear that, for some high reason, they were better without.
 When you saw a thing was not meant to be, said Nancy, it was a bounden
 duty to leave off so much as wishing for it.  And so far, perhaps, the
 wisest of men could scarcely make more than a verbal improvement in her
 principle.  But the conditions under which she held it apparent that a
 thing was not meant to be, depended on a more peculiar mode of
 thinking.  She would have given up making a purchase at a particular
 place if, on three successive times, rain, or some other cause of
 Heaven's sending, had formed an obstacle; and she would have
 anticipated a broken limb or other heavy misfortune to any one who
 persisted in spite of such indications.
 
 "But why should you think the child would turn out ill?"  said Godfrey,
 in his remonstrances.  "She has thriven as well as child can do with
 the weaver; and _he_ adopted her.  There isn't such a pretty little
 girl anywhere else in the parish, or one fitter for the station we
 could give her.  Where can be the likelihood of her being a curse to
 anybody?"
 
 "Yes, my dear Godfrey," said Nancy, who was sitting with her hands
 tightly clasped together, and with yearning, regretful affection in her
 eyes.  "The child may not turn out ill with the weaver.  But, then, he
 didn't go to seek her, as we should be doing.  It will be wrong: I feel
 sure it will.  Don't you remember what that lady we met at the Royston
 Baths told us about the child her sister adopted? That was the only
 adopting I ever heard of: and the child was transported when it was
 twenty-three.  Dear Godfrey, don't ask me to do what I know is wrong: I
--**--**--
 him as a husband was not founded entirely on a wilful illusion.
 
 "I was right," she said to herself, when she had recalled all their
 scenes of discussion--"I feel I was right to say him nay, though it
 hurt me more than anything; but how good Godfrey has been about it!
 Many men would have been very angry with me for standing out against
 their wishes; and they might have thrown out that they'd had ill-luck
 in marrying me; but Godfrey has never been the man to say me an unkind
 word.  It's only what he can't hide: everything seems so blank to him,
 I know; and the land--what a difference it 'ud make to him, when he
 goes to see after things, if he'd children growing up that he was doing
 it all for!  But I won't murmur; and perhaps if he'd married a woman
 who'd have had children, she'd have vexed him in other ways."
 
 This possibility was Nancy's chief comfort; and to give it greater
 strength, she laboured to make it impossible that any other wife should
 have had more perfect tenderness.  She had been _forced_ to vex him by
 that one denial.  Godfrey was not insensible to her loving effort, and
 did Nancy no injustice as to the motives of her obstinacy.  It was
 impossible to have lived with her fifteen years and not be aware that
 an unselfish clinging to the right, and a sincerity clear as the
 flower-born dew, were her main characteristics; indeed, Godfrey felt
 this so strongly, that his own more wavering nature, too averse to
 facing difficulty to be unvaryingly simple and truthful, was kept in a
 certain awe of this gentle wife who watched his looks with a yearning
 to obey them.  It seemed to him impossible that he should ever confess
--**--**--
 father do without Priscilla?  And if I die, Godfrey will be very
 lonely--not holding together with his brothers much.  But I won't be
 over-anxious, and trying to make things out beforehand: I must do my
 best for the present."
 
 With that last thought Nancy roused herself from her reverie, and
 turned her eyes again towards the forsaken page.  It had been forsaken
 longer than she imagined, for she was presently surprised by the
 appearance of the servant with the tea-things.  It was, in fact, a
 little before the usual time for tea; but Jane had her reasons.
 
 "Is your master come into the yard, Jane?"
 
 "No 'm, he isn't," said Jane, with a slight emphasis, of which,
 however, her mistress took no notice.
 
 "I don't know whether you've seen 'em, 'm," continued Jane, after a
 pause, "but there's folks making haste all one way, afore the front
 window.  I doubt something's happened.  There's niver a man to be seen
 i' the yard, else I'd send and see.  I've been up into the top attic,
 but there's no seeing anything for trees.  I hope nobody's hurt, that's
 all."
 
 "Oh, no, I daresay there's nothing much the matter," said Nancy. "It's
 perhaps Mr. Snell's bull got out again, as he did before."
 
 "I wish he mayn't gore anybody then, that's all," said Jane, not
 altogether despising a hypothesis which covered a few imaginary
 calamities.
 
 "That girl is always terrifying me," thought Nancy; "I wish Godfrey
 would come in."
 
 She went to the front window and looked as far as she could see along
 the road, with an uneasiness which she felt to be childish, for there
 were now no such signs of excitement as Jane had spoken of, and Godfrey
 would not be likely to return by the village road, but by the fields.
--**--**--
 it; you must know."
 
 He was silent, looking on the ground for two long minutes.  Nancy would
 have said some words of comfort under this disgrace, but she refrained,
 from an instinctive sense that there was something behind--that Godfrey
 had something else to tell her.  Presently he lifted his eyes to her
 face, and kept them fixed on her, as he said--
 
 "Everything comes to light, Nancy, sooner or later.  When God Almighty
 wills it, our secrets are found out.  I've lived with a secret on my
 mind, but I'll keep it from you no longer.  I wouldn't have you know it
 by somebody else, and not by me--I wouldn't have you find it out after
 I'm dead.  I'll tell you now.  It's been "I will" and "I won't" with me
 all my life--I'll make sure of myself now."
 
 Nancy's utmost dread had returned.  The eyes of the husband and wife
 met with awe in them, as at a crisis which suspended affection.
 
 "Nancy," said Godfrey, slowly, "when I married you, I hid something
 from you--something I ought to have told you.  That woman Marner found
 dead in the snow--Eppie's mother--that wretched woman--was my wife:
 Eppie is my child."
 
 He paused, dreading the effect of his confession.  But Nancy sat quite
 still, only that her eyes dropped and ceased to meet his.  She was pale
 and quiet as a meditative statue, clasping her hands on her lap.
 
 "You'll never think the same of me again," said Godfrey, after a little
 while, with some tremor in his voice.
 
 She was silent.
 
 "I oughtn't to have left the child unowned: I oughtn't to have kept it
 from you.  But I couldn't bear to give you up, Nancy.  I was led away
 into marrying her--I suffered for it."
 
 Still Nancy was silent, looking down; and he almost expected that she
--**--**--
 lamp is burning low, the horrible contraction will begin at my chest.  I
 shall only have time to reach the bell, and pull it violently, before the
 sense of suffocation will come.  No one will answer my bell.  I know why.
 My two servants are lovers, and will have quarrelled.  My housekeeper
 will have rushed out of the house in a fury, two hours before, hoping
 that Perry will believe she has gone to drown herself.  Perry is alarmed
 at last, and is gone out after her.  The little scullery-maid is asleep
 on a bench: she never answers the bell; it does not wake her.  The sense
 of suffocation increases: my lamp goes out with a horrible stench: I make
 a great effort, and snatch at the bell again.  I long for life, and there
 is no help.  I thirsted for the unknown: the thirst is gone.  O God, let
 me stay with the known, and be weary of it: I am content.  Agony of pain
 and suffocation--and all the while the earth, the fields, the pebbly
 brook at the bottom of the rookery, the fresh scent after the rain, the
 light of the morning through my chamber-window, the warmth of the hearth
 after the frosty air--will darkness close over them for ever?
 
 Darkness--darkness--no pain--nothing but darkness: but I am passing on
 and on through the darkness: my thought stays in the darkness, but always
 with a sense of moving onward . . .
 
 Before that time comes, I wish to use my last hours of ease and strength
 in telling the strange story of my experience.  I have never fully
 unbosomed myself to any human being; I have never been encouraged to
 trust much in the sympathy of my fellow-men.  But we have all a chance of
 meeting with some pity, some tenderness, some charity, when we are dead:
--**--**--
 My childhood perhaps seems happier to me than it really was, by contrast
 with all the after-years.  For then the curtain of the future was as
 impenetrable to me as to other children: I had all their delight in the
 present hour, their sweet indefinite hopes for the morrow; and I had a
 tender mother: even now, after the dreary lapse of long years, a slight
 trace of sensation accompanies the remembrance of her caress as she held
 me on her knee--her arms round my little body, her cheek pressed on mine.
 I had a complaint of the eyes that made me blind for a little while, and
 she kept me on her knee from morning till night.  That unequalled love
 soon vanished out of my life, and even to my childish consciousness it
 was as if that life had become more chill I rode my little white pony
 with the groom by my side as before, but there were no loving eyes
 looking at me as I mounted, no glad arms opened to me when I came back.
 Perhaps I missed my mother's love more than most children of seven or
 eight would have done, to whom the other pleasures of life remained as
 before; for I was certainly a very sensitive child.  I remember still the
 mingled trepidation and delicious excitement with which I was affected by
 the tramping of the horses on the pavement in the echoing stables, by the
 loud resonance of the groom's voices, by the booming bark of the dogs as
 my father's carriage thundered under the archway of the courtyard, by the
 din of the gong as it gave notice of luncheon and dinner.  The measured
 tramp of soldiery which I sometimes heard--for my father's house lay near
 a county town where there were large barracks--made me sob and tremble;
--**--**--
 Moreover, it was clear that a shy, sensitive boy like me was not fit to
 encounter the rough experience of a public school.  Mr. Letherall had
 said so very decidedly.  Mr. Letherall was a large man in spectacles, who
 one day took my small head between his large hands, and pressed it here
 and there in an exploratory, auspicious manner--then placed each of his
 great thumbs on my temples, and pushed me a little way from him, and
 stared at me with glittering spectacles.  The contemplation appeared to
 displease him, for he frowned sternly, and said to my father, drawing his
 thumbs across my eyebrows--
 
 "The deficiency is there, sir--there; and here," he added, touching the
 upper sides of my head, "here is the excess.  That must be brought out,
 sir, and this must be laid to sleep."
 
 I was in a state of tremor, partly at the vague idea that I was the
 object of reprobation, partly in the agitation of my first hatred--hatred
 of this big, spectacled man, who pulled my head about as if he wanted to
 buy and cheapen it.
 
 I am not aware how much Mr. Letherall had to do with the system
 afterwards adopted towards me, but it was presently clear that private
 tutors, natural history, science, and the modern languages, were the
 appliances by which the defects of my organization were to be remedied.  I
 was very stupid about machines, so I was to be greatly occupied with
 them; I had no memory for classification, so it was particularly
 necessary that I should study systematic zoology and botany; I was hungry
 for human deeds and humane motions, so I was to be plentifully crammed
 with the mechanical powers, the elementary bodies, and the phenomena of
 electricity and magnetism.  A better-constituted boy would certainly have
--**--**--
 not so happy as that.  A poet pours forth his song and _believes_ in the
 listening ear and answering soul, to which his song will be floated
 sooner or later.  But the poet's sensibility without his voice--the
 poet's sensibility that finds no vent but in silent tears on the sunny
 bank, when the noonday light sparkles on the water, or in an inward
 shudder at the sound of harsh human tones, the sight of a cold human
 eye--this dumb passion brings with it a fatal solitude of soul in the
 society of one's fellow-men.  My least solitary moments were those in
 which I pushed off in my boat, at evening, towards the centre of the
 lake; it seemed to me that the sky, and the glowing mountain-tops, and
 the wide blue water, surrounded me with a cherishing love such as no
 human face had shed on me since my mother's love had vanished out of my
 life.  I used to do as Jean Jacques did--lie down in my boat and let it
 glide where it would, while I looked up at the departing glow leaving one
 mountain-top after the other, as if the prophet's chariot of fire were
 passing over them on its way to the home of light.  Then, when the white
 summits were all sad and corpse-like, I had to push homeward, for I was
 under careful surveillance, and was allowed no late wanderings.  This
 disposition of mine was not favourable to the formation of intimate
 friendships among the numerous youths of my own age who are always to be
 found studying at Geneva.  Yet I made _one_ such friendship; and,
 singularly enough, it was with a youth whose intellectual tendencies were
 the very reverse of my own.  I shall call him Charles Meunier; his real
 surname--an English one, for he was of English extraction--having since
--**--**--
 the languid monotony of convalescence, the days gradually breaking into
 variety and distinctness as my strength enabled me to take longer and
 longer drives.  On one of these more vividly remembered days, my father
 said to me, as he sat beside my sofa--
 
 "When you are quite well enough to travel, Latimer, I shall take you home
 with me.  The journey will amuse you and do you good, for I shall go
 through the Tyrol and Austria, and you will see many new places.  Our
 neighbours, the Filmores, are come; Alfred will join us at Basle, and we
 shall all go together to Vienna, and back by Prague" . . .
 
 My father was called away before he had finished his sentence, and he
 left my mind resting on the word _Prague_, with a strange sense that a
 new and wondrous scene was breaking upon me: a city under the broad
 sunshine, that seemed to me as if it were the summer sunshine of a long-
 past century arrested in its course--unrefreshed for ages by dews of
 night, or the rushing rain-cloud; scorching the dusty, weary, time-eaten
 grandeur of a people doomed to live on in the stale repetition of
 memories, like deposed and superannuated kings in their regal
 gold-inwoven tatters.  The city looked so thirsty that the broad river
 seemed to me a sheet of metal; and the blackened statues, as I passed
 under their blank gaze, along the unending bridge, with their ancient
 garments and their saintly crowns, seemed to me the real inhabitants and
 owners of this place, while the busy, trivial men and women, hurrying to
 and fro, were a swarm of ephemeral visitants infesting it for a day.  It
 is such grim, stony beings as these, I thought, who are the fathers of
 ancient faded children, in those tanned time-fretted dwellings that crowd
--**--**--
 the new images in a dissolving view, or the growing distinctness of the
 landscape as the sun lifts up the veil of the morning mist.  And while I
 was conscious of this incipient vision, I was also conscious that Pierre
 came to tell my father Mr. Filmore was waiting for him, and that my
 father hurried out of the room.  No, it was not a dream; was it--the
 thought was full of tremulous exultation--was it the poet's nature in me,
 hitherto only a troubled yearning sensibility, now manifesting itself
 suddenly as spontaneous creation?  Surely it was in this way that Homer
 saw the plain of Troy, that Dante saw the abodes of the departed, that
 Milton saw the earthward flight of the Tempter.  Was it that my illness
 had wrought some happy change in my organization--given a firmer tension
 to my nerves--carried off some dull obstruction?  I had often read of
 such effects--in works of fiction at least.  Nay; in genuine biographies
 I had read of the subtilizing or exalting influence of some diseases on
 the mental powers.  Did not Novalis feel his inspiration intensified
 under the progress of consumption?
 
 When my mind had dwelt for some time on this blissful idea, it seemed to
 me that I might perhaps test it by an exertion of my will.  The vision
 had begun when my father was speaking of our going to Prague.  I did not
 for a moment believe it was really a representation of that city; I
 believed--I hoped it was a picture that my newly liberated genius had
 painted in fiery haste, with the colours snatched from lazy memory.
 Suppose I were to fix my mind on some other place--Venice, for example,
 which was far more familiar to my imagination than Prague: perhaps the
 same sort of result would follow.  I concentrated my thoughts on Venice;
--**--**--
 
 Unable to sit still and reserve my strength, I walked up and down the
 room, looking out on the current of the Rhone, just where it leaves the
 dark-blue lake; but thinking all the while of the possible causes that
 could detain my father.
 
 Suddenly I was conscious that my father was in the room, but not alone:
 there were two persons with him.  Strange!  I had heard no footstep, I
 had not seen the door open; but I saw my father, and at his right hand
 our neighbour Mrs. Filmore, whom I remembered very well, though I had not
 seen her for five years.  She was a commonplace middle-aged woman, in
 silk and cashmere; but the lady on the left of my father was not more
 than twenty, a tall, slim, willowy figure, with luxuriant blond hair,
 arranged in cunning braids and folds that looked almost too massive for
 the slight figure and the small-featured, thin-lipped face they crowned.
 But the face had not a girlish expression: the features were sharp, the
 pale grey eyes at once acute, restless, and sarcastic.  They were fixed
 on me in half-smiling curiosity, and I felt a painful sensation as if a
 sharp wind were cutting me.  The pale-green dress, and the green leaves
 that seemed to form a border about her pale blond hair, made me think of
 a Water-Nixie--for my mind was full of German lyrics, and this pale,
 fatal-eyed woman, with the green weeds, looked like a birth from some
 cold sedgy stream, the daughter of an aged river.
 
 "Well, Latimer, you thought me long," my father said . . .
 
 But while the last word was in my ears, the whole group vanished, and
 there was nothing between me and the Chinese printed folding-screen that
 stood before the door.  I was cold and trembling; I could only totter
--**--**--
 nature is not adjusted to simple human conditions.
 
 Still enjoying the scent, I returned to the salon, but it was not
 unoccupied, as it had been before I left it.  In front of the Chinese
 folding-screen there was my father, with Mrs. Filmore on his right hand,
 and on his left--the slim, blond-haired girl, with the keen face and the
 keen eyes fixed on me in half-smiling curiosity.
 
 "Well, Latimer, you thought me long," my father said . . .
 
 I heard no more, felt no more, till I became conscious that I was lying
 with my head low on the sofa, Pierre, and my father by my side.  As soon
 as I was thoroughly revived, my father left the room, and presently
 returned, saying--
 
 "I've been to tell the ladies how you are, Latimer.  They were waiting in
 the next room.  We shall put off our shopping expedition to-day."
 
 Presently he said, "That young lady is Bertha Grant, Mrs. Filmore's
 orphan niece.  Filmore has adopted her, and she lives with them, so you
 will have her for a neighbour when we go home--perhaps for a near
 relation; for there is a tenderness between her and Alfred, I suspect,
 and I should be gratified by the match, since Filmore means to provide
 for her in every way as if she were his daughter.  It had not occurred to
 me that you knew nothing about her living with the Filmores."
 
 He made no further allusion to the fact of my having fainted at the
 moment of seeing her, and I would not for the world have told him the
 reason: I shrank from the idea of disclosing to any one what might be
 regarded as a pitiable peculiarity, most of all from betraying it to my
 father, who would have suspected my sanity ever after.
--**--**--
 asunder by a microscopic vision, that showed all the intermediate
 frivolities, all the suppressed egoism, all the struggling chaos of
 puerilities, meanness, vague capricious memories, and indolent make-shift
 thoughts, from which human words and deeds emerge like leaflets covering
 a fermenting heap.
 
 At Basle we were joined by my brother Alfred, now a handsome,
 self-confident man of six-and-twenty--a thorough contrast to my fragile,
 nervous, ineffectual self.  I believe I was held to have a sort of half-
 womanish, half-ghostly beauty; for the portrait-painters, who are thick
 as weeds at Geneva, had often asked me to sit to them, and I had been the
 model of a dying minstrel in a fancy picture.  But I thoroughly disliked
 my own physique and nothing but the belief that it was a condition of
 poetic genius would have reconciled me to it.  That brief hope was quite
 fled, and I saw in my face now nothing but the stamp of a morbid
 organization, framed for passive suffering--too feeble for the sublime
 resistance of poetic production.  Alfred, from whom I had been almost
 constantly separated, and who, in his present stage of character and
 appearance, came before me as a perfect stranger, was bent on being
 extremely friendly and brother-like to me.  He had the superficial
 kindness of a good-humoured, self-satisfied nature, that fears no
 rivalry, and has encountered no contrarieties.  I am not sure that my
 disposition was good enough for me to have been quite free from envy
 towards him, even if our desires had not clashed, and if I had been in
 the healthy human condition which admits of generous confidence and
 charitable construction.  There must always have been an antipathy
 between our natures.  As it was, he became in a few weeks an object of
 intense hatred to me; and when he entered the room, still more when he
--**--**--
 admiration, for she was the very opposite, even to the colour of her
 hair, of the ideal woman who still remained to me the type of loveliness;
 and she was without that enthusiasm for the great and good, which, even
 at the moment of her strongest dominion over me, I should have declared
 to be the highest element of character.  But there is no tyranny more
 complete than that which a self-centred negative nature exercises over a
 morbidly sensitive nature perpetually craving sympathy and support.  The
 most independent people feel the effect of a man's silence in heightening
 their value for his opinion--feel an additional triumph in conquering the
 reverence of a critic habitually captious and satirical: no wonder, then,
 that an enthusiastic self-distrusting youth should watch and wait before
 the closed secret of a sarcastic woman's face, as if it were the shrine
 of the doubtfully benignant deity who ruled his destiny.  For a young
 enthusiast is unable to imagine the total negation in another mind of the
 emotions which are stirring his own: they may be feeble, latent,
 inactive, he thinks, but they are there--they may be called forth;
 sometimes, in moments of happy hallucination, he believes they may be
 there in all the greater strength because he sees no outward sign of
 them.  And this effect, as I have intimated, was heightened to its utmost
 intensity in me, because Bertha was the only being who remained for me in
 the mysterious seclusion of soul that renders such youthful delusion
 possible.  Doubtless there was another sort of fascination at work--that
 subtle physical attraction which delights in cheating our psychological
 predictions, and in compelling the men who paint sylphs, to fall in love
 with some _bonne et brave femme_, heavy-heeled and freckled.
 
 Bertha's behaviour towards me was such as to encourage all my illusions,
--**--**--
 slight actions, to stimulate my foolish timid hope that she really
 preferred me.  And why should she not follow her inclination?  I was not
 in so advantageous a position as my brother, but I had fortune, I was not
 a year younger than she was, and she was an heiress, who would soon be of
 age to decide for herself.
 
 The fluctuations of hope and fear, confined to this one channel, made
 each day in her presence a delicious torment.  There was one deliberate
 act of hers which especially helped to intoxicate me.  When we were at
 Vienna her twentieth birthday occurred, and as she was very fond of
 ornaments, we all took the opportunity of the splendid jewellers' shops
 in that Teutonic Paris to purchase her a birthday present of jewellery.
 Mine, naturally, was the least expensive; it was an opal ring--the opal
 was my favourite stone, because it seems to blush and turn pale as if it
 had a soul.  I told Bertha so when I gave it her, and said that it was an
 emblem of the poetic nature, changing with the changing light of heaven
 and of woman's eyes.  In the evening she appeared elegantly dressed, and
 wearing conspicuously all the birthday presents except mine.  I looked
 eagerly at her fingers, but saw no opal.  I had no opportunity of
 noticing this to her during the evening; but the next day, when I found
 her seated near the window alone, after breakfast, I said, "You scorn to
 wear my poor opal.  I should have remembered that you despised poetic
 natures, and should have given you coral, or turquoise, or some other
 opaque unresponsive stone."  "Do I despise it?" she answered, taking hold
 of a delicate gold chain which she always wore round her neck and drawing
--**--**--
 desert of knowledge.  I had never allowed my diseased condition to betray
 itself, or to drive me into any unusual speech or action, except once,
 when, in a moment of peculiar bitterness against my brother, I had
 forestalled some words which I knew he was going to utter--a clever
 observation, which he had prepared beforehand.  He had occasionally a
 slightly affected hesitation in his speech, and when he paused an instant
 after the second word, my impatience and jealousy impelled me to continue
 the speech for him, as if it were something we had both learned by rote.
 He coloured and looked astonished, as well as annoyed; and the words had
 no sooner escaped my lips than I felt a shock of alarm lest such an
 anticipation of words--very far from being words of course, easy to
 divine--should have betrayed me as an exceptional being, a sort of quiet
 energumen, whom every one, Bertha above all, would shudder at and avoid.
 But I magnified, as usual, the impression any word or deed of mine could
 produce on others; for no one gave any sign of having noticed my
 interruption as more than a rudeness, to be forgiven me on the score of
 my feeble nervous condition.
 
 While this superadded consciousness of the actual was almost constant
 with me, I had never had a recurrence of that distinct prevision which I
 have described in relation to my first interview with Bertha; and I was
 waiting with eager curiosity to know whether or not my vision of Prague
 would prove to have been an instance of the same kind.  A few days after
 the incident of the opal ring, we were paying one of our frequent visits
 to the Lichtenberg Palace.  I could never look at many pictures in
 succession; for pictures, when they are at all powerful, affect me so
--**--**--
 hopeless misery was pressing on my soul; the light became stronger, for
 Bertha was entering with a candle in her hand--Bertha, my wife--with
 cruel eyes, with green jewels and green leaves on her white ball-dress;
 every hateful thought within her present to me . . . "Madman, idiot! why
 don't you kill yourself, then?"  It was a moment of hell.  I saw into her
 pitiless soul--saw its barren worldliness, its scorching hate--and felt
 it clothe me round like an air I was obliged to breathe.  She came with
 her candle and stood over me with a bitter smile of contempt; I saw the
 great emerald brooch on her bosom, a studded serpent with diamond eyes.  I
 shuddered--I despised this woman with the barren soul and mean thoughts;
 but I felt helpless before her, as if she clutched my bleeding heart, and
 would clutch it till the last drop of life-blood ebbed away.  She was my
 wife, and we hated each other.  Gradually the hearth, the dim library,
 the candle-light disappeared--seemed to melt away into a background of
 light, the green serpent with the diamond eyes remaining a dark image on
 the retina.  Then I had a sense of my eyelids quivering, and the living
 daylight broke in upon me; I saw gardens, and heard voices; I was seated
 on the steps of the Belvedere Terrace, and my friends were round me.
 
 The tumult of mind into which I was thrown by this hideous vision made me
 ill for several days, and prolonged our stay at Vienna.  I shuddered with
 horror as the scene recurred to me; and it recurred constantly, with all
 its minutiae, as if they had been burnt into my memory; and yet, such is
 the madness of the human heart under the influence of its immediate
--**--**--
 after all the centuries of invention, the soul's path lies through the
 thorny wilderness which must be still trodden in solitude, with bleeding
 feet, with sobs for help, as it was trodden by them of old time.
 
 My mind speculated eagerly on the means by which I should become my
 brother's successful rival, for I was still too timid, in my ignorance of
 Bertha's actual feeling, to venture on any step that would urge from her
 an avowal of it.  I thought I should gain confidence even for this, if my
 vision of Prague proved to have been veracious; and yet, the horror of
 that certitude!  Behind the slim girl Bertha, whose words and looks I
 watched for, whose touch was bliss, there stood continually that Bertha
 with the fuller form, the harder eyes, the more rigid mouth--with the
 barren, selfish soul laid bare; no longer a fascinating secret, but a
 measured fact, urging itself perpetually on my unwilling sight.  Are you
 unable to give me your sympathy--you who react this?  Are you unable to
 imagine this double consciousness at work within me, flowing on like two
 parallel streams which never mingle their waters and blend into a common
 hue?  Yet you must have known something of the presentiments that spring
 from an insight at war with passion; and my visions were only like
 presentiments intensified to horror.  You have known the powerlessness of
 ideas before the might of impulse; and my visions, when once they had
 passed into memory, were mere ideas--pale shadows that beckoned in vain,
 while my hand was grasped by the living and the loved.
 
 In after-days I thought with bitter regret that if I had foreseen
 something more or something different--if instead of that hideous vision
 which poisoned the passion it could not destroy, or if even along with it
--**--**--
 and so we should return without seeing more than the streets through
 which we had already passed.  That would give me another day's
 suspense--suspense, the only form in which a fearful spirit knows the
 solace of hope.  But, as I stood under the blackened, groined arches of
 that old synagogue, made dimly visible by the seven thin candles in the
 sacred lamp, while our Jewish cicerone reached down the Book of the Law,
 and read to us in its ancient tongue--I felt a shuddering impression that
 this strange building, with its shrunken lights, this surviving withered
 remnant of medieval Judaism, was of a piece with my vision.  Those
 darkened dusty Christian saints, with their loftier arches and their
 larger candles, needed the consolatory scorn with which they might point
 to a more shrivelled death-in-life than their own.
 
 As I expected, when we left the Jews' quarter the elders of our party
 wished to return to the hotel.  But now, instead of rejoicing in this, as
 I had done beforehand, I felt a sudden overpowering impulse to go on at
 once to the bridge, and put an end to the suspense I had been wishing to
 protract.  I declared, with unusual decision, that I would get out of the
 carriage and walk on alone; they might return without me.  My father,
 thinking this merely a sample of my usual "poetic nonsense," objected
 that I should only do myself harm by walking in the heat; but when I
 persisted, he said angrily that I might follow my own absurd devices, but
 that Schmidt (our courier) must go with me.  I assented to this, and set
 off with Schmidt towards the bridge.  I had no sooner passed from under
 the archway of the grand old gate leading an to the bridge, than a
--**--**--
 were under a conscious nightmare--knowing it was a dream that would
 vanish, but feeling stifled under the grasp of hard-clutching fingers.
 
 When I was not in Bertha's presence--and I was with her very often, for
 she continued to treat me with a playful patronage that wakened no
 jealousy in my brother--I spent my time chiefly in wandering, in
 strolling, or taking long rides while the daylight lasted, and then
 shutting myself up with my unread books; for books had lost the power of
 chaining my attention.  My self-consciousness was heightened to that
 pitch of intensity in which our own emotions take the form of a drama
 which urges itself imperatively on our contemplation, and we begin to
 weep, less under the sense of our suffering than at the thought of it.  I
 felt a sort of pitying anguish over the pathos of my own lot: the lot of
 a being finely organized for pain, but with hardly any fibres that
 responded to pleasure--to whom the idea of future evil robbed the present
 of its joy, and for whom the idea of future good did not still the
 uneasiness of a present yearning or a present dread.  I went dumbly
 through that stage of the poet's suffering, in which he feels the
 delicious pang of utterance, and makes an image of his sorrows.
 
 I was left entirely without remonstrance concerning this dreamy wayward
 life: I knew my father's thought about me: "That lad will never be good
 for anything in life: he may waste his years in an insignificant way on
 the income that falls to him: I shall not trouble myself about a career
 for him."
 
 One mild morning in the beginning of November, it happened that I was
 standing outside the portico patting lazy old Caesar, a Newfoundland
--**--**--
 
 Mr. Filmore's house lay not more than half a mile beyond our own gates,
 and whenever I knew my brother was gone in another direction, I went
 there for the chance of finding Bertha at home.  Later on in the day I
 walked thither.  By a rare accident she was alone, and we walked out in
 the grounds together, for she seldom went on foot beyond the trimly-swept
 gravel-walks.  I remember what a beautiful sylph she looked to me as the
 low November sun shone on her blond hair, and she tripped along teasing
 me with her usual light banter, to which I listened half fondly, half
 moodily; it was all the sign Bertha's mysterious inner self ever made to
 me.  To-day perhaps, the moodiness predominated, for I had not yet shaken
 off the access of jealous hate which my brother had raised in me by his
 parting patronage.  Suddenly I interrupted and startled her by saying,
 almost fiercely, "Bertha, how can you love Alfred?"
 
 She looked at me with surprise for a moment, but soon her light smile
 came again, and she answered sarcastically, "Why do you suppose I love
 him?"
 
 "How can you ask that, Bertha?"
 
 "What! your wisdom thinks I must love the man I'm going to marry?  The
 most unpleasant thing in the world.  I should quarrel with him; I should
 be jealous of him; our _menage_ would be conducted in a very ill-bred
 manner.  A little quiet contempt contributes greatly to the elegance of
 life."
 
 "Bertha, that is not your real feeling.  Why do you delight in trying to
 deceive me by inventing such cynical speeches?"
 
 "I need never take the trouble of invention in order to deceive you, my
 small Tasso"--(that was the mocking name she usually gave me).  "The
 easiest way to deceive a poet is to tell him the truth."
--**--**--
 
 "Forgive me," I said, hurriedly, as soon as I could speak again; "I did
 not know what I was saying."
 
 "Ah, Tasso's mad fit has come on, I see," she answered quietly, for she
 had recovered herself sooner than I had.  "Let him go home and keep his
 head cool.  I must go in, for the sun is setting."
 
 I left her--full of indignation against myself.  I had let slip words
 which, if she reflected on them, might rouse in her a suspicion of my
 abnormal mental condition--a suspicion which of all things I dreaded.  And
 besides that, I was ashamed of the apparent baseness I had committed in
 uttering them to my brother's betrothed wife.  I wandered home slowly,
 entering our park through a private gate instead of by the lodges.  As I
 approached the house, I saw a man dashing off at full speed from the
 stable-yard across the park.  Had any accident happened at home?  No;
 perhaps it was only one of my father's peremptory business errands that
 required this headlong haste.
 
 Nevertheless I quickened my pace without any distinct motive, and was
 soon at the house.  I will not dwell on the scene I found there.  My
 brother was dead--had been pitched from his horse, and killed on the spot
 by a concussion of the brain.
 
 I went up to the room where he lay, and where my father was seated beside
 him with a look of rigid despair.  I had shunned my father more than any
 one since our return home, for the radical antipathy between our natures
 made my insight into his inner self a constant affliction to me.  But
 now, as I went up to him, and stood beside him in sad silence, I felt the
 presence of a new element that blended us as we had never been blent
--**--**--
 in spite of himself that he began to think of me with anxious regard.
 There is hardly any neglected child for whom death has made vacant a more
 favoured place, who will not understand what I mean.
 
 Gradually, however, my new deference to his wishes, the effect of that
 patience which was born of my pity for him, won upon his affection, and
 he began to please himself with the endeavour to make me fill any
 brother's place as fully as my feebler personality would admit.  I saw
 that the prospect which by and by presented itself of my becoming
 Bertha's husband was welcome to him, and he even contemplated in my case
 what he had not intended in my brother's--that his son and daughter-in-
 law should make one household with him.  My softened feelings towards my
 father made this the happiest time I had known since childhood;--these
 last months in which I retained the delicious illusion of loving Bertha,
 of longing and doubting and hoping that she might love me.  She behaved
 with a certain new consciousness and distance towards me after my
 brother's death; and I too was under a double constraint--that of
 delicacy towards my brother's memory and of anxiety as to the impression
 my abrupt words had left on her mind.  But the additional screen this
 mutual reserve erected between us only brought me more completely under
 her power: no matter how empty the adytum, so that the veil be thick
 enough.  So absolute is our soul's need of something hidden and uncertain
 for the maintenance of that doubt and hope and effort which are the
 breath of its life, that if the whole future were laid bare to us beyond
 to-day, the interest of all mankind would be bent on the hours that lie
--**--**--
 was near her, submitting to her playful tyranny.  It costs a woman so
 little effort to beset us in this way!  A half-repressed word, a moment's
 unexpected silence, even an easy fit of petulance on our account, will
 serve us as _hashish_ for a long while.  Out of the subtlest web of
 scarcely perceptible signs, she set me weaving the fancy that she had
 always unconsciously loved me better than Alfred, but that, with the
 ignorant fluttered sensibility of a young girl, she had been imposed on
 by the charm that lay for her in the distinction of being admired and
 chosen by a man who made so brilliant a figure in the world as my
 brother.  She satirized herself in a very graceful way for her vanity and
 ambition.  What was it to me that I had the light of my wretched
 provision on the fact that now it was I who possessed at least all but
 the personal part of my brother's advantages?  Our sweet illusions are
 half of them conscious illusions, like effects of colour that we know to
 be made up of tinsel, broken glass, and rags.
 
 We were married eighteen months after Alfred's death, one cold, clear
 morning in April, when there came hail and sunshine both together; and
 Bertha, in her white silk and pale-green leaves, and the pale hues of her
 hair and face, looked like the spirit of the morning.  My father was
 happier than he had thought of being again: my marriage, he felt sure,
 would complete the desirable modification of my character, and make me
 practical and worldly enough to take my place in society among sane men.
 For he delighted in Bertha's tact and acuteness, and felt sure she would
 be mistress of me, and make me what she chose: I was only twenty-one, and
--**--**--
 of her lips and demeanour: I had still the human interest of wondering
 whether what I did and said pleased her, of longing to hear a word of
 affection, of giving a delicious exaggeration of meaning to her smile.
 But I was conscious of a growing difference in her manner towards me;
 sometimes strong enough to be called haughty coldness, cutting and
 chilling me as the hail had done that came across the sunshine on our
 marriage morning; sometimes only perceptible in the dexterous avoidance
 of a _tete-a-tete_ walk or dinner to which I had been looking forward.  I
 had been deeply pained by this--had even felt a sort of crushing of the
 heart, from the sense that my brief day of happiness was near its
 setting; but still I remained dependent on Bertha, eager for the last
 rays of a bliss that would soon be gone for ever, hoping and watching for
 some after-glow more beautiful from the impending night.
 
 I remember--how should I not remember?--the time when that dependence and
 hope utterly left me, when the sadness I had felt in Bertha's growing
 estrangement became a joy that I looked back upon with longing as a man
 might look back on the last pains in a paralysed limb.  It was just after
 the close of my father's last illness, which had necessarily withdrawn us
 from society and thrown us more on each other.  It was the evening of
 father's death.  On that evening the veil which had shrouded Bertha's
 soul from me--had made me find in her alone among my fellow-beings the
 blessed possibility of mystery, and doubt, and expectation--was first
 withdrawn.  Perhaps it was the first day since the beginning of my
 passion for her, in which that passion was completely neutralized by the
 presence of an absorbing feeling of another kind.  I had been watching by
--**--**--
 with latent feeling--saw the light floating vanities of the girl defining
 themselves into the systematic coquetry, the scheming selfishness, of the
 woman--saw repulsion and antipathy harden into cruel hatred, giving pain
 only for the sake of wreaking itself.
 
 For Bertha too, after her kind, felt the bitterness of disillusion.  She
 had believed that my wild poet's passion for her would make me her slave;
 and that, being her slave, I should execute her will in all things.  With
 the essential shallowness of a negative, unimaginative nature, she was
 unable to conceive the fact that sensibilities were anything else than
 weaknesses.  She had thought my weaknesses would put me in her power, and
 she found them unmanageable forces.  Our positions were reversed.  Before
 marriage she had completely mastered my imagination, for she was a secret
 to me; and I created the unknown thought before which I trembled as if it
 were hers.  But now that her soul was laid open to me, now that I was
 compelled to share the privacy of her motives, to follow all the petty
 devices that preceded her words and acts, she found herself powerless
 with me, except to produce in me the chill shudder of repulsion--
 powerless, because I could be acted on by no lever within her
 reach.  I was dead to worldly ambitions, to social vanities, to all the
 incentives within the compass of her narrow imagination, and I lived
 under influences utterly invisible to her.
 
 She was really pitiable to have such a husband, and so all the world
 thought.  A graceful, brilliant woman, like Bertha, who smiled on morning
 callers, made a figure in ball-rooms, and was capable of that light
 repartee which, from such a woman, is accepted as wit, was secure of
 carrying off all sympathy from a husband who was sickly, abstracted, and,
--**--**--
 any steps towards a complete separation, which would have made our
 alienation evident to the world.  Why should I rush for help to a new
 course, when I was only suffering from the consequences of a deed which
 had been the act of my intensest will?  That would have been the logic of
 one who had desires to gratify, and I had no desires.  But Bertha and I
 lived more and more aloof from each other.  The rich find it easy to live
 married and apart.
 
 That course of our life which I have indicated in a few sentences filled
 the space of years.  So much misery--so slow and hideous a growth of
 hatred and sin, may be compressed into a sentence!  And men judge of each
 other's lives through this summary medium.  They epitomize the experience
 of their fellow-mortal, and pronounce judgment on him in neat syntax, and
 feel themselves wise and virtuous--conquerors over the temptations they
 define in well-selected predicates.  Seven years of wretchedness glide
 glibly over the lips of the man who has never counted them out in moments
 of chill disappointment, of head and heart throbbings, of dread and vain
 wrestling, of remorse and despair.  We learn _words_ by rote, but not
 their meaning; _that_ must be paid for with our life-blood, and printed
 in the subtle fibres of our nerves.
 
 But I will hasten to finish my story.  Brevity is justified at once to
 those who readily understand, and to those who will never understand.
 
 Some years after my father's death, I was sitting by the dim firelight in
 my library one January evening--sitting in the leather chair that used to
 be my father's--when Bertha appeared at the door, with a candle in her
 hand, and advanced towards me.  I knew the ball-dress she had on--the
--**--**--
 moment to which I could not cease to attach some fatality: I had a vague
 dread that I should find her mixed up with the dreary drama of my
 life--that some new sickening vision would reveal her to me as an evil
 genius.  When at last I did unavoidably meet her, the vague dread was
 changed into definite disgust.  She was a tall, wiry, dark-eyed woman,
 this Mrs. Archer, with a face handsome enough to give her coarse hard
 nature the odious finish of bold, self-confident coquetry.  That was
 enough to make me avoid her, quite apart from the contemptuous feeling
 with which she contemplated me.  I seldom saw her; but I perceived that
 she rapidly became a favourite with her mistress, and, after the lapse of
 eight or nine months, I began to be aware that there had arisen in
 Bertha's mind towards this woman a mingled feeling of fear and
 dependence, and that this feeling was associated with ill-defined images
 of candle-light scenes in her dressing-room, and the locking-up of
 something in Bertha's cabinet.  My interviews with my wife had become so
 brief and so rarely solitary, that I had no opportunity of perceiving
 these images in her mind with more definiteness.  The recollections of
 the past become contracted in the rapidity of thought till they sometimes
 bear hardly a more distinct resemblance to the external reality than the
 forms of an oriental alphabet to the objects that suggested them.
 
 Besides, for the last year or more a modification had been going forward
 in my mental condition, and was growing more and more marked.  My insight
 into the minds of those around me was becoming dimmer and more fitful,
 and the ideas that crowded my double consciousness became less and less
 dependent on any personal contact.  All that was personal in me seemed to
--**--**--
 had of late seemed to seek opportunities of remaining in my society, and
 had cultivated that kind of distant yet familiar talk which is customary
 between a husband and wife who live in polite and irrevocable alienation.
 I bore this with languid submission, and without feeling enough interest
 in her motives to be roused into keen observation; yet I could not help
 perceiving something triumphant and excited in her carriage and the
 expression of her face--something too subtle to express itself in words
 or tones, but giving one the idea that she lived in a state of
 expectation or hopeful suspense.  My chief feeling was satisfaction that
 her inner self was once more shut out from me; and I almost revelled for
 the moment in the absent melancholy that made me answer her at cross
 purposes, and betray utter ignorance of what she had been saying.  I
 remember well the look and the smile with which she one day said, after a
 mistake of this kind on my part: "I used to think you were a clairvoyant,
 and that was the reason why you were so bitter against other
 clairvoyants, wanting to keep your monopoly; but I see now you have
 become rather duller than the rest of the world."
 
 I said nothing in reply.  It occurred to me that her recent obtrusion of
 herself upon me might have been prompted by the wish to test my power of
 detecting some of her secrets; but I let the thought drop again at once:
 her motives and her deeds had no interest for me, and whatever pleasures
 she might be seeking, I had no wish to baulk her.  There was still pity
 in my soul for every living thing, and Bertha was living--was surrounded
 with possibilities of misery.
 
 Just at this time there occurred an event which roused me somewhat from
--**--**--
 that more than once, when his talk turned on the psychological relations
 of disease, the thought crossed my mind that, if his stay with me were
 long enough, I might possibly bring myself to tell this man the secrets
 of my lot.  Might there not lie some remedy for me, too, in his science?
 Might there not at least lie some comprehension and sympathy ready for me
 in his large and susceptible mind?  But the thought only flickered feebly
 now and then, and died out before it could become a wish.  The horror I
 had of again breaking in on the privacy of another soul, made me, by an
 irrational instinct, draw the shroud of concealment more closely around
 my own, as we automatically perform the gesture we feel to be wanting in
 another.
 
 When Meunier's visit was approaching its conclusion, there happened an
 event which caused some excitement in our household, owing to the
 surprisingly strong effect it appeared to produce on Bertha--on Bertha,
 the self-possessed, who usually seemed inaccessible to feminine
 agitations, and did even her hate in a self-restrained hygienic manner.
 This event was the sudden severe illness of her maid, Mrs. Archer.  I
 have reserved to this moment the mention of a circumstance which had
 forced itself on my notice shortly before Meunier's arrival, namely, that
 there had been some quarrel between Bertha and this maid, apparently
 during a visit to a distant family, in which she had accompanied her
 mistress.  I had overheard Archer speaking in a tone of bitter insolence,
 which I should have thought an adequate reason for immediate dismissal.
 No dismissal followed; on the contrary, Bertha seemed to be silently
 putting up with personal inconveniences from the exhibitions of this
 woman's temper.  I was the more astonished to observe that her illness
--**--**--
 from among your provincial doctors.  A disagreeable foolish version of
 the thing might get abroad."
 
 "Have you spoken to my wife on the subject?" I said, "because she appears
 to be peculiarly sensitive about this woman: she has been a favourite
 maid."
 
 "To tell you the truth," said Meunier, "I don't want her to know about
 it.  There are always insuperable difficulties with women in these
 matters, and the effect on the supposed dead body may be startling.  You
 and I will sit up together, and be in readiness.  When certain symptoms
 appear I shall take you in, and at the right moment we must manage to get
 every one else out of the room."
 
 I need not give our farther conversation on the subject.  He entered very
 fully into the details, and overcame my repulsion from them, by exciting
 in me a mingled awe and curiosity concerning the possible results of his
 experiment.
 
 We prepared everything, and he instructed me in my part as assistant.  He
 had not told Bertha of his absolute conviction that Archer would not
 survive through the night, and endeavoured to persuade her to leave the
 patient and take a night's rest.  But she was obstinate, suspecting the
 fact that death was at hand, and supposing that he wished merely to save
 her nerves.  She refused to leave the sick-room.  Meunier and I sat up
 together in the library, he making frequent visits to the sick-room, and
 returning with the information that the case was taking precisely the
 course he expected.  Once he said to me, "Can you imagine any cause of
 ill-feeling this woman has against her mistress, who is so devoted to
 her?"
 
 "I think there was some misunderstanding between them before her illness.
 Why do you ask?"
 
 "Because I have observed for the last five or six hours--since, I fancy,
--**--**--
 was hesitating, apparently almost willing to believe his assurance and to
 comply.  She looked round at the ghastly dying face, as if to read the
 confirmation of that assurance, when for a moment the lowered eyelids
 were raised again, and it seemed as if the eyes were looking towards
 Bertha, but blankly.  A shudder passed through Bertha's frame, and she
 returned to her station near the pillow, tacitly implying that she would
 not leave the room.
 
 The eyelids were lifted no more.  Once I looked at Bertha as she watched
 the face of the dying one.  She wore a rich _peignoir_, and her blond
 hair was half covered by a lace cap: in her attire she was, as always, an
 elegant woman, fit to figure in a picture of modern aristocratic life:
 but I asked myself how that face of hers could ever have seemed to me the
 face of a woman born of woman, with memories of childhood, capable of
 pain, needing to be fondled?  The features at that moment seemed so
 preternaturally sharp, the eyes were so hard and eager--she looked like a
 cruel immortal, finding her spiritual feast in the agonies of a dying
 race.  For across those hard features there came something like a flash
 when the last hour had been breathed out, and we all felt that the dark
 veil had completely fallen.  What secret was there between Bertha and
 this woman?  I turned my eyes from her with a horrible dread lest my
 insight should return, and I should be obliged to see what had been
 breeding about two unloving women's hearts.  I felt that Bertha had been
 watching for the moment of death as the sealing of her secret: I thanked
 Heaven it could remain sealed for me.
 
 Meunier said quietly, "She is gone."  He then gave his arm to Bertha, and
--**--**--
 Bertha had thought for ever still was pointed towards her, and the
 haggard face moved.  The gasping eager voice said--
 
 "You mean to poison your husband . . . the poison is in the black cabinet
 . . . I got it for you . . . you laughed at me, and told lies about me
 behind my back, to make me disgusting . . . because you were jealous . . .
 are you sorry . . . now?"
 
 The lips continued to murmur, but the sounds were no longer distinct.
 Soon there was no sound--only a slight movement: the flame had leaped
 out, and was being extinguished the faster.  The wretched woman's heart-
 strings had been set to hatred and vengeance; the spirit of life had
 swept the chords for an instant, and was gone again for ever.  Great God!
 Is this what it is to live again . . . to wake up with our unstilled
 thirst upon us, with our unuttered curses rising to our lips, with our
 muscles ready to act out their half-committed sins?
 
 Bertha stood pale at the foot of the bed, quivering and helpless,
 despairing of devices, like a cunning animal whose hiding-places are
 surrounded by swift-advancing flame.  Even Meunier looked paralysed; life
 for that moment ceased to be a scientific problem to him.  As for me,
 this scene seemed of one texture with the rest of my existence: horror
 was my familiar, and this new revelation was only like an old pain
 recurring with new circumstances.
 
 * * * * *
 
 Since then Bertha and I have lived apart--she in her own neighbourhood,
 the mistress of half our wealth, I as a wanderer in foreign countries,
 until I came to this Devonshire nest to die.  Bertha lives pitied and
 admired; for what had I against that charming woman, whom every one but
--**--**--
 
 "No, no, Bessy; I didn't mean justly the mole; I meant it to stand for
 summat else; but niver mind--it's puzzling work, talking is. What I'm
 thinking on, is how to find the right sort o' school to send Tom to,
 for I might be ta'en in again, as I've been wi' th' academy. I'll have
 nothing to do wi' a 'cademy again: whativer school I send Tom to, it
 sha'n't be a 'cademy; it shall be a place where the lads spend their
 time i' summat else besides blacking the family's shoes, and getting
 up the potatoes. It's an uncommon puzzling thing to know what school
 to pick."
 
 Mr. Tulliver paused a minute or two, and dived with both hands into
 his breeches pockets as if he hoped to find some suggestion there.
 Apparently he was not disappointed, for he presently said, "I know
 what I'll do: I'll talk it over wi' Riley; he's coming to-morrow, t'
 arbitrate about the dam."
 
 "Well, Mr. Tulliver, I've put the sheets out for the best bed, and
 Kezia's got 'em hanging at the fire. They aren't the best sheets, but
 they're good enough for anybody to sleep in, be he who he will; for as
 for them best Holland sheets, I should repent buying 'em, only they'll
 do to lay us out in. An' if you was to die to-morrow, Mr. Tulliver,
 they're mangled beautiful, an' all ready, an' smell o' lavender as it
 'ud be a pleasure to lay 'em out; an' they lie at the left-hand corner
 o' the big oak linen-chest at the back: not as I should trust anybody
 to look 'em out but myself."
 
 As Mrs. Tulliver uttered the last sentence, she drew a bright bunch of
 keys from her pocket, and singled out one, rubbing her thumb and
--**--**--
 he had no one to tell him that this was rampant Manichism, else he
 might have seen his error. But to-day it was clear that the good
 principle was triumphant: this affair of the water-power had been a
 tangled business somehow, for all it seemed--look at it one way--as
 plain as water's water; but, big a puzzle as it was, it hadn't got the
 better of Riley. Mr. Tulliver took his brandy-and-water a little
 stronger than usual, and, for a man who might be supposed to have a
 few hundreds lying idle at his banker's, was rather incautiously open
 in expressing his high estimate of his friend's business talents.
 
 But the dam was a subject of conversation that would keep; it could
 always be taken up again at the same point, and exactly in the same
 condition; and there was another subject, as you know, on which Mr.
 Tulliver was in pressing want of Mr. Riley's advice. This was his
 particular reason for remaining silent for a short space after his
 last draught, and rubbing his knees in a meditative manner. He was not
 a man to make an abrupt transition. This was a puzzling world, as he
 often said, and if you drive your wagon in a hurry, you may light on
 an awkward corner. Mr. Riley, meanwhile, was not impatient. Why should
 he be? Even Hotspur, one would think, must have been patient in his
 slippers on a warm hearth, taking copious snuff, and sipping
 gratuitous brandy-and-water.
 
 "There's a thing I've got i' my head," said Mr. Tulliver at last, in
 rather a lower tone than usual, as he turned his head and looked
 steadfastly at his companion.
 
 "Ah!" said Mr. Riley, in a tone of mild interest. He was a man with
 heavy waxen eyelids and high-arched eyebrows, looking exactly the same
--**--**--
 looking at Maggie with a twinkling eye. Then, in a lower voice,
 turning to Mr. Riley, as though Maggie couldn't hear, "She understands
 what one's talking about so as never was. And you should hear her
 read,--straight off, as if she knowed it all beforehand. And allays at
 her book! But it's bad--it's bad," Mr. Tulliver added sadly, checking
 this blamable exultation. "A woman's no business wi' being so clever;
 it'll turn to trouble, I doubt. But bless you!"--here the exultation
 was clearly recovering the mastery,--"she'll read the books and
 understand 'em better nor half the folks as are growed up."
 
 Maggie's cheeks began to flush with triumphant excitement. She thought
 Mr. Riley would have a respect for her now; it had been evident that
 he thought nothing of her before.
 
 Mr. Riley was turning over the leaves of the book, and she could make
 nothing of his face, with its high-arched eyebrows; but he presently
 looked at her, and said,--
 
 "Come, come and tell me something about this book; here are some
 pictures,--I want to know what they mean."
 
 Maggie, with deepening color, went without hesitation to Mr. Riley's
 elbow and looked over the book, eagerly seizing one corner, and
 tossing back her mane, while she said,--
 
 "Oh, I'll tell you what that means. It's a dreadful picture, isn't it?
 But I can't help looking at it. That old woman in the water's a
 witch,--they've put her in to find out whether she's a witch or no;
 and if she swims she's a witch, and if she's drowned--and killed, you
 know--she's innocent, and not a witch, but only a poor silly old
 woman. But what good would it do her then, you know, when she was
 drowned? Only, I suppose, she'd go to heaven, and God would make it up
--**--**--
 "You see, my dear Tulliver," Mr. Riley continued, "when you get a
 thoroughly educated man, like Stelling, he's at no loss to take up any
 branch of instruction. When a workman knows the use of his tools, he
 can make a door as well as a window."
 
 "Ay, that's true," said Mr. Tulliver, almost convinced now that the
 clergy must be the best of schoolmasters.
 
 "Well, I'll tell you what I'll do for you," said Mr. Riley, "and I
 wouldn't do it for everybody. I'll see Stelling's father-in-law, or
 drop him a line when I get back to Mudport, to say that you wish to
 place your boy with his son-in-law, and I dare say Stelling will write
 to you, and send you his terms."
 
 "But there's no hurry, is there?" said Mrs. Tulliver; "for I hope, Mr.
 Tulliver, you won't let Tom begin at his new school before Midsummer.
 He began at the 'cademy at the Lady-day quarter, and you see what
 good's come of it."
 
 "Ay, ay, Bessy, never brew wi' bad malt upo' Michael-masday, else
 you'll have a poor tap," said Mr. Tulliver, winking and smiling at Mr.
 Riley, with the natural pride of a man who has a buxom wife
 conspicuously his inferior in intellect. "But it's true there's no
 hurry; you've hit it there, Bessy."
 
 "It might be as well not to defer the arrangement too long," said Mr.
 Riley, quietly, "for Stelling may have propositions from other
 parties, and I know he would not take more than two or three boarders,
 if so many. If I were you, I think I would enter on the subject with
 Stelling at once: there's no necessity for sending the boy before
 Midsummer, but I would be on the safe side, and make sure that nobody
 forestalls you."
--**--**--
 present occasion for, as she sat sliding on the heap of grain near
 which he was busying himself, she said, at that shrill pitch which was
 requisite in mill-society,--
 
 "I think you never read any book but the Bible, did you, Luke?"
 
 "Nay, Miss, an' not much o' that," said Luke, with great frankness.
 "I'm no reader, I aren't."
 
 "But if I lent you one of my books, Luke? I've not got any _very_
 pretty books that would be easy for you to read; but there's 'Pug's
 Tour of Europe,'--that would tell you all about the different sorts of
 people in the world, and if you didn't understand the reading, the
 pictures would help you; they show the looks and ways of the people,
 and what they do. There are the Dutchmen, very fat, and smoking, you
 know, and one sitting on a barrel."
 
 "Nay, Miss, I'n no opinion o' Dutchmen. There ben't much good i'
 knowin' about _them_."
 
 "But they're our fellow-creatures, Luke; we ought to know about our
 fellow-creatures."
 
 "Not much o' fellow-creaturs, I think, Miss; all I know--my old
 master, as war a knowin' man, used to say, says he, 'If e'er I sow my
 wheat wi'out brinin', I'm a Dutchman,' says he; an' that war as much
 as to say as a Dutchman war a fool, or next door. Nay, nay, I aren't
 goin' to bother mysen about Dutchmen. There's fools enoo, an' rogues
 enoo, wi'out lookin' i' books for 'em."
 
 "Oh, well," said Maggie, rather foiled by Luke's unexpectedly decided
 views about Dutchmen, "perhaps you would like 'Animated Nature'
 better; that's not Dutchmen, you know, but elephants and kangaroos,
 and the civet-cat, and the sunfish, and a bird sitting on its tail,--I
 forget its name. There are countries full of those creatures, instead
 of horses and cows, you know. Shouldn't you like to know about them,
--**--**--
 door, and even held her hand on Maggie's offending head, forgetting
 all the griefs of the morning.
 
 "There he is, my sweet lad! But, Lord ha' mercy! he's got never a
 collar on; it's been lost on the road, I'll be bound, and spoilt the
 set."
 
 Mrs. Tulliver stood with her arms open; Maggie jumped first on one leg
 and then on the other; while Tom descended from the gig, and said,
 with masculine reticence as to the tender emotions, "Hallo! Yap--what!
 are you there?"
 
 Nevertheless he submitted to be kissed willingly enough, though Maggie
 hung on his neck in rather a strangling fashion, while his blue-gray
 eyes wandered toward the croft and the lambs and the river, where he
 promised himself that he would begin to fish the first thing to-morrow
 morning. He was one of those lads that grow everywhere in England, and
 at twelve or thirteen years of age look as much alike as goslings,--a
 lad with light-brown hair, cheeks of cream and roses, full lips,
 indeterminate nose and eyebrows,--a physiognomy in which it seems
 impossible to discern anything but the generic character to boyhood;
 as different as possible from poor Maggie's phiz, which Nature seemed
 to have moulded and colored with the most decided intention. But that
 same Nature has the deep cunning which hides itself under the
 appearance of openness, so that simple people think they can see
 through her quite well, and all the while she is secretly preparing a
 refutation of their confident prophecies. Under these average boyish
 physiognomies that she seems to turn off by the gross, she conceals
 some of her most rigid, inflexible purposes, some of her most
 unmodifiable characters; and the dark-eyed, demonstrative, rebellious
 girl may after all turn out to be a passive being compared with this
--**--**--
 
 Tom had put the line back in his pocket, and was looking at the hooks
 one by one, before he spoke again.
 
 "And the fellows fought me, because I wouldn't give in about the
 toffee."
 
 "Oh, dear! I wish they wouldn't fight at your school, Tom. Didn't it
 hurt you?"
 
 "Hurt me? no," said Tom, putting up the hooks again, taking out a
 large pocket-knife, and slowly opening the largest blade, which he
 looked at meditatively as he rubbed his finger along it. Then he
 added,--
 
 "I gave Spouncer a black eye, I know; that's what he got by wanting to
 leather _me;_ I wasn't going to go halves because anybody leathered
 me."
 
 "Oh, how brave you are, Tom! I think you're like Samson. If there came
 a lion roaring at me, I think you'd fight him, wouldn't you, Tom?"
 
 "How can a lion come roaring at you, you silly thing? There's no
 lions, only in the shows."
 
 "No; but if we were in the lion countries--I mean in Africa, where
 it's very hot; the lions eat people there. I can show it you in the
 book where I read it."
 
 "Well, I should get a gun and shoot him."
 
 "But if you hadn't got a gun,--we might have gone out, you know, not
 thinking, just as we go fishing; and then a great lion might run
 toward us roaring, and we couldn't get away from him. What should you
 do, Tom?"
 
 Tom paused, and at last turned away contemptuously, saying, "But the
 lion _isn't_ coming. What's the use of talking?"
 
 "But I like to fancy how it would be," said Maggie, following him.
 "Just think what you would do, Tom."
 
 "Oh, don't bother, Maggie! you're such a silly. I shall go and see my
 rabbits."
 
 Maggie's heart began to flutter with fear. She dared not tell the sad
--**--**--
 
 "I don't know," said Tom. He didn't want to "tell" of Maggie, though
 he was angry with her; for Tom Tulliver was a lad of honor.
 
 "What! hasn't she been playing with you all this while?" said the
 father. "She'd been thinking o' nothing but your coming home."
 
 "I haven't seen her this two hours," says Tom, commencing on the
 plumcake.
 
 "Goodness heart; she's got drownded!" exclaimed Mrs. Tulliver, rising
 from her seat and running to the window.
 
 "How could you let her do so?" she added, as became a fearful woman,
 accusing she didn't know whom of she didn't know what.
 
 "Nay, nay, she's none drownded," said Mr. Tulliver. "You've been
 naughty to her, I doubt, Tom?"
 
 "I'm sure I haven't, father," said Tom, indignantly. "I think she's in
 the house."
 
 "Perhaps up in that attic," said Mrs. Tulliver, "a-singing and talking
 to herself, and forgetting all about meal-times."
 
 "You go and fetch her down, Tom," said Mr. Tulliver, rather
 sharply,--his perspicacity or his fatherly fondness for Maggie making
 him suspect that the lad had been hard upon "the little un," else she
 would never have left his side. "And be good to her, do you hear? Else
 I'll let you know better."
 
 Tom never disobeyed his father, for Mr. Tulliver was a peremptory man,
 and, as he said, would never let anybody get hold of his whip-hand;
 but he went out rather sullenly, carrying his piece of plumcake, and
 not intending to reprieve Maggie's punishment, which was no more than
 she deserved. Tom was only thirteen, and had no decided views in
 grammar and arithmetic, regarding them for the most part as open
 questions, but he was particularly clear and positive on one
 point,--namely, that he would punish everybody who deserved it. Why,
 he wouldn't have minded being punished himself if he deserved it; but,
--**--**--
 she had been a Miss Dodson, and the Dodsons were a very respectable
 family indeed,--as much looked up to as any in their own parish, or
 the next to it. The Miss Dodsons had always been thought to hold up
 their heads very high, and no one was surprised the two eldest had
 married so well,--not at an early age, for that was not the practice
 of the Dodson family. There were particular ways of doing everything
 in that family: particular ways of bleaching the linen, of making the
 cowslip wine, curing the hams, and keeping the bottled gooseberries;
 so that no daughter of that house could be indifferent to the
 privilege of having been born a Dodson, rather than a Gibson or a
 Watson. Funerals were always conducted with peculiar propriety in the
 Dodson family: the hat-bands were never of a blue shade, the gloves
 never split at the thumb, everybody was a mourner who ought to be, and
 there were always scarfs for the bearers. When one of the family was
 in trouble or sickness, all the rest went to visit the unfortunate
 member, usually at the same time, and did not shrink from uttering the
 most disagreeable truths that correct family feeling dictated; if the
 illness or trouble was the sufferer's own fault, it was not in the
 practice of the Dodson family to shrink from saying so. In short,
 there was in this family a peculiar tradition as to what was the right
 thing in household management and social demeanor, and the only bitter
 circumstance attending this superiority was a painful inability to
 approve the condiments or the conduct of families ungoverned by the
 Dodson tradition. A female Dodson, when in "strange houses," always
 ate dry bread with her tea, and declined any sort of preserves, having
--**--**--
 swallow's, or a tomtit's, or a yellow-hammer's; he found out all the
 wasps' nests, and could set all sort of traps; he could climb the
 trees like a squirrel, and had quite a magical power of detecting
 hedgehogs and stoats; and he had courage to do things that were rather
 naughty, such as making gaps in the hedgerows, throwing stones after
 the sheep, and killing a cat that was wandering _incognito_.
 
 Such qualities in an inferior, who could always be treated with
 authority in spite of his superior knowingness, had necessarily a
 fatal fascination for Tom; and every holiday-time Maggie was sure to
 have days of grief because he had gone off with Bob.
 
 Well! there was no hope for it; he was gone now, and Maggie could
 think of no comfort but to sit down by the hollow, or wander by the
 hedgerow, and fancy it was all different, refashioning her little
 world into just what she should like it to be.
 
 Maggie's was a troublous life, and this was the form in which she took
 her opium.
 
 Meanwhile Tom, forgetting all about Maggie and the sting of reproach
 which he had left in her heart, was hurrying along with Bob, whom he
 had met accidentally, to the scene of a great rat-catching in a
 neighboring barn. Bob knew all about this particular affair, and spoke
 of the sport with an enthusiasm which no one who is not either
 divested of all manly feeling, or pitiably ignorant of rat-catching,
 can fail to imagine. For a person suspected of preternatural
 wickedness, Bob was really not so very villanous-looking; there was
 even something agreeable in his snub-nosed face, with its close-curled
 border of red hair. But then his trousers were always rolled up at the
 knee, for the convenience of wading on the slightest notice; and his
--**--**--
 she didn't know what draughts there might be in strange houses. For
 the same reason she wore a small sable tippet, which reached just to
 her shoulders, and was very far from meeting across her well-formed
 chest, while her long neck was protected by a _chevaux-de-frise_ of
 miscellaneous frilling. One would need to be learned in the fashions
 of those times to know how far in the rear of them Mrs. Glegg's
 slate-colored silk gown must have been; but from certain
 constellations of small yellow spots upon it, and a mouldy odor about
 it suggestive of a damp clothes-chest, it was probable that it
 belonged to a stratum of garments just old enough to have come
 recently into wear.
 
 Mrs. Glegg held her large gold watch in her hand with the many-doubled
 chain round her fingers, and observed to Mrs. Tulliver, who had just
 returned from a visit to the kitchen, that whatever it might be by
 other people's clocks and watches, it was gone half-past twelve by
 hers.
 
 "I don't know what ails sister Pullet," she continued. "It used to be
 the way in our family for one to be as early as another,--I'm sure it
 was so in my poor father's time,--and not for one sister to sit half
 an hour before the others came. But if the ways o' the family are
 altered, it sha'n't be _my_ fault; _I'll_ never be the one to come
 into a house when all the rest are going away. I wonder _at_ sister
 Deane,--she used to be more like me. But if you'll take my advice,
 Bessy, you'll put the dinner forrard a bit, sooner than put it back,
 because folks are late as ought to ha' known better."
 
 "Oh dear, there's no fear but what they'll be all here in time,
--**--**--
 remarks were naturally to the disadvantage of Mrs. Glegg, and they
 agreed, in confidence, that there was no knowing what sort of fright
 sister Jane would come out next. But their _tte--tte_ was curtailed
 by the appearance of Mrs. Deane with little Lucy; and Mrs. Tulliver
 had to look on with a silent pang while Lucy's blond curls were
 adjusted. It was quite unaccountable that Mrs. Deane, the thinnest and
 sallowest of all the Miss Dodsons, should have had this child, who
 might have been taken for Mrs. Tulliver's any day. And Maggie always
 looked twice as dark as usual when she was by the side of Lucy.
 
 She did to-day, when she and Tom came in from the garden with their
 father and their uncle Glegg. Maggie had thrown her bonnet off very
 carelessly, and coming in with her hair rough as well as out of curl,
 rushed at once to Lucy, who was standing by her mother's knee.
 Certainly the contrast between the cousins was conspicuous, and to
 superficial eyes was very much to the disadvantage of Maggie though a
 connoisseur might have seen "points" in her which had a higher promise
 for maturity than Lucy's natty completeness. It was like the contrast
 between a rough, dark, overgrown puppy and a white kitten. Lucy put up
 the neatest little rosebud mouth to be kissed; everything about her
 was neat,--her little round neck, with the row of coral beads; her
 little straight nose, not at all snubby; her little clear eyebrows,
 rather darker than her curls, to match hazel eyes, which looked up
 with shy pleasure at Maggie, taller by the head, though scarcely a
 year older. Maggie always looked at Lucy with delight.
 
 She was fond of fancying a world where the people never got any larger
--**--**--
 uncles."
 
 "Ay, ay," said uncle Glegg, meaning to give a playful turn to this
 denunciation, "she must be sent to jail, I think, and they'll cut the
 rest of her hair off there, and make it all even."
 
 "She's more like a gypsy nor ever," said aunt Pullet, in a pitying
 tone; "it's very bad luck, sister, as the gell should be so brown; the
 boy's fair enough. I doubt it'll stand in her way i' life to be so
 brown."
 
 "She's a naughty child, as'll break her mother's heart," said Mrs.
 Tulliver, with the tears in her eyes.
 
 Maggie seemed to be listening to a chorus of reproach and derision.
 Her first flush came from anger, which gave her a transient power of
 defiance, and Tom thought she was braving it out, supported by the
 recent appearance of the pudding and custard. Under this impression,
 he whispered, "Oh, my! Maggie, I told you you'd catch it." He meant to
 be friendly, but Maggie felt convinced that Tom was rejoicing in her
 ignominy. Her feeble power of defiance left her in an instant, her
 heart swelled, and getting up from her chair, she ran to her father,
 hid her face on his shoulder, and burst out into loud sobbing.
 
 "Come, come, my wench," said her father, soothingly, putting his arm
 round her, "never mind; you was i' the right to cut it off if it
 plagued you; give over crying; father'll take your part."
 
 Delicious words of tenderness! Maggie never forgot any of these
 moments when her father "took her part"; she kept them in her heart,
 and thought of them long years after, when every one else said that
 her father had done very ill by his children.
 
 "How your husband does spoil that child, Bessy!" said Mrs. Glegg, in a
--**--**--
 part of his audience, "you see, I've made up my mind not to bring Tom
 up to my own business. I've had my thoughts about it all along, and I
 made up my mind by what I saw with Garnett and _his_ son. I mean to
 put him to some business as he can go into without capital, and I want
 to give him an eddication as he'll be even wi' the lawyers and folks,
 and put me up to a notion now an' then."
 
 Mrs. Glegg emitted a long sort of guttural sound with closed lips,
 that smiled in mingled pity and scorn.
 
 "It 'ud be a fine deal better for some people," she said, after that
 introductory note, "if they'd let the lawyers alone."
 
 "Is he at the head of a grammar school, then, this clergyman, such as
 that at Market Bewley?" said Mr. Deane.
 
 "No, nothing of that," said Mr. Tulliver. "He won't take more than two
 or three pupils, and so he'll have the more time to attend to 'em, you
 know."
 
 "Ah, and get his eddication done the sooner; they can't learn much at
 a time when there's so many of 'em," said uncle Pullet, feeling that
 he was getting quite an insight into this difficult matter.
 
 "But he'll want the more pay, I doubt," said Mr. Glegg.
 
 "Ay, ay, a cool hundred a year, that's all," said Mr. Tulliver, with
 some pride at his own spirited course. "But then, you know, it's an
 investment; Tom's eddication 'ull be so much capital to him."
 
 "Ay, there's something in that," said Mr. Glegg. "Well well, neighbor
 Tulliver, you may be right, you may be right:
 
   'When land is gone and money's spent,
   Then learning is most excellent.'
 
 "I remember seeing those two lines wrote on a window at Buxton. But us
--**--**--
 
 Chapter VIII
 
 Mr. Tulliver Shows His Weaker Side
 
 
 "Suppose sister Glegg should call her money in; it 'ud be very awkward
 for you to have to raise five hundred pounds now," said Mrs. Tulliver
 to her husband that evening, as she took a plaintive review of the
 day.
 
 Mrs. Tulliver had lived thirteen years with her husband, yet she
 retained in all the freshness of her early married life a facility of
 saying things which drove him in the opposite direction to the one she
 desired. Some minds are wonderful for keeping their bloom in this way,
 as a patriarchal goldfish apparently retains to the last its youthful
 illusion that it can swim in a straight line beyond the encircling
 glass. Mrs. Tulliver was an amiable fish of this kind, and after
 running her head against the same resisting medium for thirteen years
 would go at it again to-day with undulled alacrity.
 
 This observation of hers tended directly to convince Mr. Tulliver that
 it would not be at all awkward for him to raise five hundred pounds;
 and when Mrs. Tulliver became rather pressing to know _how_ he would
 raise it without mortgaging the mill and the house which he had said
 he never _would_ mortgage, since nowadays people were none so ready to
 lend money without security, Mr. Tulliver, getting warm, declared that
 Mrs. Glegg might do as she liked about calling in her money, he should
 pay it in whether or not. He was not going to be beholden to his
 wife's sisters. When a man had married into a family where there was a
 whole litter of women, he might have plenty to put up with if he
 chose. But Mr. Tulliver did _not_ choose.
 
 Mrs. Tulliver cried a little in a trickling, quiet way as she put on
--**--**--
 rather than harm, now, if he were obliged to raise this three hundred
 pounds; it would make him look about him better, and not act so
 foolishly about his wool this year as he did the last; in fact, Mr.
 Tulliver had been too easy with his brother-in-law, and because he had
 let the interest run on for two years, Moss was likely enough to think
 that he should never be troubled about the principal. But Mr. Tulliver
 was determined not to encourage such shuffling people any longer; and
 a ride along the Basset lanes was not likely to enervate a man's
 resolution by softening his temper. The deep-trodden hoof-marks, made
 in the muddiest days of winter, gave him a shake now and then which
 suggested a rash but stimulating snarl at the father of lawyers, who,
 whether by means of his hoof or otherwise, had doubtless something to
 do with this state of the roads; and the abundance of foul land and
 neglected fences that met his eye, though they made no part of his
 brother Moss's farm, strongly contributed to his dissatisfaction with
 that unlucky agriculturist. If this wasn't Moss's fallow, it might
 have been; Basset was all alike; it was a beggarly parish, in Mr.
 Tulliver's opinion, and his opinion was certainly not groundless.
 Basset had a poor soil, poor roads, a poor non-resident landlord, a
 poor non-resident vicar, and rather less than half a curate, also
 poor. If any one strongly impressed with the power of the human mind
 to triumph over circumstances will contend that the parishioners of
 Basset might nevertheless have been a very superior class of people, I
 have nothing to urge against that abstract proposition; I only know
 that, in point of fact, the Basset mind was in strict keeping with its
--**--**--
 
 "Well, I don't know what fault you've got to find wi' me, Mr.
 Tulliver," said Mr. Moss, deprecatingly; "I know there isn't a
 day-laborer works harder."
 
 "What's the use o' that," said Mr. Tulliver, sharply, "when a man
 marries, and's got no capital to work his farm but his wife's bit o'
 fortin? I was against it from the first; but you'd neither of you
 listen to me. And I can't lie out o' my money any longer, for I've got
 to pay five hundred o' Mrs. Glegg's, and there'll be Tom an expense to
 me. I should find myself short, even saying I'd got back all as is my
 own. You must look about and see how you can pay me the three hundred
 pound."
 
 "Well, if that's what you mean," said Mr. Moss, looking blankly before
 him, "we'd better be sold up, and ha' done with it; I must part wi'
 every head o' stock I've got, to pay you and the landlord too."
 
 Poor relations are undeniably irritating,--their existence is so
 entirely uncalled for on our part, and they are almost always very
 faulty people. Mr. Tulliver had succeeded in getting quite as much
 irritated with Mr. Moss as he had desired, and he was able to say
 angrily, rising from his seat,--
 
 "Well, you must do as you can. _I_ can't find money for everybody else
 as well as myself. I must look to my own business and my own family. I
 can't lie out o' my money any longer. You must raise it as quick as
 you can."
 
 Mr. Tulliver walked abruptly out of the arbor as he uttered the last
 sentence, and, without looking round at Mr. Moss, went on to the
 kitchen door, where the eldest boy was holding his horse, and his
--**--**--
 hold of Maggie's frock, and Maggie's heart beat rapidly.
 
 Aunt Pullet half-opened the shutter and then unlocked the wardrobe,
 with a melancholy deliberateness which was quite in keeping with the
 funereal solemnity of the scene. The delicious scent of rose-leaves
 that issued from the wardrobe made the process of taking out sheet
 after sheet of silver paper quite pleasant to assist at, though the
 sight of the bonnet at last was an anticlimax to Maggie, who would
 have preferred something more strikingly preternatural. But few things
 could have been more impressive to Mrs. Tulliver. She looked all round
 it in silence for some moments, and then said emphatically, "Well,
 sister, I'll never speak against the full crowns again!"
 
 It was a great concession, and Mrs. Pullet felt it; she felt something
 was due to it.
 
 "You'd like to see it on, sister?" she said sadly. "I'll open the
 shutter a bit further."
 
 "Well, if you don't mind taking off your cap, sister," said Mrs.
 Tulliver.
 
 Mrs. Pullet took off her cap, displaying the brown silk scalp with a
 jutting promontory of curls which was common to the more mature and
 judicious women of those times, and placing the bonnet on her head,
 turned slowly round, like a draper's lay-figure, that Mrs. Tulliver
 might miss no point of view.
 
 "I've sometimes thought there's a loop too much o' ribbon on this left
 side, sister; what do you think?" said Mrs. Pullet.
 
 Mrs. Tulliver looked earnestly at the point indicated, and turned her
 head on one side. "Well, I think it's best as it is; if you meddled
 with it, sister, you might repent."
 
 "That's true," said aunt Pullet, taking off the bonnet and looking at
 it contemplatively.
 
 "How much might she charge you for that bonnet, sister?" said Mrs.
 Tulliver, whose mind was actively engaged on the possibility of
--**--**--
 sold up, and other folks bought your furniture, it's a comfort to
 think as you've kept it well rubbed. And there's the linen, with your
 maiden mark on, might go all over the country. It 'ud be a sad pity
 for our family." Mrs. Pullet shook her head slowly.
 
 "But what can I do, sister?" said Mrs. Tulliver. "Mr. Tulliver's not a
 man to be dictated to,--not if I was to go to the parson and get by
 heart what I should tell my husband for the best. And I'm sure I don't
 pretend to know anything about putting out money and all that. I could
 never see into men's business as sister Glegg does."
 
 "Well, you're like me in that, Bessy," said Mrs. Pullet; "and I think
 it 'ud be a deal more becoming o' Jane if she'd have that pier-glass
 rubbed oftener,--there was ever so many spots on it last
 week,--instead o' dictating to folks as have more comings in than she
 ever had, and telling 'em what they're to do with their money. But
 Jane and me were allays contrairy; she _would_ have striped things,
 and I like spots. You like a spot too, Bessy; we allays hung together
 i' that."
 
 "Yes, Sophy," said Mrs. Tulliver, "I remember our having a blue ground
 with a white spot both alike,--I've got a bit in a bed-quilt now; and
 if you would but go and see sister Glegg, and persuade her to make it
 up with Tulliver, I should take it very kind of you. You was allays a
 good sister to me."
 
 "But the right thing 'ud be for Tulliver to go and make it up with her
 himself, and say he was sorry for speaking so rash. If he's borrowed
 money of her, he shouldn't be above that," said Mrs. Pullet, whose
--**--**--
 indifferent to Lucy before, and it had been left to Maggie to pet and
 make much of her. As it was, she was actually beginning to think that
 she should like to make Lucy cry by slapping or pinching her,
 especially as it might vex Tom, whom it was of no use to slap, even if
 she dared, because he didn't mind it. And if Lucy hadn't been there,
 Maggie was sure he would have got friends with her sooner.
 
 Tickling a fat toad who is not highly sensitive is an amusement that
 it is possible to exhaust, and Tom by and by began to look round for
 some other mode of passing the time. But in so prim a garden, where
 they were not to go off the paved walks, there was not a great choice
 of sport. The only great pleasure such a restriction suggested was the
 pleasure of breaking it, and Tom began to meditate an insurrectionary
 visit to the pond, about a field's length beyond the garden.
 
 "I say, Lucy," he began, nodding his head up and down with great
 significance, as he coiled up his string again, "what do you think I
 mean to do?"
 
 "What, Tom?" said Lucy, with curiosity.
 
 "I mean to go to the pond and look at the pike. You may go with me if
 you like," said the young sultan.
 
 "Oh, Tom, _dare_ you?" said Lucy. "Aunt said we mustn't go out of the
 garden."
 
 "Oh, I shall go out at the other end of the garden," said Tom. "Nobody
 'ull see us. Besides, I don't care if they do,--I'll run off home."
 
 "But _I_ couldn't run," said Lucy, who had never before been exposed
 to such severe temptation.
 
 "Oh, never mind; they won't be cross with _you_," said Tom. "You say I
--**--**--
 the utmost Maggie could do, with a fierce thrust of her small brown arm,
 was to push poor little pink-and-white Lucy into the cow-trodden mud.
 
 Then Tom could not restrain himself, and gave Maggie two smart slaps
 on the arm as he ran to pick up Lucy, who lay crying helplessly.
 Maggie retreated to the roots of a tree a few yards off, and looked on
 impenitently. Usually her repentance came quickly after one rash deed,
 but now Tom and Lucy had made her so miserable, she was glad to spoil
 their happiness,--glad to make everybody uncomfortable. Why should she
 be sorry? Tom was very slow to forgive _her_, however sorry she might
 have been.
 
 "I shall tell mother, you know, Miss Mag," said Tom, loudly and
 emphatically, as soon as Lucy was up and ready to walk away. It was
 not Tom's practice to "tell," but here justice clearly demanded that
 Maggie should be visited with the utmost punishment; not that Tom had
 learned to put his views in that abstract form; he never mentioned
 "justice," and had no idea that his desire to punish might be called
 by that fine name. Lucy was too entirely absorbed by the evil that had
 befallen her,--the spoiling of her pretty best clothes, and the
 discomfort of being wet and dirty,--to think much of the cause, which
 was entirely mysterious to her. She could never have guessed what she
 had done to make Maggie angry with her; but she felt that Maggie was
 very unkind and disagreeable, and made no magnanimous entreaties to
 Tom that he would not "tell," only running along by his side and
 crying piteously, while Maggie sat on the roots of the tree and looked
 after them with her small Medusa face.
 
 "Sally," said Tom, when they reached the kitchen door, and Sally
--**--**--
 donkey, sat up and stared at her without offering any salutation. At
 last the old woman said,--
 
 "What! my pretty lady, are you come to stay with us? Sit ye down and
 tell us where you come from."
 
 It was just like a story; Maggie liked to be called pretty lady and
 treated in this way. She sat down and said,--
 
 "I'm come from home because I'm unhappy, and I mean to be a gypsy.
 I'll live with you if you like, and I can teach you a great many
 things."
 
 "Such a clever little lady," said the woman with the baby sitting down
 by Maggie, and allowing baby to crawl; "and such a pretty bonnet and
 frock," she added, taking off Maggie's bonnet and looking at it while
 she made an observation to the old woman, in the unknown language. The
 tall girl snatched the bonnet and put it on her own head hind-foremost
 with a grin; but Maggie was determined not to show any weakness on
 this subject, as if she were susceptible about her bonnet.
 
 "I don't want to wear a bonnet," she said; "I'd rather wear a red
 handkerchief, like yours" (looking at her friend by her side). "My
 hair was quite long till yesterday, when I cut it off; but I dare say
 it will grow again very soon," she added apologetically, thinking it
 probable the gypsies had a strong prejudice in favor of long hair. And
 Maggie had forgotten even her hunger at that moment in the desire to
 conciliate gypsy opinion.
 
 "Oh, what a nice little lady!--and rich, I'm sure," said the old
 woman. "Didn't you live in a beautiful house at home?"
 
 "Yes, my home is pretty, and I'm very fond of the river, where we go
 fishing, but I'm often very unhappy. I should have liked to bring my
--**--**--
 did not stop there.
 
 At last--oh, sight of joy!--this lane, the longest in the world, was
 coming to an end, was opening on a broad highroad, where there was
 actually a coach passing! And there was a finger-post at the
 corner,--she had surely seen that finger-post before,--"To St. Ogg's,
 2 miles." The gypsy really meant to take her home, then; he was
 probably a good man, after all, and might have been rather hurt at the
 thought that she didn't like coming with him alone. This idea became
 stronger as she felt more and more certain that she knew the road
 quite well, and she was considering how she might open a conversation
 with the injured gypsy, and not only gratify his feelings but efface
 the impression of her cowardice, when, as they reached a cross-road.
 Maggie caught sight of some one coming on a white-faced horse.
 
 "Oh, stop, stop!" she cried out. "There's my father! Oh, father,
 father!"
 
 The sudden joy was almost painful, and before her father reached her,
 she was sobbing. Great was Mr. Tulliver's wonder, for he had made a
 round from Basset, and had not yet been home.
 
 "Why, what's the meaning o' this?" he said, checking his horse, while
 Maggie slipped from the donkey and ran to her father's stirrup.
 
 "The little miss lost herself, I reckon," said the gypsy. "She'd come
 to our tent at the far end o' Dunlow Lane, and I was bringing her
 where she said her home was. It's a good way to come after being on
 the tramp all day."
 
 "Oh yes, father, he's been very good to bring me home," said
 Maggie,--"a very kind, good man!"
 
 "Here, then, my man," said Mr. Tulliver, taking out five shillings.
 "It's the best day's work _you_ ever did. I couldn't afford to lose
--**--**--
 pocket, and was quite zealous in trying to induce indifferent
 acquaintances to adopt a cheap substitute for blacking. This
 inalienable habit of saving, as an end in itself, belonged to the
 industrious men of business of a former generation, who made their
 fortunes slowly, almost as the tracking of the fox belongs to the
 harrier,--it constituted them a "race," which is nearly lost in these
 days of rapid money-getting, when lavishness comes close on the back
 of want. In old-fashioned times an "independence" was hardly ever made
 without a little miserliness as a condition, and you would have found
 that quality in every provincial district, combined with characters as
 various as the fruits from which we can extract acid. The true
 Harpagons were always marked and exceptional characters; not so the
 worthy tax-payers, who, having once pinched from real necessity,
 retained even in the midst of their comfortable retirement, with their
 wallfruit and wine-bins, the habit of regarding life as an ingenious
 process of nibbling out one's livelihood without leaving any
 perceptible deficit, and who would have been as immediately prompted
 to give up a newly taxed luxury when they had had their clear five
 hundred a year, as when they had only five hundred pounds of capital.
 Mr. Glegg was one of these men, found so impracticable by chancellors
 of the exchequer; and knowing this, you will be the better able to
 understand why he had not swerved from the conviction that he had made
 an eligible marriage, in spite of the too-pungent seasoning that
 nature had given to the eldest Miss Dodson's virtues. A man with an
 affectionate disposition, who finds a wife to concur with his
 fundamental idea of life, easily comes to persuade himself that no
 other woman would have suited him so well, and does a little daily
--**--**--
 
 Here Mrs. Glegg's voice intimated that she was going to cry, and
 breaking off from speech, she rang the bell violently.
 
 "Sally," she said, rising from her chair, and speaking in rather a
 choked voice, "light a fire up-stairs, and put the blinds down. Mr.
 Glegg, you'll please to order what you'd like for dinner. I shall have
 gruel."
 
 Mrs. Glegg walked across the room to the small book-case, and took
 down Baxter's "Saints' Everlasting Rest," which she carried with her
 up-stairs. It was the book she was accustomed to lay open before her
 on special occasions,--on wet Sunday mornings, or when she heard of a
 death in the family, or when, as in this case, her quarrel with Mr.
 Glegg had been set an octave higher than usual.
 
 But Mrs. Glegg carried something else up-stairs with her, which,
 together with the "Saints' Rest" and the gruel, may have had some
 influence in gradually calming her feelings, and making it possible
 for her to endure existence on the ground-floor, shortly before
 tea-time. This was, partly, Mr. Glegg's suggestion that she would do
 well to let her five hundred lie still until a good investment turned
 up; and, further, his parenthetic hint at his handsome provision for
 her in case of his death. Mr. Glegg, like all men of his stamp, was
 extremely reticent about his will; and Mrs. Glegg, in her gloomier
 moments, had forebodings that, like other husbands of whom she had
 heard, he might cherish the mean project of heightening her grief at
 his death by leaving her poorly off, in which case she was firmly
 resolved that she would have scarcely any weeper on her bonnet, and
 would cry no more than if he had been a second husband. But if he had
 really shown her any testamentary tenderness, it would be affecting to
--**--**--
 Tulliver, and ask his pardon for showing him favors; but I shall bear
 no malice, and when Mr. Tulliver speaks civil to me, I'll speak civil
 to him. Nobody has any call to tell me what's becoming."
 
 Finding it unnecessary to plead for the Tullivers, it was natural that
 aunt Pullet should relax a little in her anxiety for them, and recur
 to the annoyance she had suffered yesterday from the offspring of that
 apparently ill-fated house. Mrs. Glegg heard a circumstantial
 narrative, to which Mr. Pullet's remarkable memory furnished some
 items; and while aunt Pullet pitied poor Bessy's bad luck with her
 children, and expressed a half-formed project of paying for Maggie's
 being sent to a distant boarding-school, which would not prevent her
 being so brown, but might tend to subdue some other vices in her, aunt
 Glegg blamed Bessy for her weakness, and appealed to all witnesses who
 should be living when the Tulliver children had turned out ill, that
 she, Mrs. Glegg, had always said how it would be from the very first,
 observing that it was wonderful to herself how all her words came
 true.
 
 "Then I may call and tell Bessy you'll bear no malice, and everything
 be as it was before?" Mrs. Pullet said, just before parting.
 
 "Yes, you may, Sophy," said Mrs. Glegg; "you may tell Mr. Tulliver,
 and Bessy too, as I'm not going to behave ill because folks behave ill
 to me; I know it's my place, as the eldest, to set an example in every
 respect, and I do it. Nobody can say different of me, if they'll keep
 to the truth."
 
 Mrs. Glegg being in this state of satisfaction in her own lofty
 magnanimity, I leave you to judge what effect was produced on her by
 the reception of a short letter from Mr. Tulliver that very evening,
--**--**--
 As for Mrs. Tulliver, finding that Mrs. Stelling's views as to the
 airing of linen and the frequent recurrence of hunger in a growing boy
 entirely coincided with her own; moreover, that Mrs. Stelling, though
 so young a woman, and only anticipating her second confinement, had
 gone through very nearly the same experience as herself with regard to
 the behavior and fundamental character of the monthly nurse,--she
 expressed great contentment to her husband, when they drove away, at
 leaving Tom with a woman who, in spite of her youth, seemed quite
 sensible and motherly, and asked advice as prettily as could be.
 
 "They must be very well off, though," said Mrs. Tulliver, "for
 everything's as nice as can be all over the house, and that watered
 silk she had on cost a pretty penny. Sister Pullet has got one like
 it."
 
 "Ah," said Mr. Tulliver, "he's got some income besides the curacy, I
 reckon. Perhaps her father allows 'em something. There's Tom 'ull be
 another hundred to him, and not much trouble either, by his own
 account; he says teaching comes natural to him. That's wonderful,
 now," added Mr. Tulliver, turning his head on one side, and giving his
 horse a meditative tickling on the flank.
 
 Perhaps it was because teaching came naturally to Mr. Stelling, that
 he set about it with that uniformity of method and independence of
 circumstances which distinguish the actions of animals understood to
 be under the immediate teaching of nature. Mr. Broderip's amiable
 beaver, as that charming naturalist tells us, busied himself as
 earnestly in constructing a dam, in a room up three pair of stairs in
 London, as if he had been laying his foundation in a stream or lake in
 Upper Canada. It was "Binny's" function to build; the absence of water
--**--**--
 exercise in long walks with himself, and next half-year Mr. Stelling
 would see about having a drilling-master. Among the many means whereby
 Mr. Stelling intended to be more fortunate than the bulk of his
 fellow-men, he had entirely given up that of having his own way in his
 own house. What then? He had married "as kind a little soul as ever
 breathed," according to Mr. Riley, who had been acquainted with Mrs.
 Stelling's blond ringlets and smiling demeanor throughout her maiden
 life, and on the strength of that knowledge would have been ready any
 day to pronounce that whatever domestic differences might arise in her
 married life must be entirely Mr. Stelling's fault.
 
 If Tom had had a worse disposition, he would certainly have hated the
 little cherub Laura, but he was too kind-hearted a lad for that; there
 was too much in him of the fibre that turns to true manliness, and to
 protecting pity for the weak. I am afraid he hated Mrs. Stelling, and
 contracted a lasting dislike to pale blond ringlets and broad plaits,
 as directly associated with haughtiness of manner, and a frequent
 reference to other people's "duty." But he couldn't help playing with
 little Laura, and liking to amuse her; he even sacrificed his
 percussion-caps for her sake, in despair of their ever serving a
 greater purpose,--thinking the small flash and bang would delight her,
 and thereby drawing down on himself a rebuke from Mrs. Stelling for
 teaching her child to play with fire. Laura was a sort of
 playfellow--and oh, how Tom longed for playfellows! In his secret
 heart he yearned to have Maggie with him, and was almost ready to dote
 on her exasperating acts of forgetfulness; though, when he was at
 home, he always represented it as a great favor on his part to let
--**--**--
 still in imagination to be tossing it out of her eyes. "It makes you
 look as if you were crazy."
 
 "Oh, I can't help it," said Maggie, impatiently. "Don't tease me, Tom.
 Oh, what books!" she exclaimed, as she saw the bookcases in the study.
 "How I should like to have as many books as that!"
 
 "Why, you couldn't read one of 'em," said Tom, triumphantly. "They're
 all Latin."
 
 "No, they aren't," said Maggie. "I can read the back of
 this,--'History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire.'"
 
 "Well, what does that mean? _You_ don't know," said Tom, wagging his
 head.
 
 "But I could soon find out," said Maggie, scornfully.
 
 "Why, how?"
 
 "I should look inside, and see what it was about."
 
 "You'd better not, Miss Maggie," said Tom, seeing her hand on the
 volume. "Mr. Stelling lets nobody touch his books without leave, and
 _I_ shall catch it, if you take it out."
 
 "Oh, very well. Let me see all _your_ books, then," said Maggie,
 turning to throw her arms round Tom's neck, and rub his cheek with her
 small round nose.
 
 Tom, in the gladness of his heart at having dear old Maggie to dispute
 with and crow over again, seized her round the waist, and began to
 jump with her round the large library table. Away they jumped with
 more and more vigor, till Maggie's hair flew from behind her ears, and
 twirled about like an animated mop. But the revolutions round the
 table became more and more irregular in their sweep, till at last
 reaching Mr. Stelling's reading stand, they sent it thundering down
 with its heavy lexicons to the floor. Happily it was the ground-floor,
 and the study was a one-storied wing to the house, so that the
 downfall made no alarming resonance, though Tom stood dizzy and aghast
--**--**--
 penetrable by no star," when Tom called out,--
 
 "Now, then, Magsie, give us the Grammar!"
 
 "Oh, Tom, it's such a pretty book!" she said, as she jumped out of the
 large arm-chair to give it him; "it's much prettier than the
 Dictionary. I could learn Latin very soon. I don't think it's at all
 hard."
 
 "Oh, I know what you've been doing," said Tom; "you've been reading
 the English at the end. Any donkey can do that."
 
 Tom seized the book and opened it with a determined and business-like
 air, as much as to say that he had a lesson to learn which no donkeys
 would find themselves equal to. Maggie, rather piqued, turned to the
 bookcases to amuse herself with puzzling out the titles.
 
 Presently Tom called to her: "Here, Magsie, come and hear if I can say
 this. Stand at that end of the table, where Mr. Stelling sits when he
 hears me."
 
 Maggie obeyed, and took the open book.
 
 "Where do you begin, Tom?"
 
 "Oh, I begin at _'Appellativa arborum,'_ because I say all over again
 what I've been learning this week."
 
 Tom sailed along pretty well for three lines; and Maggie was beginning
 to forget her office of prompter in speculating as to what _mas_ could
 mean, which came twice over, when he stuck fast at _Sunt etiam
 volucrum_.
 
 "Don't tell me, Maggie; _Sunt etiam volucrum_--_Sunt etiam
 volucrum_--_ut ostrea, cetus_----"
 
 "No," said Maggie, opening her mouth and shaking her head.
 
 "_Sunt etiam volucrum_," said Tom, very slowly, as if the next words
 might be expected to come sooner when he gave them this strong hint
 that they were waited for.
 
 "C, e, u," said Maggie, getting impatient.
 
 "Oh, I know--hold your tongue," said Tom. "_Ceu passer, hirundo;
 Ferarum_--_ferarum_----" Tom took his pencil and made several hard
--**--**--
 Grammar. The astronomer who hated women generally caused her so much
 puzzling speculation that she one day asked Mr. Stelling if all
 astronomers hated women, or whether it was only this particular
 astronomer. But forestalling his answer, she said,--
 
 "I suppose it's all astronomers; because, you know, they live up in
 high towers, and if the women came there they might talk and hinder
 them from looking at the stars."
 
 Mr. Stelling liked her prattle immensely, and they were on the best
 terms. She told Tom she should like to go to school to Mr. Stelling,
 as he did, and learn just the same things. She knew she could do
 Euclid, for she had looked into it again, and she saw what A B C
 meant; they were the names of the lines.
 
 "I'm sure you couldn't do it, now," said Tom; "and I'll just ask Mr.
 Stelling if you could."
 
 "I don't mind," said the little conceited minx, "I'll ask him myself."
 
 "Mr. Stelling," she said, that same evening when they were in the
 drawing-room, "couldn't I do Euclid, and all Tom's lessons, if you
 were to teach me instead of him?"
 
 "No, you couldn't," said Tom, indignantly. "Girls can't do Euclid; can
 they, sir?"
 
 "They can pick up a little of everything, I dare say," said Mr.
 Stelling. "They've a great deal of superficial cleverness; but they
 couldn't go far into anything. They're quick and shallow."
 
 Tom, delighted with this verdict, telegraphed his triumph by wagging
 his head at Maggie, behind Mr. Stelling's chair. As for Maggie, she
 had hardly ever been so mortified. She had been so proud to be called
 "quick" all her little life, and now it appeared that this quickness
 was the brand of inferiority. It would have been better to be slow,
--**--**--
 
 The particular embodiment of the evil principle now exciting Mr.
 Tulliver's determined resistance was Mr. Pivart, who, having lands
 higher up the Ripple, was taking measures for their irrigation, which
 either were, or would be, or were bound to be (on the principle that
 water was water), an infringement on Mr. Tulliver's legitimate share
 of water-power. Dix, who had a mill on the stream, was a feeble
 auxiliary of Old Harry compared with Pivart. Dix had been brought to
 his senses by arbitration, and Wakem's advice had not carried _him_
 far. No; Dix, Mr. Tulliver considered, had been as good as nowhere in
 point of law; and in the intensity of his indignation against Pivart,
 his contempt for a baffled adversary like Dix began to wear the air of
 a friendly attachment. He had no male audience to-day except Mr. Moss,
 who knew nothing, as he said, of the "natur' o' mills," and could only
 assent to Mr. Tulliver's arguments on the _a priori_ ground of family
 relationship and monetary obligation; but Mr. Tulliver did not talk
 with the futile intention of convincing his audience, he talked to
 relieve himself; while good Mr. Moss made strong efforts to keep his
 eyes wide open, in spite of the sleepiness which an unusually good
 dinner produced in his hard-worked frame. Mrs. Moss, more alive to the
 subject, and interested in everything that affected her brother,
 listened and put in a word as often as maternal preoccupations
 allowed.
 
 "Why, Pivart's a new name hereabout, brother, isn't it?" she said; "he
 didn't own the land in father's time, nor yours either, before I was
 married."
 
 "New name? Yes, I should think it _is_ a new name," said Mr. Tulliver,
 with angry emphasis. "Dorlcote Mill's been in our family a hundred
 year and better, and nobody ever heard of a Pivart meddling with the
--**--**--
 easy on the point. It would have been much clearer if the lawyer's son
 had not been deformed, for then Tom would have had the prospect of
 pitching into him with all that freedom which is derived from a high
 moral sanction.
 
 
 
 Chapter III
 
 The New Schoolfellow
 
 
 It was a cold, wet January day on which Tom went back to school; a day
 quite in keeping with this severe phase of his destiny. If he had not
 carried in his pocket a parcel of sugar-candy and a small Dutch doll
 for little Laura, there would have been no ray of expected pleasure to
 enliven the general gloom. But he liked to think how Laura would put
 out her lips and her tiny hands for the bits of sugarcandy; and to
 give the greater keenness to these pleasures of imagination, he took
 out the parcel, made a small hole in the paper, and bit off a crystal
 or two, which had so solacing an effect under the confined prospect
 and damp odors of the gig-umbrella, that he repeated the process more
 than once on his way.
 
 "Well, Tulliver, we're glad to see you again," said Mr. Stelling,
 heartily. "Take off your wrappings and come into the study till
 dinner. You'll find a bright fire there, and a new companion."
 
 Tom felt in an uncomfortable flutter as he took off his woollen
 comforter and other wrappings. He had seen Philip Wakem at St. Ogg's,
 but had always turned his eyes away from him as quickly as possible.
 He would have disliked having a deformed boy for his companion, even
 if Philip had not been the son of a bad man. And Tom did not see how a
 bad man's son could be very good. His own father was a good man, and
--**--**--
 
 
 
 Chapter IV
 
 "The Young Idea"
 
 
 The alterations of feeling in that first dialogue between Tom and
 Philip continued to make their intercourse even after many weeks of
 schoolboy intimacy. Tom never quite lost the feeling that Philip,
 being the son of a "rascal," was his natural enemy; never thoroughly
 overcame his repulsion to Philip's deformity. He was a boy who adhered
 tenaciously to impressions once received; as with all minds in which
 mere perception predominates over thought and emotion, the external
 remained to him rigidly what it was in the first instance. But then it
 was impossible not to like Philip's company when he was in a good
 humor; he could help one so well in one's Latin exercises, which Tom
 regarded as a kind of puzzle that could only be found out by a lucky
 chance; and he could tell such wonderful fighting stories about Hal of
 the Wynd, for example, and other heroes who were especial favorites
 with Tom, because they laid about them with heavy strokes. He had
 small opinion of Saladin, whose cimeter could cut a cushion in two in
 an instant; who wanted to cut cushions? That was a stupid story, and
 he didn't care to hear it again. But when Robert Bruce, on the black
 pony, rose in his stirrups, and lifting his good battle-axe, cracked
 at once the helmet and the skull of the too hasty knight at
 Bannockburn, then Tom felt all the exaltation of sympathy, and if he
 had had a cocoanut at hand, he would have cracked it at once with the
 poker. Philip in his happier moods indulged Tom to the top of his
 bent, heightening the crash and bang and fury of every fight with all
 the artillery of epithets and similes at his command. But he was not
--**--**--
 of Mrs. Stelling, who was probably not far off, was an offence only to
 be wiped out by twenty lines of Virgil. In fact, that lady did
 presently descend from her room, in double wonder at the noise and the
 subsequent cessation of Philip's music. She found him sitting in a
 heap on the hassock, and crying bitterly.
 
 "What's the matter, Wakem? what was that noise about? Who slammed the
 door?"
 
 Philip looked up, and hastily dried his eyes. "It was Tulliver who
 came in--to ask me to go out with him."
 
 "And what are you in trouble about?" said Mrs. Stelling.
 
 Philip was not her favorite of the two pupils; he was less obliging
 than Tom, who was made useful in many ways. Still, his father paid
 more than Mr. Tulliver did, and she meant him to feel that she behaved
 exceedingly well to him. Philip, however, met her advances toward a
 good understanding very much as a caressed mollusk meets an invitation
 to show himself out of his shell. Mrs. Stelling was not a loving,
 tender-hearted woman; she was a woman whose skirt sat well, who
 adjusted her waist and patted her curls with a preoccupied air when
 she inquired after your welfare. These things, doubtless, represent a
 great social power, but it is not the power of love; and no other
 power could win Philip from his personal reserve.
 
 He said, in answer to her question, "My toothache came on, and made me
 hysterical again."
 
 This had been the fact once, and Philip was glad of the recollection;
 it was like an inspiration to enable him to excuse his crying. He had
 to accept eau-de-Cologne and to refuse creosote in consequence; but
 that was easy.
 
 Meanwhile Tom, who had for the first time sent a poisoned arrow into
--**--**--
 
 "And let me see, now, whether you can draw it out of the sheath
 without hurting yourself." That process having been gone through more
 than once, Mr. Poulter felt that he had acted with scrupulous
 conscientiousness, and said, "Well, now, Master Tulliver, if I take
 the crown-piece, it is to make sure as you'll do no mischief with the
 sword."
 
 "Oh no, indeed, Mr. Poulter," said Tom, delightedly handing him the
 crown-piece, and grasping the sword, which, he thought, might have
 been lighter with advantage.
 
 "But if Mr. Stelling catches you carrying it in?" said Mr. Poulter,
 pocketing the crown-piece provisionally while he raised this new
 doubt.
 
 "Oh, he always keeps in his upstairs study on Saturday afternoon,"
 said Tom, who disliked anything sneaking, but was not disinclined to a
 little stratagem in a worthy cause. So he carried off the sword in
 triumph mixed with dread--dread that he might encounter Mr. or Mrs.
 Stelling--to his bedroom, where, after some consideration, he hid it
 in the closet behind some hanging clothes. That night he fell asleep
 in the thought that he would astonish Maggie with it when she
 came,--tie it round his waist with his red comforter, and make her
 believe that the sword was his own, and that he was going to be a
 soldier. There was nobody but Maggie who would be silly enough to
 believe him, or whom he dared allow to know he had a sword; and Maggie
 was really coming next week to see Tom, before she went to a
 boarding-school with Lucy.
 
 If you think a lad of thirteen would have been so childish, you must
 be an exceptionally wise man, who, although you are devoted to a civil
 calling, requiring you to look bland rather than formidable, yet
 never, since you had a beard, threw yourself into a martial attitude,
--**--**--
 
 "Oh, yes, better," she answered immediately. "No, not better; because
 I don't think I _could_ love you better than Tom. But I should be so
 sorry,--_so sorry_ for you."
 
 Philip colored; he had meant to imply, would she love him as well in
 spite of his deformity, and yet when she alluded to it so plainly, he
 winced under her pity. Maggie, young as she was, felt her mistake.
 Hitherto she had instinctively behaved as if she were quite
 unconscious of Philip's deformity; her own keen sensitiveness and
 experience under family criticism sufficed to teach her this as well
 as if she had been directed by the most finished breeding.
 
 "But you are so very clever, Philip, and you can play and sing," she
 added quickly. "I wish you _were_ my brother. I'm very fond of you.
 And you would stay at home with me when Tom went out, and you would
 teach me everything; wouldn't you,--Greek and everything?"
 
 "But you'll go away soon, and go to school, Maggie," said Philip, "and
 then you'll forget all about me, and not care for me any more. And
 then I shall see you when you're grown up, and you'll hardly take any
 notice of me."
 
 "Oh, no, I sha'n't forget you, I'm sure," said Maggie, shaking her
 head very seriously. "I never forget anything, and I think about
 everybody when I'm away from them. I think about poor Yap; he's got a
 lump in his throat, and Luke says he'll die. Only don't you tell Tom.
 because it will vex him so. You never saw Yap; he's a queer little
 dog,--nobody cares about him but Tom and me."
 
 "Do you care as much about me as you do about Yap, Maggie?" said
 Philip, smiling rather sadly.
 
 "Oh, yes, I should think so," said Maggie, laughing.
--**--**--
 Anxiety about the future had never entered Tom's mind. His father had
 always ridden a good horse, kept a good house, and had the cheerful,
 confident air of a man who has plenty of property to fall back upon.
 Tom had never dreamed that his father would "fail"; _that_ was a form
 of misfortune which he had always heard spoken of as a deep disgrace,
 and disgrace was an idea that he could not associate with any of his
 relations, least of all with his father. A proud sense of family
 respectability was part of the very air Tom had been born and brought
 up in. He knew there were people in St. Ogg's who made a show without
 money to support it, and he had always heard such people spoken of by
 his own friends with contempt and reprobation. He had a strong belief,
 which was a lifelong habit, and required no definite evidence to rest
 on, that his father could spend a great deal of money if he chose; and
 since his education at Mr. Stelling's had given him a more expensive
 view of life, he had often thought that when he got older he would
 make a figure in the world, with his horse and dogs and saddle, and
 other accoutrements of a fine young man, and show himself equal to any
 of his contemporaries at St. Ogg's, who might consider themselves a
 grade above him in society because their fathers were professional
 men, or had large oil-mills. As to the prognostics and headshaking of
 his aunts and uncles, they had never produced the least effect on him,
 except to make him think that aunts and uncles were disagreeable
 society; he had heard them find fault in much the same way as long as
 he could remember. His father knew better than they did.
--**--**--
 still.
 
 Mr. Tulliver was still predominating, in his own imagination, as he
 approached St. Ogg's, through which he had to pass on his way
 homeward. But what was it that suggested to him, as he saw the Laceham
 coach entering the town, to follow it to the coach-office, and get the
 clerk there to write a letter, requiring Maggie to come home the very
 next day? Mr. Tulliver's own hand shook too much under his excitement
 for him to write himself, and he wanted the letter to be given to the
 coachman to deliver at Miss Firniss's school in the morning. There was
 a craving which he would not account for to himself, to have Maggie
 near him, without delay,--she must come back by the coach to-morrow.
 
 To Mrs. Tulliver, when he got home, he would admit no difficulties,
 and scolded down her burst of grief on hearing that the lawsuit was
 lost, by angry assertions that there was nothing to grieve about. He
 said nothing to her that night about the bill of sale and the
 application to Mrs. Pullet, for he had kept her in ignorance of the
 nature of that transaction, and had explained the necessity for taking
 an inventory of the goods as a matter connected with his will. The
 possession of a wife conspicuously one's inferior in intellect is,
 like other high privileges, attended with a few inconveniences, and,
 among the rest, with the occasional necessity for using a little
 deception.
 
 The next day Mr. Tulliver was again on horseback in the afternoon, on
 his way to Mr. Gore's office at St. Ogg's. Gore was to have seen
 Furley in the morning, and to have sounded him in relation to Mr.
 Tulliver's affairs. But he had not gone half-way when he met a clerk
--**--**--
 and to care about anything but dear father himself!--when he's lying
 there, and may never speak to us again. Tom, you ought to say so too;
 you ought not to let any one find fault with my father."
 
 Maggie, almost choked with mingled grief and anger, left the room, and
 took her old place on her father's bed. Her heart went out to him with
 a stronger movement than ever, at the thought that people would blame
 him. Maggie hated blame; she had been blamed all her life, and nothing
 had come of it but evil tempers.
 
 Her father had always defended and excused her, and her loving
 remembrance of his tenderness was a force within her that would enable
 her to do or bear anything for his sake.
 
 Tom was a little shocked at Maggie's outburst,--telling _him_ as well
 as his mother what it was right to do! She ought to have learned
 better than have those hectoring, assuming manners, by this time. But
 he presently went into his father's room, and the sight there touched
 him in a way that effaced the slighter impressions of the previous
 hour. When Maggie saw how he was moved, she went to him and put her
 arm round his neck as he sat by the bed, and the two children forgot
 everything else in the sense that they had one father and one sorrow.
 
 
 
 Chapter III
 
 The Family Council
 
 
 It was at eleven o'clock the next morning that the aunts and uncles
 came to hold their consultation. The fire was lighted in the large
 parlor, and poor Mrs. Tulliver, with a confused impression that it was
 a great occasion, like a funeral, unbagged the bell-rope tassels, and
 unpinned the curtains, adjusting them in proper folds, looking round
 and shaking her head sadly at the polished tops and legs of the
--**--**--
 on."
 
 "I wish it could be managed so as my teapot and chany and the best
 castors needn't be put up for sale," said poor Mrs. Tulliver,
 beseechingly, "and the sugar-tongs the first things ever I bought."
 
 "But that can't be helped, you know," said Mr. Glegg. "If one o' the
 family chooses to buy 'em in, they can, but one thing must be bid for
 as well as another."
 
 "And it isn't to be looked for," said uncle Pullet, with unwonted
 independence of idea, "as your own family should pay more for things
 nor they'll fetch. They may go for an old song by auction."
 
 "Oh dear, oh dear," said Mrs. Tulliver, "to think o' my chany being
 sold i' that way, and I bought it when I was married, just as you did
 yours, Jane and Sophy; and I know you didn't like mine, because o' the
 sprig, but I was fond of it; and there's never been a bit broke, for
 I've washed it myself; and there's the tulips on the cups, and the
 roses, as anybody might go and look at 'em for pleasure. You wouldn't
 like _your_ chany to go for an old song and be broke to pieces, though
 yours has got no color in it, Jane,--it's all white and fluted, and
 didn't cost so much as mine. And there's the castors, sister Deane, I
 can't think but you'd like to have the castors, for I've heard you say
 they're pretty."
 
 "Well, I've no objection to buy some of the best things," said Mrs.
 Deane, rather loftily; "we can do with extra things in our house."
 
 "Best things!" exclaimed Mrs. Glegg, with severity, which had gathered
 intensity from her long silence. "It drives me past patience to hear
 you all talking o' best things, and buying in this, that, and the
--**--**--
 reached her, then"; and she went out to open the door, Maggie eagerly
 following her.
 
 "That's fortunate," said Mrs. Glegg. "She can agree to the list o'
 things to be bought in. It's but right she should do her share when
 it's her own brother."
 
 Mrs. Moss was in too much agitation to resist Mrs. Tulliver's
 movement, as she drew her into the parlor automatically, without
 reflecting that it was hardly kind to take her among so many persons
 in the first painful moment of arrival. The tall, worn, dark-haired
 woman was a strong contrast to the Dodson sisters as she entered in
 her shabby dress, with her shawl and bonnet looking as if they had
 been hastily huddled on, and with that entire absence of
 self-consciousness which belongs to keenly felt trouble. Maggie was
 clinging to her arm; and Mrs. Moss seemed to notice no one else except
 Tom, whom she went straight up to and took by the hand.
 
 "Oh, my dear children," she burst out, "you've no call to think well
 o' me; I'm a poor aunt to you, for I'm one o' them as take all and
 give nothing. How's my poor brother?"
 
 "Mr. Turnbull thinks he'll get better," said Maggie. "Sit down, aunt
 Gritty. Don't fret."
 
 "Oh, my sweet child, I feel torn i' two," said Mrs. Moss, allowing
 Maggie to lead her to the sofa, but still not seeming to notice the
 presence of the rest. "We've three hundred pounds o' my brother's
 money, and now he wants it, and you all want it, poor things!--and yet
 we must be sold up to pay it, and there's my poor children,--eight of
 'em, and the little un of all can't speak plain. And I feel as if I
 was a robber. But I'm sure I'd no thought as my brother----"
--**--**--
 who had been making haste with his lozenge in order to express his
 amazement,--"making away with a note! I should think anybody could set
 the constable on you for it."
 
 "Well, but," said Mrs. Tulliver, "if the note's worth all that money,
 why can't we pay it away, and save my things from going away? We've no
 call to meddle with your uncle and aunt Moss, Tom, if you think your
 father 'ud be angry when he gets well."
 
 Mrs. Tulliver had not studied the question of exchange, and was
 straining her mind after original ideas on the subject.
 
 "Pooh, pooh, pooh! you women don't understand these things," said
 uncle Glegg. "There's no way o' making it safe for Mr. and Mrs. Moss
 but destroying the note."
 
 "Then I hope you'll help me do it, uncle," said Tom, earnestly. "If my
 father shouldn't get well, I should be very unhappy to think anything
 had been done against his will that I could hinder. And I'm sure he
 meant me to remember what he said that evening. I ought to obey my
 father's wish about his property."
 
 Even Mrs. Glegg could not withhold her approval from Tom's words; she
 felt that the Dodson blood was certainly speaking in him, though, if
 his father had been a Dodson, there would never have been this wicked
 alienation of money. Maggie would hardly have restrained herself from
 leaping on Tom's neck, if her aunt Moss had not prevented her by
 herself rising and taking Tom's hand, while she said, with rather a
 choked voice:
 
 "You'll never be the poorer for this, my dear boy, if there's a God
 above; and if the money's wanted for your father, Moss and me 'ull pay
 it, the same as if there was ever such security. We'll do as we'd be
--**--**--
 forever to the loud ticking of a timepiece. He preferred some other
 way of getting rich. But at last there was a change; his uncle took a
 pen and wrote something with a flourish at the end.
 
 "You'll just step up to Torry's now, Mr. Spence, will you?" said Mr.
 Deane, and the clock suddenly became less loud and deliberate in Tom's
 ears.
 
 "Well, Tom," said Mr. Deane, when they were alone, turning his
 substantial person a little in his chair, and taking out his
 snuff-box; "what's the business, my boy; what's the business?" Mr.
 Deane, who had heard from his wife what had passed the day before,
 thought Tom was come to appeal to him for some means of averting the
 sale.
 
 "I hope you'll excuse me for troubling you, uncle," said Tom,
 coloring, but speaking in a tone which, though, tremulous, had a
 certain proud independence in it; "but I thought you were the best
 person to advise me what to do."
 
 "Ah!" said Mr. Deane, reserving his pinch of snuff, and looking at Tom
 with new attention, "let us hear."
 
 "I want to get a situation, uncle, so that I may earn some money,"
 said Tom, who never fell into circumlocution.
 
 "A situation?" said Mr. Deane, and then took his pinch of snuff with
 elaborate justice to each nostril. Tom thought snuff-taking a most
 provoking habit.
 
 "Why, let me see, how old are you?" said Mr. Deane, as he threw
 himself backward again.
 
 "Sixteen; I mean, I am going in seventeen," said Tom, hoping his uncle
 noticed how much beard he had.
 
 "Let me see; your father had some notion of making you an engineer, I
 think?"
 
 "But I don't think I could get any money at that for a long while,
 could I?"
 
 "That's true; but people don't get much money at anything, my boy,
--**--**--
 
 Mr. Deane tapped his snuff-box again and screwed up his mouth; he felt
 in the position of many estimable persons when they had read the New
 Tariff, and found how many commodities were imported of which they
 knew nothing; like a cautious man of business, he was not going to
 speak rashly of a raw material in which he had had no experience. But
 the presumption was, that if it had been good for anything, so
 successful a man as himself would hardly have been ignorant of it.
 
 About Latin he had an opinion, and thought that in case of another
 war, since people would no longer wear hair-powder, it would be well
 to put a tax upon Latin, as a luxury much run upon by the higher
 classes, and not telling at all on the ship-owning department. But,
 for what he knew, the Hor Paulin might be something less neutral. On
 the whole, this list of acquirements gave him a sort of repulsion
 toward poor Tom.
 
 "Well," he said at last, in rather a cold, sardonic tone, "you've had
 three years at these things,--you must be pretty strong in 'em. Hadn't
 you better take up some line where they'll come in handy?"
 
 Tom colored, and burst out, with new energy:
 
 "I'd rather not have any employment of that sort, uncle. I don't like
 Latin and those things. I don't know what I could do with them unless
 I went as usher in a school; and I don't know them well enough for
 that! besides, I would as soon carry a pair of panniers. I don't want
 to be that sort of person. I should like to enter into some business
 where I can get on,--a manly business, where I should have to look
 after things, and get credit for what I did. And I shall want to keep
--**--**--
 wasn't afraid of handling cheeses. That's the reason I can wear good
 broadcloth now, and have my legs under the same table with the head
 of the best firms in St. Ogg's."
 
 Uncle Deane tapped his box, and seemed to expand a little under his
 waistcoat and gold chain, as he squared his shoulders in the chair.
 
 "Is there any place at liberty that you know of now, uncle, that I
 should do for? I should like to set to work at once," said Tom, with a
 slight tremor in his voice.
 
 "Stop a bit, stop a bit; we mustn't be in too great a hurry. You must
 bear in mind, if I put you in a place you're a bit young for, because
 you happen to be my nephew, I shall be responsible for you. And
 there's no better reason, you know, than your being my nephew; because
 it remains to be seen whether you're good for anything."
 
 "I hope I shall never do you any discredit, uncle," said Tom, hurt, as
 all boys are at the statement of the unpleasant truth that people feel
 no ground for trusting them. "I care about my own credit too much for
 that."
 
 "Well done, Tom, well done! That's the right spirit, and I never
 refuse to help anybody if they've a mind to do themselves justice.
 There's a young man of two-and-twenty I've got my eye on now. I shall
 do what I can for that young man; he's got some pith in him. But then,
 you see, he's made good use of his time,--a first-rate calculator,--
 can tell you the cubic contents of anything in no time, and put me up
 the other day to a new market for Swedish bark; he's uncommonly
 knowing in manufactures, that young fellow."
--**--**--
 from the bough, and bruised my shins a good un--but I got the squerril
 tight for all that, an' a scratter it was. An' this littlish blade's
 broke, you see, but I wouldn't hev a new un put in, 'cause they might
 be cheatin' me an' givin' me another knife instid, for there isn't
 such a blade i' the country,--it's got used to my hand, like. An'
 there was niver nobody else gen me nothin' but what I got by my own
 sharpness, only you, Mr. Tom; if it wasn't Bill Fawks as gen me the
 terrier pup istid o' drowndin't it, an' I had to jaw him a good un
 afore he'd give it me."
 
 Bob spoke with a sharp and rather treble volubility, and got through
 his long speech with surprising despatch, giving the blade of his
 knife an affectionate rub on his sleeve when he had finished.
 
 "Well, Bob," said Tom, with a slight air of patronage, the foregoing
 reminscences having disposed him to be as friendly as was becoming,
 though there was no part of his acquaintance with Bob that he
 remembered better than the cause of their parting quarrel; "is there
 anything I can do for you?"
 
 "Why, no, Mr. Tom," answered Bob, shutting up his knife with a click
 and returning it to his pocket, where he seemed to be feeling for
 something else. "I shouldn't ha' come back upon you now ye're i'
 trouble, an' folks say as the master, as I used to frighten the birds
 for, an' he flogged me a bit for fun when he catched me eatin' the
 turnip, as they say he'll niver lift up his head no more,--I shouldn't
 ha' come now to ax you to gi' me another knife 'cause you gen me one
 afore. If a chap gives me one black eye, that's enough for me; I
--**--**--
 turning his back on that paradisaic picture:
 
 "But I don't mind about it, not a chip! An' I'n changed one o' the
 suvreigns to buy my mother a goose for dinner, an' I'n bought a blue
 plush wescoat, an' a sealskin cap,--for if I meant to be a packman,
 I'd do it respectable. But I don't mind about it, not a chip! My yead
 isn't a turnip, an' I shall p'r'aps have a chance o' dousing another
 fire afore long. I'm a lucky chap. So I'll thank you to take the nine
 suvreigns, Mr. Tom, and set yoursen up with 'em somehow, if it's true
 as the master's broke. They mayn't go fur enough, but they'll help."
 
 Tom was touched keenly enough to forget his pride and suspicion.
 
 "You're a very kind fellow, Bob," he said, coloring, with that little
 diffident tremor in his voice which gave a certain charm even to Tom's
 pride and severity, "and I sha'n't forget you again, though I didn't
 know you this evening. But I can't take the nine sovereigns; I should
 be taking your little fortune from you, and they wouldn't do me much
 good either."
 
 "Wouldn't they, Mr. Tom?" said Bob, regretfully. "Now don't say so
 'cause you think I want 'em. I aren't a poor chap. My mother gets a
 good penn'orth wi' picking feathers an' things; an' if she eats
 nothin' but bread-an'-water, it runs to fat. An' I'm such a lucky
 chap; an' I doubt you aren't quite so lucky, Mr. Tom,--th' old master
 isn't, anyhow,--an' so you might take a slice o' my luck, an' no harm
 done. Lors! I found a leg o' pork i' the river one day; it had tumbled
 out o' one o' them round-sterned Dutchmen, I'll be bound. Come, think
 better on it, Mr. Tom, for old 'quinetance' sake, else I shall think
--**--**--
 
 "Yes, sir; Miss Elizabeth Dodson as was."
 
 "Pray be seated. You have some business with me?"
 
 "Well, sir, yes," said Mrs. Tulliver, beginning to feel alarmed at her
 own courage, now she was really in presence of the formidable man, and
 reflecting that she had not settled with herself how she should begin.
 Mr. Wakem felt in his waistcoat pockets, and looked at her in silence.
 
 "I hope, sir," she began at last,--"I hope, sir, you're not a-thinking
 as _I_ bear you any ill-will because o' my husband's losing his
 lawsuit, and the bailies being put in, and the linen being sold,--oh
 dear!--for I wasn't brought up in that way. I'm sure you remember my
 father, sir, for he was close friends with Squire Darleigh, and we
 allays went to the dances there, the Miss Dodsons,--nobody could be
 more looked on,--and justly, for there was four of us, and you're
 quite aware as Mrs. Glegg and Mrs. Deane are my sisters. And as for
 going to law and losing money, and having sales before you're dead, I
 never saw anything o' that before I was married, nor for a long while
 after. And I'm not to be answerable for my bad luck i' marrying out o'
 my own family into one where the goings-on was different. And as for
 being drawn in t' abuse you as other folks abuse you, sir, _that_ I
 niver was, and nobody can say it of me."
 
 Mrs. Tulliver shook her head a little, and looked at the hem of her
 pocket-handkerchief.
 
 "I've no doubt of what you say, Mrs. Tulliver," said Mr. Wakem, with
 cold politeness. "But you have some question to ask me?"
 
 "Well, sir, yes. But that's what I've said to myself,--I've said you'd
 had some nat'ral feeling; and as for my husband, as hasn't been
--**--**--
 uncomplimentary miller; and now Mrs. Tulliver had put the notion into
 his head, it presented itself to him as a pleasure to do the very
 thing that would cause Mr. Tulliver the most deadly mortification,--
 and a pleasure of a complex kind, not made up of crude malice, but
 mingling with it the relish of self-approbation. To see an enemy
 humiliated gives a certain contentment, but this is jejune compared
 with the highly blent satisfaction of seeing him humiliated by your
 benevolent action or concession on his behalf. That is a sort of
 revenge which falls into the scale of virtue, and Wakem was not without
 an intention of keeping that scale respectably filled. He had once
 had the pleasure of putting an old enemy of his into one of the St.
 Ogg's alms-houses, to the rebuilding of which he had given a large
 subscription; and here was an opportunity of providing for another by
 making him his own servant. Such things give a completeness to
 prosperity, and contribute elements of agreeable consciousness that
 are not dreamed of by that short-sighted, overheated vindictiveness
 which goes out its way to wreak itself in direct injury. And Tulliver,
 with his rough tongue filed by a sense of obligation, would make a
 better servant than any chance-fellow who was cap-in-hand for a
 situation. Tulliver was known to be a man of proud honesty, and Wakem
 was too acute not to believe in the existence of honesty. He was given
 too observing individuals, not to judging of them according to maxims,
 and no one knew better than he that all men were not like himself.
 Besides, he intended to overlook the whole business of land and mill
 pretty closely; he was fond of these practical rural matters. But
 there were good reasons for purchasing Dorlcote Mill, quite apart from
--**--**--
 heroic labors, than endure perpetual appeals to his pity, for evils
 over which he can make no conquest.
 
 Mr. Tulliver paused just inside the door, resting on Luke, and looking
 round him at all the bare places, which for him were filled with the
 shadows of departed objects,--the daily companions of his life. His
 faculties seemed to be renewing their strength from getting a footing
 on this demonstration of the senses.
 
 "Ah!" he said slowly, moving toward his chair, "they've sold me
 up--they've sold me up."
 
 Then seating himself, and laying down his stick, while Luke left the
 room, he looked round again.
 
 "They've left the big Bible," he said. "It's got everything in,--when
 I was born and married; bring it me, Tom."
 
 The quarto Bible was laid open before him at the fly-leaf, and while
 he was reading with slowly travelling eyes Mrs. Tulliver entered the
 room, but stood in mute surprise to find her husband down already, and
 with the great Bible before him.
 
 "Ah," he said, looking at a spot where his finger rested, "my mother
 was Margaret Beaton; she died when she was forty-seven,--hers wasn't a
 long-lived family; we're our mother's children, Gritty and me are,--we
 shall go to our last bed before long."
 
 He seemed to be pausing over the record of his sister's birth and
 marriage, as if it were suggesting new thoughts to him; then he
 suddenly looked up at Tom, and said, in a sharp tone of alarm:
 
 "They haven't come upo' Moss for the money as I lent him, have they?"
 
 "No, father," said Tom; "the note was burnt."
 
 Mr. Tulliver turned his eyes on the page again, and presently said:
 
 "Ah--Elizabeth Dodson--it's eighteen year since I married her----"
 
 "Come next Ladyday," said Mrs. Tulliver, going up to his side and
--**--**--
 recollections into a painful meditation on the choice of hardships
 before him. Maggie noticed that he was unusually absent that evening
 at tea; and afterward he sat leaning forward in his chair, looking at
 the ground, moving his lips, and shaking his head from time to time.
 Then he looked hard at Mrs. Tulliver, who was knitting opposite him,
 then at Maggie, who, as she bent over her sewing, was intensely
 conscious of some drama going forward in her father's mind. Suddenly
 he took up the poker and broke the large coal fiercely.
 
 "Dear heart, Mr. Tulliver, what can you be thinking of?" said his
 wife, looking up in alarm; "it's very wasteful, breaking the coal, and
 we've got hardly any large coal left, and I don't know where the rest
 is to come from."
 
 "I don't think you're quite so well to-night, are you, father?" said
 Maggie; "you seem uneasy."
 
 "Why, how is it Tom doesn't come?" said Mr. Tulliver, impatiently.
 
 "Dear heart, is it time? I must go and get his supper," said Mrs.
 Tulliver, laying down her knitting, and leaving the room.
 
 "It's nigh upon half-past eight," said Mr. Tulliver. "He'll be here
 soon. Go, go and get the big Bible, and open it at the beginning,
 where everything's set down. And get the pen and ink."
 
 Maggie obeyed, wondering; but her father gave no further orders, and
 only sat listening for Tom's footfall on the gravel, apparently
 irritated by the wind, which had risen, and was roaring so as to drown
 all other sounds. There was a strange light in his eyes that rather
 frightened Maggie; _she_ began to wish that Tom would come, too.
 
 "There he is, then," said Mr. Tulliver, in an excited way, when the
 knock came at last. Maggie went to open the door, but her mother came
--**--**--
 onward, and links the small pulse of the old English town with the
 beatings of the world's mighty heart. A vigorous superstition, that
 lashes its gods or lashes its own back, seems to be more congruous
 with the mystery of the human lot, than the mental condition of these
 emmet-like Dodsons and Tullivers.
 
 I share with you this sense of oppressive narrowness; but it is
 necessary that we should feel it, if we care to understand how it
 acted on the lives of Tom and Maggie,--how it has acted on young
 natures in many generations, that in the onward tendency of human
 things have risen above the mental level of the generation before
 them, to which they have been nevertheless tied by the strongest
 fibres of their hearts. The suffering, whether of martyr or victim,
 which belongs to every historical advance of mankind, is represented
 in this way in every town, and by hundreds of obscure hearths; and we
 need not shrink from this comparison of small things with great; for
 does not science tell us that its highest striving is after the
 ascertainment of a unity which shall bind the smallest things with the
 greatest? In natural science, I have understood, there is nothing
 petty to the mind that has a large vision of relations, and to which
 every single object suggests a vast sum of conditions. It is surely
 the same with the observation of human life.
 
 Certainly the religious and moral ideas of the Dodsons and Tullivers
 were of too specific a kind to be arrived at deductively, from the
 statement that they were part of the Protestant population of Great
 Britain. Their theory of life had its core of soundness, as all
 theories must have on which decent and prosperous families have been
 reared and have flourished; but it had the very slightest tincture of
--**--**--
 honor.
 
 Under all this grim melancholy and narrowing concentration of desire,
 Mr. Tulliver retained the feeling toward his "little wench" which made
 her presence a need to him, though it would not suffice to cheer him.
 She was still the desire of his eyes; but the sweet spring of fatherly
 love was now mingled with bitterness, like everything else. When
 Maggie laid down her work at night, it was her habit to get a low
 stool and sit by her father's knee, leaning her cheek against it. How
 she wished he would stroke her head, or give some sign that he was
 soothed by the sense that he had a daughter who loved him! But now she
 got no answer to her little caresses, either from her father or from
 Tom,--the two idols of her life. Tom was weary and abstracted in the
 short intervals when he was at home, and her father was bitterly
 preoccupied with the thought that the girl was growing up, was
 shooting up into a woman; and how was she to do well in life? She had
 a poor chance for marrying, down in the world as they were. And he
 hated the thought of her marrying poorly, as her aunt Gritty had done;
 _that_ would be a thing to make him turn in his grave,--the little
 wench so pulled down by children and toil, as her aunt Moss was. When
 uncultured minds, confined to a narrow range of personal experience,
 are under the pressure of continued misfortune, their inward life is
 apt to become a perpetually repeated round of sad and bitter thoughts;
 the same words, the same scenes, are revolved over and over again, the
 same mood accompanies them; the end of the year finds them as much
 what they were at the beginning as if they were machines set to a
--**--**--
 jasmine on the projecting porch at her right, and threw leafy shadows
 on her pale round cheek; they seemed rather to be searching for
 something that was not disclosed by the sunshine. It had been a more
 miserable day than usual; her father, after a visit of Wakem's had had
 a paroxysm of rage, in which for some trifling fault he had beaten the
 boy who served in the mill. Once before, since his illness, he had had
 a similar paroxysm, in which he had beaten his horse, and the scene
 had left a lasting terror in Maggie's mind. The thought had risen,
 that some time or other he might beat her mother if she happened to
 speak in her feeble way at the wrong moment. The keenest of all dread
 with her was lest her father should add to his present misfortune the
 wretchedness of doing something irretrievably disgraceful. The
 battered school-book of Tom's which she held on her knees could give
 her no fortitude under the pressure of that dread; and again and again
 her eyes had filled with tears, as they wandered vaguely, seeing
 neither the chestnut-trees, nor the distant horizon, but only future
 scenes of home-sorrow.
 
 Suddenly she was roused by the sound of the opening gate and of
 footsteps on the gravel. It was not Tom who was entering, but a man in
 a sealskin cap and a blue plush waistcoat, carrying a pack on his
 back, and followed closely by a bullterrier of brindled coat and
 defiant aspect.
 
 "Oh, Bob, it's you!" said Maggie, starting up with a smile of pleased
 recognition, for there had been no abundance of kind acts to efface
 the recollection of Bob's generosity; "I'm so glad to see you."
 
 "Thank you, Miss," said Bob, lifting his cap and showing a delighted
--**--**--
 every other girl besides herself had been cherished and watched over
 by elder minds, not forgetful of their own early time, when need was
 keen and impulse strong.
 
 At last Maggie's eyes glanced down on the books that lay on the
 window-shelf, and she half forsook her reverie to turn over listlessly
 the leaves of the "Portrait Gallery," but she soon pushed this aside
 to examine the little row of books tied together with string.
 "Beauties of the Spectator," "Rasselas," "Economy of Human Life,"
 "Gregory's Letters,"--she knew the sort of matter that was inside all
 these; the "Christian Year,"--that seemed to be a hymnbook, and she
 laid it down again; but _Thomas  Kempis?_--the name had come across
 her in her reading, and she felt the satisfaction, which every one
 knows, of getting some ideas to attach to a name that strays solitary
 in the memory. She took up the little, old, clumsy book with some
 curiosity; it had the corners turned down in many places, and some
 hand, now forever quiet, had made at certain passages strong
 pen-and-ink marks, long since browned by time. Maggie turned from leaf
 to leaf, and read where the quiet hand pointed: "Know that the love of
 thyself doth hurt thee more than anything in the world.... If thou
 seekest this or that, and wouldst be here or there to enjoy thy own
 will and pleasure, thou shalt never be quiet nor free from care; for
 in everything somewhat will be wanting, and in every place there will
 be some that will cross thee.... Both above and below, which way
 soever thou dost turn thee, everywhere thou shalt find the Cross; and
 everywhere of necessity thou must have patience, if thou wilt have
 inward peace, and enjoy an everlasting crown.... If thou desirest to
--**--**--
 and find her mother's eyes fixed upon her; they were watching and
 waiting for the large young glance, as if her elder frame got some
 needful warmth from it. The mother was getting fond of her tall, brown
 girl,--the only bit of furniture now on which she could bestow her
 anxiety and pride; and Maggie, in spite of her own ascetic wish to
 have no personal adornment, was obliged to give way to her mother
 about her hair, and submit to have the abundant black locks plaited
 into a coronet on the summit of her head, after the pitiable fashion
 of those antiquated times.
 
 "Let your mother have that bit o' pleasure, my dear," said Mrs.
 Tulliver; "I'd trouble enough with your hair once."
 
 So Maggie, glad of anything that would soothe her mother, and cheer
 their long day together, consented to the vain decoration, and showed
 a queenly head above her old frocks, steadily refusing, however, to
 look at herself in the glass. Mrs. Tulliver liked to call the father's
 attention to Maggie's hair and other unexpected virtues, but he had a
 brusk reply to give.
 
 "I knew well enough what she'd be, before now,--it's nothing new to
 me. But it's a pity she isn't made o' commoner stuff; she'll be thrown
 away, I doubt,--there'll be nobody to marry her as is fit for her."
 
 And Maggie's graces of mind and body fed his gloom. He sat patiently
 enough while she read him a chapter, or said something timidly when
 they were alone together about trouble being turned into a blessing.
 He took it all as part of his daughter's goodness, which made his
 misfortunes the sadder to him because they damaged her chance in life.
 In a mind charged with an eager purpose and an unsatisfied
 vindictiveness, there is no room for new feelings; Mr. Tulliver did
--**--**--
 trouble since then, and I think _that_ makes one think more of what
 happened before the trouble came."
 
 "I can't believe that you have thought of me so much as I have thought
 of you," said Philip, timidly. "Do you know, when I was away, I made a
 picture of you as you looked that morning in the study when you said
 you would not forget me."
 
 Philip drew a large miniature-case from his pocket, and opened it.
 Maggie saw her old self leaning on a table, with her black locks
 hanging down behind her ears, looking into space, with strange, dreamy
 eyes. It was a water-color sketch, of real merit as a portrait.
 
 "Oh dear," said Maggie, smiling, and flushed with pleasure, "what a
 queer little girl I was! I remember myself with my hair in that way,
 in that pink frock. I really _was_ like a gypsy. I dare say I am now,"
 she added, after a little pause; "am I like what you expected me to
 be?"
 
 The words might have been those of a coquette, but the full, bright
 glance Maggie turned on Philip was not that of a coquette. She really
 did hope he liked her face as it was now, but it was simply the rising
 again of her innate delight in admiration and love. Philip met her
 eyes and looked at her in silence for a long moment, before he said
 quietly, "No, Maggie."
 
 The light died out a little from Maggie's face, and there was a slight
 trembling of the lip. Her eyelids fell lower, but she did not turn
 away her head, and Philip continued to look at her. Then he said
 slowly:
 
 "You are very much more beautiful than I thought you would be."
 
 "Am I?" said Maggie, the pleasure returning in a deeper flush. She
--**--**--
 think, must I?"
 
 "Oh no, I forgot; good-by," said Maggie, pausing, and putting out her
 hand to him. The action brought her feeling back in a strong current
 to Philip; and after they had stood looking at each other in silence
 for a few moments, with their hands clasped, she said, withdrawing her
 hand:
 
 "I'm very grateful to you for thinking of me all those years. It is
 very sweet to have people love us. What a wonderful, beautiful thing
 it seems that God should have made your heart so that you could care
 about a queer little girl whom you only knew for a few weeks! I
 remember saying to you that I thought you cared for me more than Tom
 did."
 
 "Ah, Maggie," said Philip, almost fretfully, "you would never love me
 so well as you love your brother."
 
 "Perhaps not," said Maggie, simply; "but then, you know, the first
 thing I ever remember in my life is standing with Tom by the side of
 the Floss, while he held my hand; everything before that is dark to
 me. But I shall never forget you, though we must keep apart."
 
 "Don't say so, Maggie," said Philip. "If I kept that little girl in my
 mind for five years, didn't I earn some part in her? She ought not to
 take herself quite away from me."
 
 "Not if I were free," said Maggie; "but I am not, I must submit." She
 hesitated a moment, and then added, "And I wanted to say to you, that
 you had better not take more notice of my brother than just bowing to
 him. He once told me not to speak to you again, and he doesn't change
 his mind--Oh dear, the sun is set. I am too long away. Good-by." She
--**--**--
 same footing. Tom was interested at once, and begged for full
 explanation, wondering he had not thought of this plan before.
 
 He was so well pleased with the prospect of a speculation that might
 change the slow process of addition into multiplication, that he at
 once determined to mention the matter to his father, and get his
 consent to appropriate some of the savings in the tin box to the
 purchase of a small cargo. He would rather not have consulted his
 father, but he had just paid his last quarter's money into the tin
 box, and there was no other resource. All the savings were there; for
 Mr. Tulliver would not consent to put the money out at interest lest
 he should lose it. Since he had speculated in the purchase of some
 corn, and had lost by it, he could not be easy without keeping the
 money under his eye.
 
 Tom approached the subject carefully, as he was seated on the hearth
 with his father that evening, and Mr. Tulliver listened, leaning
 forward in his arm-chair and looking up in Tom's face with a sceptical
 glance. His first impulse was to give a positive refusal, but he was
 in some awe of Tom's wishes, and since he had the sense of being an
 "unlucky" father, he had lost some of his old peremptoriness and
 determination to be master. He took the key of the bureau from his
 pocket, got out the key of the large chest, and fetched down the tin
 box,--slowly, as if he were trying to defer the moment of a painful
 parting. Then he seated himself against the table, and opened the box
 with that little padlock-key which he fingered in his waistcoat pocket
 in all vacant moments. There they were, the dingy bank-notes and the
--**--**--
 hour together, before he'd fly at a real gentlewoman like you. It's
 wonderful how he knows which is the good-looking ladies; and's
 partic'lar fond of 'em when they've good shapes. Lors!" added Bob,
 laying down his pack on the gravel, "it's a thousand pities such a
 lady as you shouldn't deal with a packman, i' stead o' goin' into
 these newfangled shops, where there's half-a-dozen fine gents wi'
 their chins propped up wi' a stiff stock, a-looking like bottles wi'
 ornamental stoppers, an' all got to get their dinner out of a bit o'
 calico; it stan's to reason you must pay three times the price you pay
 a packman, as is the nat'ral way o' gettin' goods,--an' pays no rent,
 an' isn't forced to throttle himself till the lies are squeezed out on
 him, whether he will or no. But lors! mum, you know what it is better
 nor I do,--_you_ can see through them shopmen, I'll be bound."
 
 "Yes, I reckon I can, and through the packmen too," observed Mrs.
 Glegg, intending to imply that Bob's flattery had produced no effect
 on _her;_ while her husband, standing behind her with his hands in his
 pockets and legs apart, winked and smiled with conjugal delight at the
 probability of his wife's being circumvented.
 
 "Ay, to be sure, mum," said Bob. "Why, you must ha' dealt wi' no end
 o' packmen when you war a young lass--before the master here had the
 luck to set eyes on you. I know where you lived, I do,--seen th' house
 many a time,--close upon Squire Darleigh's,--a stone house wi'
 steps----"
 
 "Ah, that it had," said Mrs. Glegg, pouring out the tea. "You know
 something o' my family, then? Are you akin to that packman with a
 squint in his eye, as used to bring th' Irish linen?"
--**--**--
 
 "But if I let you have it for ten shillin', mum, you'll be so good as
 not tell nobody. I should be a laughin'-stock; the trade 'ud hoot me,
 if they knowed it. I'm obliged to make believe as I ask more nor I do
 for my goods, else they'd find out I was a flat. I'm glad you don't
 insist upo' buyin' the net, for then I should ha' lost my two best
 bargains for Mrs. Pepper o' Fibb's End, an' she's a rare customer."
 
 "Let me look at the net again," said Mrs. Glegg, yearning after the
 cheap spots and sprigs, now they were vanishing.
 
 "Well, I can't deny _you_, mum," said Bob handing it out.
 
 "Eh!, see what a pattern now! Real Laceham goods. Now, this is the
 sort o' article I'm recommendin' Mr. Tom to send out. Lors, it's a
 fine thing for anybody as has got a bit o' money; these Laceham goods
 'ud make it breed like maggits. If I was a lady wi' a bit o'
 money!--why, I know one as put thirty pounds into them goods,--a lady
 wi' a cork leg, but as sharp,--you wouldn't catch _her_ runnin' her
 head into a sack; _she'd_ see her way clear out o' anything afore
 she'd be in a hurry to start. Well, she let out thirty pound to a
 young man in the drapering line, and he laid it out i' Laceham goods,
 an' a shupercargo o' my acquinetance (not Salt) took 'em out, an' she
 got her eight per zent fust go off; an' now you can't hold her but she
 must be sendin' out carguies wi' every ship, till she's gettin' as
 rich as a Jew. Bucks her name is, she doesn't live i' this town. Now
 then, mum, if you'll please to give me the net----"
--**--**--
 clearness of her life by admitting a ground of concealment; and that,
 by forsaking the simple rule of renunciation, she was throwing herself
 under the seductive guidance of illimitable wants. She thought she had
 won strength to obey the warning before she allowed herself the next
 week to turn her steps in the evening to the Red Deeps. But while she
 was resolved to say an affectionate farewell to Philip, how she looked
 forward to that evening walk in the still, fleckered shade of the
 hollows, away from all that was harsh and unlovely; to the
 affectionate, admiring looks that would meet her; to the sense of
 comradeship that childish memories would give to wiser, older talk; to
 the certainty that Philip would care to hear everything she said,
 which no one else cared for! It was a half-hour that it would be very
 hard to turn her back upon, with the sense that there would be no
 other like it. Yet she said what she meant to say; she looked firm as
 well as sad.
 
 "Philip, I have made up my mind; it is right that we should give each
 other up, in everything but memory. I could not see you without
 concealment--stay, I know what you are going to say,--it is other
 people's wrong feelings that make concealment necessary; but
 concealment is bad, however it may be caused. I feel that it would be
 bad for me, for us both. And then, if our secret were discovered,
 there would be nothing but misery,--dreadful anger; and then we must
 part after all, and it would be harder, when we were used to seeing
 each other."
 
 Philip's face had flushed, and there was a momentary eagerness of
 expression, as if he had been about to resist this decision with all
--**--**--
 early afternoon and not evening, and the edge of sharpness in the
 spring air makes her draw her large shawl close about her and trip
 along rather quickly; though she looks round, as usual, that she may
 take in the sight of her beloved trees. There is a more eager,
 inquiring look in her eyes than there was last June, and a smile is
 hovering about her lips, as if some playful speech were awaiting the
 right hearer. The hearer was not long in appearing.
 
 "Take back your _Corinne_," said Maggie, drawing a book from under her
 shawl. "You were right in telling me she would do me no good; but you
 were wrong in thinking I should wish to be like her."
 
 "Wouldn't you really like to be a tenth Muse, then, Maggie?" said
 Philip looking up in her face as we look at a first parting in the
 clouds that promises us a bright heaven once more.
 
 "Not at all," said Maggie, laughing. "The Muses were uncomfortable
 goddesses, I think,--obliged always to carry rolls and musical
 instruments about with them. If I carried a harp in this climate, you
 know, I must have a green baize cover for it; and I should be sure to
 leave it behind me by mistake."
 
 "You agree with me in not liking Corinne, then?"
 
 "I didn't finish the book," said Maggie. "As soon as I came to the
 blond-haired young lady reading in the park, I shut it up, and
 determined to read no further. I foresaw that that light-complexioned
 girl would win away all the love from Corinne and make her miserable.
 I'm determined to read no more books where the blond-haired women
 carry away all the happiness. I should begin to have a prejudice
 against them. If you could give me some story, now, where the dark
--**--**--
 than other men, in spite of all? We _do_ belong to each other--for
 always--whether we are apart or together?"
 
 "Yes, Philip; I should like never to part; I should like to make your
 life very happy."
 
 "I am waiting for something else. I wonder whether it will come."
 
 Maggie smiled, with glistening tears, and then stooped her tall head
 to kiss the pale face that was full of pleading, timid love,--like a
 woman's.
 
 She had a moment of real happiness then,--a moment of belief that, if
 there were sacrifice in this love, it was all the richer and more
 satisfying.
 
 She turned away and hurried home, feeling that in the hour since she
 had trodden this road before, a new era had begun for her. The tissue
 of vague dreams must now get narrower and narrower, and all the
 threads of thought and emotion be gradually absorbed in the woof of
 her actual daily life.
 
 
 
 Chapter V
 
 The Cloven Tree
 
 
 Secrets are rarely betrayed or discovered according to any programme
 our fear has sketched out. Fear is almost always haunted by terrible
 dramatic scenes, which recur in spite of the best-argued probabilities
 against them; and during a year that Maggie had had the burthen of
 concealment on her mind, the possibility of discovery had continually
 presented itself under the form of a sudden meeting with her father or
 Tom when she was walking with Philip in the Red Deeps. She was aware
 that this was not one of the most likely events; but it was the scene
 that most completely symbolized her inward dread. Those slight
 indirect suggestions which are dependent on apparently trivial
 coincidences and incalculable states of mind, are the favorite
 machinery of Fact, but are not the stuff in which Imagination is apt
 to work.
 
 Certainly one of the persons about whom Maggie's fears were furthest
--**--**--
 doubt this liver complaint 'ull carry her off. That's what this new
 vicar, this Dr. Kenn, said in the funeral sermon to-day."
 
 "Ah, he's a wonderful preacher, by all account,--isn't he, Sophy?"
 said Mrs. Tulliver.
 
 "Why, Lucy had got a collar on this blessed day," continued Mrs.
 Pullet, with her eyes fixed in a ruminating manner, "as I don't say I
 haven't got as good, but I must look out my best to match it."
 
 "Miss Lucy's called the bell o' St. Ogg's, they say; that's a cur'ous
 word," observed Mr. Pullet, on whom the mysteries of etymology
 sometimes fell with an oppressive weight.
 
 "Pooh!" said Mr. Tulliver, jealous for Maggie, "she's a small thing,
 not much of a figure. But fine feathers make fine birds. I see nothing
 to admire so much in those diminutive women; they look silly by the
 side o' the men,--out o' proportion. When I chose my wife, I chose her
 the right size,--neither too little nor too big."
 
 The poor wife, with her withered beauty, smiled complacently.
 
 "But the men aren't _all_ big," said uncle Pullet, not without some
 self-reference; "a young fellow may be good-looking and yet not be a
 six-foot, like Master Tom here.
 
 "Ah, it's poor talking about littleness and bigness,--anybody may
 think it's a mercy they're straight," said aunt Pullet. "There's that
 mismade son o' Lawyer Wakem's, I saw him at church to-day. Dear, dear!
 to think o' the property he's like to have; and they say he's very
 queer and lonely, doesn't like much company. I shouldn't wonder if he
 goes out of his mind; for we never come along the road but he's
 a-scrambling out o' the trees and brambles at the Red Deeps."
 
 This wide statement, by which Mrs. Pullet represented the fact that
 she had twice seen Philip at the spot indicated, produced an effect on
--**--**--
 foolishness and ignorance to get her to have secret meetings with you.
 I mean, daring to trifle with the respectability of a family that has
 a good and honest name to support."
 
 "I deny that," interrupted Philip, impetuously. "I could never trifle
 with anything that affected your sister's happiness. She is dearer to
 me than she is to you; I honor her more than you can ever honor her; I
 would give up my life to her."
 
 "Don't talk high-flown nonsense to me, sir! Do you mean to pretend
 that you didn't know it would be injurious to her to meet you here
 week after week? Do you pretend you had any right to make professions
 of love to her, even if you had been a fit husband for her, when
 neither her father nor your father would ever consent to a marriage
 between you? And _you_,--_you_ to try and worm yourself into the
 affections of a handsome girl who is not eighteen, and has been shut
 out from the world by her father's misfortunes! That's your crooked
 notion of honor, is it? I call it base treachery; I call it taking
 advantage of circumstances to win what's too good for you,--what you'd
 never get by fair means."
 
 "It is manly of you to talk in this way to _me_," said Philip,
 bitterly, his whole frame shaken by violent emotions. "Giants have an
 immemorial right to stupidity and insolent abuse. You are incapable
 even of understanding what I feel for your sister. I feel so much for
 her that I could even desire to be at friendship with _you_."
 
 "I should be very sorry to understand your feelings," said Tom, with
 scorching contempt. "What I wish is that you should understand
 _me_,--that I shall take care of _my_ sister, and that if you dare to
--**--**--
 light-brown hair were still in order perfect enough for a ball-room;
 and as on other nights, Gwendolen might have looked lingeringly at
 herself for pleasure (surely an allowable indulgence); but now she took
 no conscious note of her reflected beauty, and simply stared right
 before her as if she had been jarred by a hateful sound and was waiting
 for any sign of its cause. By-and-by she threw herself in the corner of
 the red velvet sofa, took up the letter again and read it twice
 deliberately, letting it at last fall on the ground, while she rested
 her clasped hands on her lap and sat perfectly still, shedding no
 tears. Her impulse was to survey and resist the situation rather than
 to wail over it. There was no inward exclamation of "Poor mamma!" Her
 mamma had never seemed to get much enjoyment out of life, and if
 Gwendolen had been at this moment disposed to feel pity she would have
 bestowed it on herself--for was she not naturally and rightfully the
 chief object of her mamma's anxiety too? But it was anger, it was
 resistance that possessed her; it was bitter vexation that she had lost
 her gains at roulette, whereas if her luck had continued through this
 one day she would have had a handsome sum to carry home, or she might
 have gone on playing and won enough to support them all. Even now was
 it not possible? She had only four napoleons left in her purse, but she
 possessed some ornaments which she could sell: a practice so common in
 stylish society at German baths that there was no need to be ashamed of
 it; and even if she had not received her mamma's letter, she would
 probably have decided to get money for an Etruscan necklace which she
--**--**--
 which was flushed in reaction from her chill shudder, and said, "Let us
 go up to our own room, mamma."
 
 The housekeeper on searching found the key in the drawer of the cabinet
 close by the panel, and presently handed it to Bugle, the lady's-maid,
 telling her significantly to give it to her Royal Highness.
 
 "I don't know what you mean, Mrs. Startin," said Bugle, who had been
 busy up-stairs during the scene in the drawing-room, and was rather
 offended at this irony in a new servant.
 
 "I mean the young lady that's to command us all-and well worthy for
 looks and figure," replied Mrs. Startin in propitiation. "She'll know
 what key it is."
 
 "If you have laid out what we want, go and see to the others, Bugle,"
 Gwendolen had said, when she and Mrs. Davilow entered their black and
 yellow bedroom, where a pretty little white couch was prepared by the
 side of the black and yellow catafalque known as the best bed. "I will
 help mamma."
 
 But her first movement was to go to the tall mirror between the
 windows, which reflected herself and the room completely, while her
 mamma sat down and also looked at the reflection.
 
 "That is a becoming glass, Gwendolen; or is it the black and gold color
 that sets you off?" said Mrs. Davilow, as Gwendolen stood obliquely
 with her three-quarter face turned toward the mirror, and her left hand
 brushing back the stream of hair.
 
 "I should make a tolerable St. Cecilia with some white roses on my
 head," said Gwendolen,--"only how about my nose, mamma? I think saint's
 noses never in the least turn up. I wish you had given me your
 perfectly straight nose; it would have done for any sort of
 character--a nose of all work. Mine is only a happy nose; it would not
--**--**--
 approve as the best possible? It is rather to be set down to his credit
 that his feelings on the subject were entirely good-natured. And in
 considering the relation of means to ends, it would have been mere
 folly to have been guided by the exceptional and idyllic--to have
 recommended that Gwendolen should wear a gown as shabby as Griselda's
 in order that a marquis might fall in love with her, or to have
 insisted that since a fair maiden was to be sought, she should keep
 herself out of the way. Mr. Gascoigne's calculations were of the kind
 called rational, and he did not even think of getting a too frisky
 horse in order that Gwendolen might be threatened with an accident and
 be rescued by a man of property. He wished his niece well, and he meant
 her to be seen to advantage in the best society of the neighborhood.
 
 Her uncle's intention fell in perfectly with Gwendolen's own wishes.
 But let no one suppose that she also contemplated a brilliant marriage
 as the direct end of her witching the world with her grace on
 horseback, or with any other accomplishment. That she was to be married
 some time or other she would have felt obliged to admit; and that her
 marriage would not be of a middling kind, such as most girls were
 contented with, she felt quietly, unargumentatively sure. But her
 thoughts never dwelt on marriage as the fulfillment of her ambition;
 the dramas in which she imagined herself a heroine were not wrought up
 to that close. To be very much sued or hopelessly sighed for as a bride
 was indeed an indispensable and agreeable guarantee of womanly power;
 but to become a wife and wear all the domestic fetters of that
 condition, was on the whole a vexatious necessity. Her observation of
--**--**--
 "Well, rather."
 
 "Oh, if he is only rather, I think I will decline. Or, if you send it
 to me, will you promise not to catechise me upon it and ask me which
 part I like best? Because it is not so easy to know a poem without
 reading it as to know a sermon without listening."
 
 "Decidedly," Mrs. Arrowpoint thought, "this girl is double and
 satirical. I shall be on my guard against her."
 
 But Gwendolen, nevertheless, continued to receive polite attentions
 from the family at Quetcham, not merely because invitations have larger
 grounds than those of personal liking, but because the trying little
 scene at the piano had awakened a kindly solicitude toward her in the
 gentle mind of Miss Arrowpoint, who managed all the invitations and
 visits, her mother being otherwise occupied.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
     "Croyez-vous m'avoir humilie pour m'avoir appris que la terre tourne
     autour du soleil? Je vous jure que je ne m'en estime pas moins."
                                 --FONTENELLE: _Pluralit des Mondes_.
 
 
 That lofty criticism had caused Gwendolen a new sort of pain. She would
 not have chosen to confess how unfortunate she thought herself in not
 having had Miss Arrowpoint's musical advantages, so as to be able to
 question Herr Klesmer's taste with the confidence of thorough
 knowledge; still less, to admit even to herself that Miss Arrowpoint
 each time they met raised an unwonted feeling of jealousy in her: not
 in the least because she was an heiress, but because it was really
 provoking that a girl whose appearance you could not characterize
 except by saying that her figure was slight and of middle stature, her
 features small, her eyes tolerable, and her complexion sallow, had
 nevertheless a certain mental superiority which could not be explained
 away--an exasperating thoroughness in her musical accomplishment, a
 fastidious discrimination in her general tastes, which made it
--**--**--
 
 Everybody of course was concerned to satisfy this wish of Gwendolen's,
 and Rex proposed that they should wind up with a tableau in which the
 effect of her majesty would not be marred by any one's speech. This
 pleased her thoroughly, and the only question was the choice of the
 tableau.
 
 "Something pleasant, children, I beseech you," said Mrs. Davilow; "I
 can't have any Greek wickedness."
 
 "It is no worse than Christian wickedness, mamma," said Gwendolen,
 whose mention of Rachelesque heroines had called forth that remark.
 
 "And less scandalous," said Rex. "Besides, one thinks of it as all gone
 by and done with. What do you say to Briseis being led away? I would be
 Achilles, and you would be looking round at me--after the print we have
 at the rectory."
 
 "That would be a good attitude for me," said Gwendolen, in a tone of
 acceptance. But afterward she said with decision, "No. It will not do.
 There must be three men in proper costume, else it will be ridiculous."
 
 "I have it," said Rex, after a little reflection. "Hermione as the
 statue in Winter's Tale? I will be Leontes, and Miss Merry, Paulina,
 one on each side. Our dress won't signify," he went on laughingly; "it
 will be more Shakespearian and romantic if Leontes looks like Napoleon,
 and Paulina like a modern spinster."
 
 And Hermione was chosen; all agreeing that age was of no consequence,
 but Gwendolen urged that instead of the mere tableau there should be
 just enough acting of the scene to introduce the striking up of the
 music as a signal for her to step down and advance; when Leontes,
 instead of embracing her, was to kneel and kiss the hem of her garment,
 and so the curtain was to fall. The antechamber with folding doors lent
--**--**--
 love herself. She wished the small romance of Rex's devotion to fill up
 the time of his stay at Pennicote, and to avoid explanations which
 would bring it to an untimely end. Besides, she objected, with a sort
 of physical repulsion, to being directly made love to. With all her
 imaginative delight in being adored, there was a certain fierceness of
 maidenhood in her.
 
 But all other thoughts were soon lost for her in the excitement of the
 scene at the Three Barns. Several gentlemen of the hunt knew her, and
 she exchanged pleasant greetings. Rex could not get another word with
 her. The color, the stir of the field had taken possession of Gwendolen
 with a strength which was not due to habitual associations, for she had
 never yet ridden after the hounds--only said she should like to do it,
 and so drawn forth a prohibition; her mamma dreading the danger, and
 her uncle declaring that for his part he held that kind of violent
 exercise unseemly in a woman, and that whatever might be done in other
 parts of the country, no lady of good position followed the Wessex
 hunt: no one but Mrs. Gadsby, the yeomanry captain's wife, who had been
 a kitchenmaid and still spoke like one. This last argument had some
 effect on Gwendolen, and had kept her halting between her desire to
 assert her freedom and her horror of being classed with Mrs. Gadsby.
 
 Some of the most unexceptionable women in the neighborhood occasionally
 went to see the hounds throw off; but it happened that none of them
 were present this morning to abstain from following, while Mrs. Gadsby,
 with her doubtful antecedents, grammatical and otherwise, was not
 visible to make following seem unbecoming. Thus Gwendolen felt no check
 on the animal stimulus that came from the stir and tongue of the
--**--**--
 father's mind.
 
 But when the door opened and she whose presence he was longing for
 entered, there came over him suddenly and mysteriously a state of
 tremor and distrust which he had never felt before. Miss Gwendolen,
 simple as she stood there, in her black silk, cut square about the
 round white pillar of her throat, a black band fastening her hair which
 streamed backward in smooth silky abundance, seemed more queenly than
 usual. Perhaps it was that there was none of the latent fun and
 tricksiness which had always pierced in her greeting of Rex. How much
 of this was due to her presentiment from what he had said yesterday
 that he was going to talk of love? How much from her desire to show
 regret about his accident? Something of both. But the wisdom of ages
 has hinted that there is a side of the bed which has a malign influence
 if you happen to get out on it; and this accident befalls some charming
 persons rather frequently. Perhaps it had befallen Gwendolen this
 morning. The hastening of her toilet, the way in which Bugle used the
 brush, the quality of the shilling serial mistakenly written for her
 amusement, the probabilities of the coming day, and, in short, social
 institutions generally, were all objectionable to her. It was not that
 she was out of temper, but that the world was not equal to the demands
 of her fine organism.
 
 However it might be, Rex saw an awful majesty about her as she entered
 and put out her hand to him, without the least approach to a smile in
 eyes or mouth. The fun which had moved her in the evening had quite
 evaporated from the image of his accident, and the whole affair seemed
 stupid to her. But she said with perfect propriety, "I hope you are not
--**--**--
 forestall you in applying them, or he may have other views on acids and
 fixed stars, and think ill of you in consequence. Mr. Gascoigne did not
 ask Mr. Arrowpoint if he had any trustworthy source of information
 about Grandcourt considered as a husband for a charming girl; nor did
 Mrs. Arrowpoint observe to Mrs. Davilow that if the possible peer
 sought a wife in the neighborhood of Diplow, the only reasonable
 expectation was that he would offer his hand to Catherine, who,
 however, would not accept him unless he were in all respects fitted to
 secure her happiness. Indeed, even to his wife the rector was silent as
 to the contemplation of any matrimonial result, from the probability
 that Mr. Grandcourt would see Gwendolen at the next Archery Meeting;
 though Mrs. Gascoigne's mind was very likely still more active in the
 same direction. She had said interjectionally to her sister, "It would
 be a mercy, Fanny, if that girl were well married!" to which Mrs.
 Davilow discerning some criticism of her darling in the fervor of that
 wish, had not chosen to make any audible reply, though she had said
 inwardly, "You will not get her to marry for your pleasure"; the mild
 mother becoming rather saucy when she identified herself with her
 daughter.
 
 To her husband Mrs. Gascoigne said, "I hear Mr. Grandcourt has got two
 places of his own, but he comes to Diplow for the hunting. It is to be
 hoped he will set a good example in the neighborhood. Have you heard
 what sort of a young man he is, Henry?"
 
 Mr. Gascoigne had not heard; at least, if his male acquaintances had
 gossiped in his hearing, he was not disposed to repeat their gossip, or
 to give it any emphasis in his own mind. He held it futile, even if it
--**--**--
 without the ring--and fall at my feet. I shall laugh at him--he will
 rise in resentment--I shall laugh more--he will call for his steed and
 ride to Quetcham, where he will find Miss Arrowpoint just married to a
 needy musician, Mrs. Arrowpoint tearing her cap off, and Mr. Arrowpoint
 standing by. Exit Lord Grandcourt, who returns to Diplow, and, like M.
 Jabot, _change de linge_."
 
 Was ever any young witch like this? You thought of hiding things from
 her--sat upon your secret and looked innocent, and all the while she
 knew by the corner of your eye that it was exactly five pounds ten you
 were sitting on! As well turn the key to keep out the damp! It was
 probable that by dint of divination she already knew more than any one
 else did of Mr. Grandcourt. That idea in Mrs. Davilow's mind prompted
 the sort of question which often comes without any other apparent
 reason than the faculty of speech and the not knowing what to do with
 it.
 
 "Why, what kind of a man do you imagine him to be, Gwendolen?"
 
 "Let me see!" said the witch, putting her forefinger to her lips, with
 a little frown, and then stretching out the finger with decision.
 "Short--just above my shoulder--crying to make himself tall by turning
 up his mustache and keeping his beard long--a glass in his right eye to
 give him an air of distinction--a strong opinion about his waistcoat,
 but uncertain and trimming about the weather, on which he will try to
 draw me out. He will stare at me all the while, and the glass in his
 eye will cause him to make horrible faces, especially when he smiles in
 a flattering way. I shall cast down my eyes in consequence, and he will
--**--**--
 speak a word about the clout-shooting."
 
 Gwendolen chose to go too and be deposited in the same group with her
 mamma and aunt until she had to shoot again. That Mr. Grandcourt might
 after all not appear on the archery-ground, had begun to enter into
 Gwendolen's thought as a possible deduction from the completeness of
 her pleasure. Under all her saucy satire, provoked chiefly by her
 divination that her friends thought of him as a desirable match for
 her, she felt something very far from indifference as to the impression
 she would make on him. True, he was not to have the slightest power
 over her (for Gwendolen had not considered that the desire to conquer
 is itself a sort of subjection); she had made up her mind that he was
 to be one of those complimentary and assiduously admiring men of whom
 even her narrow experience had shown her several with various-colored
 beards and various styles of bearing; and the sense that her friends
 would want her to think him delightful, gave her a resistant
 inclination to presuppose him ridiculous. But that was no reason why
 she could spare his presence: and even a passing prevision of trouble
 in case she despised and refused him, raised not the shadow of a wish
 that he should save her that trouble by showing no disposition to make
 her an offer. Mr. Grandcourt taking hardly any notice of her, and
 becoming shortly engaged to Miss Arrowpoint, was not a picture which
 flattered her imagination.
 
 Hence Gwendolen had been all ear to Lord Brackenshaw's mode of
 accounting for Grandcourt's non-appearance; and when he did arrive, no
 consciousness--not even Mrs. Arrowpoint's or Mr. Gascoigne's--was more
 awake to the fact than hers, although she steadily avoided looking
 toward any point where he was likely to be. There should be no
--**--**--
 now. "He may be so tired of admiring that he likes disgust for variety."
 
 "Those words are not suitable to your lips," said Klesmer, quickly,
 with one of his grand frowns, while he shook his hand as if to banish
 the discordant sounds.
 
 "Are you as critical of words as of music?"
 
 "Certainly I am. I should require your words to be what your face and
 form are--always among the meanings of a noble music."
 
 "That is a compliment as well as a correction. I am obliged for both.
 But do you know I am bold enough to wish to correct _you_, and require
 you to understand a joke?"
 
 "One may understand jokes without liking them," said the terrible
 Klesmer. "I have had opera books sent me full of jokes; it was just
 because I understood them that I did not like them. The comic people
 are ready to challenge a man because he looks grave. 'You don't see the
 witticism, sir?' 'No, sir, but I see what you meant.' Then I am what we
 call ticketed as a fellow without _esprit_. But, in fact," said
 Klesmer, suddenly dropping from his quick narrative to a reflective
 tone, with an impressive frown, "I am very sensible to wit and humor."
 
 "I am glad you tell me that," said Gwendolen, not without some
 wickedness of intention. But Klesmer's thoughts had flown off on the
 wings of his own statement, as their habit was, and she had the
 wickedness all to herself. "Pray, who is that standing near the
 card-room door?" she went on, seeing there the same stranger with whom
 Klesmer had been in animated talk on the archery ground. "He is a
 friend of yours, I think."
 
 "No, no; an amateur I have seen in town; Lush, a Mr. Lush--too fond of
--**--**--
 
 Lush, being a man of some ability, had not known Grandcourt for fifteen
 years without learning what sort of measures were useless with him,
 though what sort might be useful remained often dubious. In the
 beginning of his career he held a fellowship, and was near taking
 orders for the sake of a college living, but not being fond of that
 prospect accepted instead the office of traveling companion to a
 marquess, and afterward to young Grandcourt, who had lost his father
 early, and who found Lush so convenient that he had allowed him to
 become prime minister in all his more personal affairs. The habit of
 fifteen years had made Grandcourt more and more in need of Lush's
 handiness, and Lush more and more in need of the lazy luxury to which
 his transactions on behalf of Grandcourt made no interruption worth
 reckoning. I cannot say that the same lengthened habit had intensified
 Grandcourt's want of respect for his companion since that want had been
 absolute from the beginning, but it had confirmed his sense that he
 might kick Lush if he chose--only he never did choose to kick any
 animal, because the act of kicking is a compromising attitude, and a
 gentleman's dogs should be kicked for him. He only said things which
 might have exposed himself to be kicked if his confidant had been a man
 of independent spirit. But what son of a vicar who has stinted his wife
 and daughters of calico in order to send his male offspring to Oxford,
 can keep an independent spirit when he is bent on dining with high
 discrimination, riding good horses, living generally in the most
 luxuriant honey-blossomed clover--and all without working? Mr. Lush had
 passed for a scholar once, and had still a sense of scholarship when he
--**--**--
 admirer she had known? That absence of demonstrativeness which she was
 glad of, acted as a charm in more senses than one, and was slightly
 benumbing. Grandcourt after all was formidable--a handsome lizard of a
 hitherto unknown species, not of the lively, darting kind. But
 Gwendolen knew hardly anything about lizards, and ignorance gives one a
 large range of probabilities. This splendid specimen was probably
 gentle, suitable as a boudoir pet: what may not a lizard be, if you
 know nothing to the contrary? Her acquaintance with Grandcourt was such
 that no accomplishment suddenly revealed in him would have surprised
 her. And he was so little suggestive of drama, that it hardly occurred
 to her to think with any detail how his life of thirty-six years had
 been passed: in general, she imagined him always cold and dignified,
 not likely ever to have committed himself. He had hunted the tiger--had
 he ever been in love or made love? The one experience and the other
 seemed alike remote in Gwendolen's fancy from the Mr. Grandcourt who
 had come to Diplow in order apparently to make a chief epoch in her
 destiny--perhaps by introducing her to that state of marriage which she
 had resolved to make a state of greater freedom than her girlhood. And
 on the whole she wished to marry him; he suited her purpose; her
 prevailing, deliberate intention was, to accept him.
 
 But was she going to fulfill her deliberate intention? She began to be
 afraid of herself, and to find out a certain difficulty in doing as she
 liked. Already her assertion of independence in evading his advances
 had been carried farther than was necessary, and she was thinking with
 some anxiety what she might do on the next occasion.
 
 Seated according to her habit with her back to the horses on their
--**--**--
 This match with Grandcourt presented itself to him as a sort of public
 affair; perhaps there were ways in which it might even strengthen the
 establishment. To the rector, whose father (nobody would have suspected
 it, and nobody was told) had risen to be a provincial corn-dealer,
 aristocratic heirship resembled regal heirship in excepting its
 possessor from the ordinary standard of moral judgments, Grandcourt,
 the almost certain baronet, the probable peer, was to be ranged with
 public personages, and was a match to be accepted on broad general
 grounds national and ecclesiastical. Such public personages, it is
 true, are often in the nature of giants which an ancient community may
 have felt pride and safety in possessing, though, regarded privately,
 these born eminences must often have been inconvenient and even
 noisome. But of the future husband personally Mr. Gascoigne was
 disposed to think the best. Gossip is a sort of smoke that comes from
 the dirty tobacco-pipes of of those who diffuse it: it proves nothing
 but the bad taste of the smoker. But if Grandcourt had really made any
 deeper or more unfortunate experiments in folly than were common in
 young men of high prospects, he was of an age to have finished them.
 All accounts can be suitably wound up when a man has not ruined
 himself, and the expense may be taken as an insurance against future
 error. This was the view of practical wisdom; with reference to higher
 views, repentance had a supreme moral and religious value. There was
 every reason to believe that a woman of well-regulated mind would be
 happy with Grandcourt.
 
 It was no surprise to Gwendolen on coming down to tea to be told that
 her uncle wished to see her in the dining-room. He threw aside the
 paper as she entered and greeted her with his usual kindness. As his
--**--**--
 formidable. Having come close to accepting Grandcourt, Gwendolen felt
 this lot of unhoped-for fullness rounding itself too definitely. When
 we take to wishing a great deal for ourselves, whatever we get soon
 turns into mere limitation and exclusion. Still there was the
 reassuring thought that marriage would be the gate into a larger
 freedom.
 
 The place of meeting was a grassy spot called Green Arbor, where a bit
 of hanging wood made a sheltering amphitheatre. It was here that the
 coachful of servants with provisions had to prepare the picnic meal;
 and the warden of the Chase was to guide the roving archers so as to
 keep them within the due distance from this centre, and hinder them
 from wandering beyond the limit which had been fixed on--a curve that
 might be drawn through certain well-known points, such as the double
 Oak, the Whispering Stones, and the High Cross. The plan was to take
 only a preliminary stroll before luncheon, keeping the main roving
 expedition for the more exquisite lights of the afternoon. The muster
 was rapid enough to save every one from dull moments of waiting, and
 when the groups began to scatter themselves through the light and
 shadow made here by closely neighboring beeches and there by rarer
 oaks, one may suppose that a painter would have been glad to look on.
 This roving archery was far prettier than the stationary game, but
 success in shooting at variable marks were less favored by practice,
 and the hits were distributed among the volunteer archers otherwise
 than they would have been in target-shooting. From this cause, perhaps,
 as well as from the twofold distraction of being preoccupied and
 wishing not to betray her preoccupation, Gwendolen did not greatly
 distinguish herself in these first experiments, unless it were by the
--**--**--
 
 Lady Flora, coming back charged with news about Miss Harleth, saw no
 good reason why she should not try whether she could electrify Mr.
 Grandcourt by mentioning it to him at the table; and in doing so shot a
 few hints of a notion having got abroad that he was a disappointed
 adorer. Grandcourt heard with quietude, but with attention; and the
 next day he ordered Lush to bring about a decent reason for breaking up
 the party at Diplow by the end of another week, as he meant to go
 yachting to the Baltic or somewhere--it being impossible to stay at
 Diplow as if he were a prisoner on parole, with a set of people whom he
 had never wanted. Lush needed no clearer announcement that Grandcourt
 was going to Leubronn; but he might go after the manner of a creeping
 billiard-ball and stick on the way. What Mr. Lush intended was to make
 himself indispensable so that he might go too, and he succeeded;
 Gwendolen's repulsion for him being a fact that only amused his patron,
 and made him none the less willing to have Lush always at hand.
 
 This was how it happened that Grandcourt arrived at the _Czarina_ on
 the fifth day after Gwendolen had left Leubronn, and found there his
 uncle, Sir Hugo Mallinger, with his family, including Deronda. It is
 not necessarily a pleasure either to the reigning power or the heir
 presumptive when their separate affairs--a--touch of gout, say, in the
 one, and a touch of willfulness in the other--happen to bring them to
 the same spot. Sir Hugo was an easy-tempered man, tolerant both of
 differences and defects; but a point of view different from his own
 concerning the settlement of the family estates fretted him rather more
 than if it had concerned Church discipline or the ballot, and faults
--**--**--
 possibility that here was the secret of his own birth, and that the man
 whom he called uncle was really his father. Some children, even younger
 than Daniel, have known the first arrival of care, like an ominous
 irremovable guest in their tender lives, on the discovery that their
 parents, whom they had imagined able to buy everything, were poor and
 in hard money troubles. Daniel felt the presence of a new guest who
 seemed to come with an enigmatic veiled face, and to carry
 dimly-conjectured, dreaded revelations. The ardor which he had given to
 the imaginary world in his books suddenly rushed toward his own history
 and spent its pictorial energy there, explaining what he knew,
 representing the unknown. The uncle whom he loved very dearly took the
 aspect of a father who held secrets about him--who had done him a
 wrong--yes, a wrong: and what had become of his mother, for whom he
 must have been taken away?--Secrets about which he, Daniel, could never
 inquire; for to speak or to be spoken to about these new thoughts
 seemed like falling flakes of fire to his imagination. Those who have
 known an impassioned childhood will understand this dread of utterance
 about any shame connected with their parents. The impetuous advent of
 new images took possession of him with the force of fact for the first
 time told, and left him no immediate power for the reflection that he
 might be trembling at a fiction of his own. The terrible sense of
 collision between a strong rush of feeling and the dread of its
 betrayal, found relief at length in big slow tears, which fell without
 restraint until the voice of Mr. Fraser was heard saying:
 
 "Daniel, do you see that you are sitting on the bent pages of your
--**--**--
 holidays?"
 
 "Oh yes, generally," said Sir Hugo. "But now I mean you to go at once
 to a new tutor, to break the change for you before you go to Eton."
 
 After this interview Daniel's spirit rose again. He was meant to be a
 gentleman, and in some unaccountable way it might be that his
 conjectures were all wrong. The very keenness of the lad taught him to
 find comfort in his ignorance. While he was busying his mind in the
 construction of possibilities, it became plain to him that there must
 be possibilities of which he knew nothing. He left off brooding, young
 joy and the spirit of adventure not being easily quenched within him,
 and in the interval before his going away he sang about the house,
 danced among the old servants, making them parting gifts, and insisted
 many times to the groom on the care that was to be taken of the black
 pony.
 
 "Do you think I shall know much less than the other boys, Mr. Fraser?"
 said Daniel. It was his bent to think that every stranger would be
 surprised at his ignorance.
 
 "There are dunces to be found everywhere," said the judicious Fraser.
 "You'll not be the biggest; but you've not the makings of a Porson in
 you, or a Leibnitz either."
 
 "I don't want to be a Porson or a Leibnitz," said Daniel. "I would
 rather be a greater leader, like Pericles or Washington."
 
 "Ay, ay; you've a notion they did with little parsing, and less
 algebra," said Fraser. But in reality he thought his pupil a remarkable
 lad, to whom one thing was as easy as another, if he had only a mind to
 it.
 
 Things went on very well with Daniel in his new world, except that a
 boy with whom he was at once inclined to strike up a close friendship
--**--**--
 will not do to give yourself to be melted down for the benefit of the
 tallow-trade; you must know where to find yourself. However, I shall
 put no vote on your going. Wait until I can get off Committee, and I'll
 run over with you."
 
 So Deronda went according to his will. But not before he had spent some
 hours with Hans Meyrick, and been introduced to the mother and sisters
 in the Chelsea home. The shy girls watched and registered every look of
 their brother's friend, declared by Hans to have been the salvation of
 him, a fellow like nobody else, and, in fine, a brick. They so
 thoroughly accepted Deronda as an ideal, that when he was gone the
 youngest set to work, under the criticism of the two elder girls, to
 paint him as Prince Camaralzaman.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII.
 
         "This is truth the poet sings,
   That a sorrow's crown of sorrow is remembering happier things."
                                 --TENNYSON: _Locksley Hall_.
 
 
 On a fine evening near the end of July, Deronda was rowing himself on
 the Thames. It was already a year or more since he had come back to
 England, with the understanding that his education was finished, and
 that he was somehow to take his place in English society; but though,
 in deference to Sir Hugo's wish, and to fence off idleness, he had
 began to read law, this apparent decision had been without other result
 than to deepen the roots of indecision. His old love of boating had
 revived with the more force now that he was in town with the
 Mallingers, because he could nowhere else get the same still seclusion
 which the river gave him. He had a boat of his own at Putney, and
 whenever Sir Hugo did not want him, it was his chief holiday to row
--**--**--
 girls might simply have guessed her to be Spanish.
 
 "Do you despise me for it?" she said presently in low tones, which had
 a sadness that pierced like a cry from a small dumb creature in fear.
 
 "Why should I?" said Deronda. "I am not so foolish."
 
 "I know many Jews are bad."
 
 "So are many Christians. But I should not think it fair for you to
 despise me because of that."
 
 "My mother and brother were good. But I shall never find them. I am
 come a long way--from abroad. I ran away; but I cannot tell you--I
 cannot speak of it. I thought I might find my mother again--God would
 guide me. But then I despaired. This morning when the light came, I
 felt as if one word kept sounding within me--Never! never! But now--I
 begin--to think--" her words were broken by rising sobs--"I am
 commanded to live--perhaps we are going to her."
 
 With an outburst of weeping she buried her head on her knees. He hoped
 that this passionate weeping might relieve her excitement. Meanwhile he
 was inwardly picturing in much embarrassment how he should present
 himself with her in Park Lane--the course which he had at first
 unreflectingly determined on. No one kinder and more gentle than Lady
 Mallinger; but it was hardly probable that she would be at home; and he
 had a shuddering sense of a lackey staring at this delicate, sorrowful
 image of womanhood--of glaring lights and fine staircases, and perhaps
 chilling suspicious manners from lady's maid and housekeeper, that
 might scare the mind already in a state of dangerous susceptibility.
 But to take her to any other shelter than a home already known to him
 was not to be contemplated: he was full of fears about the issue of the
 adventure which had brought on him a responsibility all the heavier for
--**--**--
 unexpected recesses and openings from this into that, flights of steps
 and sudden outlooks.
 
 But mother and daughters were all united by a triple bond--family love;
 admiration for the finest work, the best action; and habitual industry.
 Hans' desire to spend some of his money in making their lives more
 luxurious had been resisted by all of them, and both they and he had
 been thus saved from regrets at the threatened triumphs of his yearning
 for art over the attractions of secured income--a triumph that would
 by-and-by oblige him to give up his fellowship. They could all afford
 to laugh at his Gavarni-caricatures and to hold him blameless in
 following a natural bent which their unselfishness and independence had
 left without obstacle. It was enough for them to go on in their old
 way, only having a grand treat of opera-going (to the gallery) when
 Hans came home on a visit.
 
 Seeing the group they made this evening, one could hardly wish them to
 change their way of life. They were all alike small, and so in due
 proportion to their miniature rooms. Mrs. Meyrick was reading aloud
 from a French book; she was a lively little woman, half French, half
 Scotch, with a pretty articulateness of speech that seemed to make
 daylight in her hearer's understanding. Though she was not yet fifty,
 her rippling hair, covered by a quakerish net cap, was chiefly gray,
 but her eyebrows were brown as the bright eyes below them; her black
 dress, almost like a priest's cassock with its rows of buttons, suited
 a neat figure hardly five feet high. The daughters were to match the
 mother, except that Mab had Hans' light hair and complexion, with a
 bossy, irregular brow, and other quaintnesses that reminded one of him.
 Everything about them was compact, from the firm coils of their hair,
--**--**--
 the actual events of two hours, but possibilities of what had been and
 what might be which those events were enough to feed with the warm
 blood of passionate hope and fear. Something in his own experience
 caused Mirah's search after her mother to lay hold with peculiar force
 on his imagination. The first prompting of sympathy was to aid her in
 her search: if given persons were extant in London there were ways of
 finding them, as subtle as scientific experiment, the right machinery
 being set at work. But here the mixed feelings which belonged to
 Deronda's kindred experience naturally transfused themselves into his
 anxiety on behalf of Mirah.
 
 The desire to know his own mother, or to know about her, was constantly
 haunted with dread; and in imagining what might befall Mirah it quickly
 occurred to him that finding the mother and brother from whom she had
 been parted when she was a little one might turn out to be a calamity.
 When she was in the boat she said that her mother and brother were
 good; but the goodness might have been chiefly in her own ignorant
 innocence and yearning memory, and the ten or twelve years since the
 parting had been time enough for much worsening. Spite of his strong
 tendency to side with the objects of prejudice, and in general with
 those who got the worst of it, his interest had never been practically
 drawn toward existing Jews, and the facts he knew about them, whether
 they walked conspicuous in fine apparel or lurked in by-streets, were
 chiefly of a sort most repugnant to him. Of learned and accomplished
 Jews he took it for granted that they had dropped their religion, and
 wished to be merged in the people of their native lands. Scorn flung at
--**--**--
 everything, and he would explain: if I did not come out and act and
 fulfill my engagement, we should be ruined and he must starve. So I
 went on acting, and for a week or more the Count never came near me. My
 father changed our lodgings, and kept at home except when he went to
 the theatre with me. He began one day to speak discouragingly of my
 acting, and say, I could never go on singing in public--I should lose
 my voice--I ought to think of my future, and not put my nonsensical
 feelings between me and my fortune. He said, 'What will you do? You
 will be brought down to sing and beg at people's doors. You have had a
 splendid offer and ought to accept it.' I could not speak: a horror
 took possession of me when I thought of my mother and of him. I felt
 for the first time that I should not do wrong to leave him. But the
 next day he told me that he had put an end to my engagement at the
 theatre, and that we were to go to Prague. I was getting suspicious of
 everything, and my will was hardening to act against him. It took us
 two days to pack and get ready; and I had it in my mind that I might be
 obliged to run away from my father, and then I would come to London and
 try if it were possible to find my mother. I had a little money, and I
 sold some things to get more. I packed a few clothes in a little bag
 that I could carry with me, and I kept my mind on the watch. My
 father's silence--his letting drop that subject of the Count's
 offer--made me feel sure that there was a plan against me. I felt as if
--**--**--
 Mrs. Meyrick hoped that the sum Deronda put into her hands as a
 provision for Mirah's wants was more than would be needed; after a
 little while Mirah would perhaps like to occupy herself as the other
 girls did, and make herself independent. Deronda pleaded that she must
 need a long rest. "Oh, yes; we will hurry nothing," said Mrs. Meyrick.
 
 "Rely upon it, she shall be taken tender care of. If you like to give
 me your address abroad, I will write to let you know how we get on. It
 is not fair that we should have all the pleasure of her salvation to
 ourselves. And besides, I want to make believe that I am doing
 something for you as well as for Mirah."
 
 "That is no make-believe. What should I have done without you last
 night? Everything would have gone wrong. I shall tell Hans that the
 best of having him for a friend is, knowing his mother."
 
 After that they joined the girls in the other room, where Mirah was
 seated placidly, while the others were telling her what they knew about
 Mr. Deronda--his goodness to Hans, and all the virtues that Hans had
 reported of him.
 
 "Kate burns a pastille before his portrait every day," said Mab. "And I
 carry his signature in a little black-silk bag round my neck to keep
 off the cramp. And Amy says the multiplication-table in his name. We
 must all do something extra in honor of him, now he has brought you to
 us."
 
 "I suppose he is too great a person to want anything," said Mirah,
 smiling at Mab, and appealing to the graver Amy. "He is perhaps very
 high in the world?"
 
 "He is very much above us in rank," said Amy. "He is related to grand
--**--**--
 putting her hand on Gwendolen's as she added, mournfully, "that makes
 it so much harder for you, my pet."
 
 "But where are we to go?" said Gwendolen, with a trace of sharpness in
 her tone. She felt a new current of fear passing through her.
 
 "It is all decided. A little furniture is to be got in from the
 rectory--all that can be spared." Mrs. Davilow hesitated. She dreaded
 the reality for herself less than the shock she must give to Gwendolen,
 who looked at her with tense expectancy, but was silent.
 
 "It is Sawyer's Cottage we are to go to."
 
 At first, Gwendolen remained silent, paling with anger--justifiable
 anger, in her opinion. Then she said with haughtiness--
 
 "That is impossible. Something else than that ought to have been
 thought of. My uncle ought not to allow that. I will not submit to it."
 
 "My sweet child, what else could have been thought of? Your uncle, I am
 sure, is as kind as he can be: but he is suffering himself; he has his
 family to bring up. And do you quite understand? You must remember--we
 have nothing. We shall have absolutely nothing except what he and my
 sister give us. They have been as wise and active a possible, and we
 must try to earn something. I and the girls are going to work a
 table-cloth border for the Ladies' Charity at Winchester, and a
 communion cloth that the parishioners are to present to Pennicote
 Church."
 
 Mrs. Davilow went into these details timidly: but how else was she to
 bring the fact of their position home to this poor child who, alas!
 must submit at present, whatever might be in the background for her?
 and she herself had a superstition that there must be something better
 in the background.
--**--**--
 uncle and aunt. There was an air of reticence in Gwendolen's haughty,
 resistant speeches which implied that she had a definite plan in
 reserve; and her practical ignorance continually exhibited, could not
 nullify the mother's belief in the effectiveness of that forcible will
 and daring which had held mastery over herself.
 
 "I have some ornaments, mamma, and I could sell them," said Gwendolen.
 "They would make a sum: I want a little sum--just to go on with. I dare
 say Marshall, at Wanchester, would take them: I know he showed me some
 bracelets once that he said he had bought from a lady. Jocosa might go
 and ask him. Jocosa is going to leave us, of course. But she might do
 that first."
 
 "She would do anything she could, poor, dear soul. I have not told you
 yet--she wanted me to take all her savings--her three hundred pounds. I
 tell her to set up a little school. It will be hard for her to go into
 a new family now she has been so long with us."
 
 "Oh, recommend her for the bishop's daughter's," said Gwendolen, with a
 sudden gleam of laughter in her face. "I am sure she will do better
 than I should."
 
 "Do take care not to say such things to your uncle," said Mrs. Davilow.
 "He will be hurt at your despising what he has exerted himself about.
 But I dare say you have something else in your mind that he might not
 disapprove, if you consulted him."
 
 "There is some one else I want to consult first. Are the Arrowpoint's
 at Quetcham still, and is Herr Klesmer there? But I daresay you know
 nothing about it, poor, dear mamma. Can Jeffries go on horseback with a
 note?"
 
 "Oh, my dear, Jefferies is not here, and the dealer has taken the
--**--**--
 different from the habitual lazy combinations begotten by our wishes.
 The Arrowpoints' hour of astonishment was come.
 
 When there is a passion between an heiress and a proud
 independent-spirited man, it is difficult for them to come to an
 understanding; but the difficulties are likely to be overcome unless
 the proud man secures himself by a constant _alibi_. Brief meetings
 after studied absence are potent in disclosure: but more potent still
 is frequent companionship, with full sympathy in taste and admirable
 qualities on both sides; especially where the one is in the position of
 teacher and the other is delightedly conscious of receptive ability
 which also gives the teacher delight. The situation is famous in
 history, and has no less charm now than it had in the days of Abelard.
 
 But this kind of comparison had not occurred to the Arrowpoints when
 they first engaged Klesmer to come down to Quetcham. To have a
 first-rate musician in your house is a privilege of wealth; Catherine's
 musical talent demanded every advantage; and she particularly desired
 to use her quieter time in the country for more thorough study. Klesmer
 was not yet a Liszt, understood to be adored by ladies of all European
 countries with the exception of Lapland: and even with that
 understanding it did not follow that he would make proposals to an
 heiress. No musician of honor would do so. Still less was it
 conceivable that Catherine would give him the slightest pretext for
 such daring. The large check that Mr. Arrowpoint was to draw in
 Klesmer's name seemed to make him as safe an inmate as a footman. Where
 marriage is inconceivable, a girl's sentiments are safe.
 
 Klesmer was eminently a man of honor, but marriages rarely begin with
 formal proposals, and moreover, Catherine's limit of the conceivable
--**--**--
 need to prepare Klesmer.
 
 "Herr Klesmer," said Mrs. Arrowpoint, with a rather contemptuous
 stateliness, "it is unnecessary to repeat what has passed between us
 and our daughter. Mr. Arrowpoint will tell you our resolution."
 
 "Your marrying is out of the question," said Mr. Arrowpoint, rather too
 heavily weighted with his task, and standing in an embarrassment
 unrelieved by a cigar. "It is a wild scheme altogether. A man has been
 called out for less."
 
 "You have taken a base advantage of our confidence," burst in Mrs.
 Arrowpoint, unable to carry out her purpose and leave the burden of
 speech to her husband.
 
 Klesmer made a low bow in silent irony.
 
 "The pretension is ridiculous. You had better give it up and leave the
 house at once," continued Mr. Arrowpoint. He wished to do without
 mentioning the money.
 
 "I can give up nothing without reference to your daughter's wish," said
 Klesmer. "My engagement is to her."
 
 "It is useless to discuss the question," said Mrs. Arrowpoint. "We
 shall never consent to the marriage. If Catherine disobeys us we shall
 disinherit her. You will not marry her fortune. It is right you should
 know that."
 
 "Madam, her fortune has been the only thing I have had to regret about
 her. But I must ask her if she will not think the sacrifice greater
 than I am worthy of."
 
 "It is no sacrifice to me," said Catherine, "except that I am sorry to
 hurt my father and mother. I have always felt my fortune to be a
 wretched fatality of my life."
 
 "You mean to defy us, then?" said Mrs. Arrowpoint.
 
 "I mean to marry Herr Klesmer," said Catherine, firmly.
 
 "He had better not count on our relenting," said Mrs. Arrowpoint, whose
 manners suffered from that impunity in insult which has been reckoned
--**--**--
 be taught--trained to bear yourself on the stage, as a horse, however
 beautiful, must be trained for the circus; to say nothing of that study
 which would enable you to personate a character consistently, and
 animate it with the natural language of face, gesture, and tone. For
 you to get an engagement fit for you straight away is out of the
 question."
 
 "I really cannot understand that," said Gwendolen, rather
 haughtily--then, checking herself, she added in another tone--"I shall
 be obliged to you if you will explain how it is that such poor
 actresses get engaged. I have been to the theatre several times, and I
 am sure there were actresses who seemed to me to act not at all well
 and who were quite plain."
 
 "Ah, my dear Miss Harleth, that is the easy criticism of the buyer. We
 who buy slippers toss away this pair and the other as clumsy; but there
 went an apprenticeship to the making of them. Excuse me; you could not
 at present teach one of those actresses; but there is certainly much
 that she could teach you. For example, she can pitch her voice so as to
 be heard: ten to one you could not do it till after many trials. Merely
 to stand and move on the stage is an art--requires practice. It is
 understood that we are not now talking of a _comparse_ in a petty
 theatre who earns the wages of a needle-woman. That is out of the
 question for you."
 
 "Of course I must earn more than that," said Gwendolen, with a sense of
 wincing rather than of being refuted, "but I think I could soon learn
 to do tolerably well all those little things you have mentioned. I am
 not so very stupid. And even in Paris, I am sure, I saw two actresses
--**--**--
 have here nothing to do with art. The woman who takes up this career is
 not an artist: she is usually one who thinks of entering on a luxurious
 life by a short and easy road--perhaps by marriage--that is her most
 brilliant chance, and the rarest. Still, her career will not be
 luxurious to begin with: she can hardly earn her own poor bread
 independently at once, and the indignities she will be liable to are
 such as I will not speak of."
 
 "I desire to be independent," said Gwendolen, deeply stung and
 confusedly apprehending some scorn for herself in Klesmer's words.
 "That was my reason for asking whether I could not get an immediate
 engagement. Of course I cannot know how things go on about theatres.
 But I thought that I could have made myself independent. I have no
 money, and I will not accept help from any one."
 
 Her wounded pride could not rest without making this disclaimer. It was
 intolerable to her that Klesmer should imagine her to have expected
 other help from him than advice.
 
 "That is a hard saying for your friends," said Klesmer, recovering the
 gentleness of tone with which he had begun the conversation. "I have
 given you pain. That was inevitable. I was bound to put the truth, the
 unvarnished truth, before you. I have not said--I will not say--you
 will do wrong to choose the hard, climbing path of an endeavoring
 artist. You have to compare its difficulties with those of any less
 hazardous--any more private course which opens itself to you. If you
 take that more courageous resolve I will ask leave to shake hands with
 you on the strength of our freemasonry, where we are all vowed to the
 service of art, and to serve her by helping every fellow-servant."
--**--**--
 "That was for him to find out. It seems to me a very extraordinary
 world if people in our position must sink in this way all at once,"
 said Gwendolen, the other worlds with which she was conversant being
 constructed with a sense of fitness that arranged her own future
 agreeably.
 
 It was her temper that framed her sentences under this entirely new
 pressure of evils: she could have spoken more suitably on the
 vicissitudes in other people's lives, though it was never her
 aspiration to express herself virtuously so much as cleverly--a point
 to be remembered in extenuation of her words, which were usually worse
 than she was.
 
 And, notwithstanding the keen sense of her own bruises, she was capable
 of some compunction when her uncle and aunt received her with a more
 affectionate kindness than they had ever shown before. She could not
 but be struck by the dignified cheerfulness with which they talked of
 the necessary economies in their way of living, and in the education of
 the boys. Mr. Gascoigne's worth of character, a little obscured by
 worldly opportunities--as the poetic beauty of women is obscured by the
 demands of fashionable dressing--showed itself to great advantage under
 this sudden reduction of fortune. Prompt and methodical, he had set
 himself not only to put down his carriage, but to reconsider his worn
 suits of clothes, to leave off meat for breakfast, to do without
 periodicals, to get Edwy from school and arrange hours of study for all
 the boys under himself, and to order the whole establishment on the
 sparest footing possible. For all healthy people economy has its
 pleasures; and the rector's spirit had spread through the household.
 Mrs. Gascoigne and Anna, who always made papa their model, really did
 not miss anything they cared about for themselves, and in all sincerity
--**--**--
 all as the links of persuasive reflection which they formed for the
 good uncle. She began, desperately, to seek an alternative.
 
 "There was another situation, I think, mamma spoke of?" she said, with
 determined self-mastery.
 
 '"Yes," said the rector, in rather a depreciatory tone; "but that is in
 a school. I should not have the same satisfaction in your taking that.
 It would be much harder work, you are aware, and not so good in any
 other respect. Besides, you have not an equal chance of getting it."
 
 "Oh dear no," said Mrs. Gascoigne, "it would be much less appropriate,
 You might not have a bedroom to yourself." And Gwendolen's memories of
 school suggested other particulars which forced her to admit to herself
 that this alternative would be no relief. She turned to her uncle again
 and said, apparently in acceptance of his ideas--
 
 "When is Mrs. Mompert likely to send for me?"
 
 "That is rather uncertain, but she has promised not to entertain any
 other proposal till she has seen you. She has entered with much feeling
 into your position. It will be within the next fortnight, probably. But
 I must be off now. I am going to let part of my glebe uncommonly well."
 
 The rector ended very cheerfully, leaving the room with the
 satisfactory conviction that Gwendolen was going to adapt herself to
 circumstances like a girl of good sense. Having spoken appropriately,
 he naturally supposed that the effects would be appropriate; being
 accustomed, as a household and parish authority, to be asked to "speak
 to" refractory persons, with the understanding that the measure was
 morally coercive.
 
 "What a stay Henry is to us all?" said Mrs. Gascoigne, when her husband
 had left the room.
 
 "He is indeed," said Mrs. Davilow, cordially. "I think cheerfulness is
--**--**--
 Her mother had to make excuses for her not appearing, even when Anna
 came to see her. For that calm which Gwendolen had promised herself to
 maintain had changed into sick motivelessness: she thought, "I suppose
 I shall begin to pretend by-and-by, but why should I do it now?"
 
 Her mother watched her with silent distress; and, lapsing into the
 habit of indulgent tenderness, she began to think what she imagined
 that Gwendolen was thinking, and to wish that everything should give
 way to the possibility of making her darling less miserable.
 
 One day when she was in the black and yellow bedroom and her mother was
 lingering there under the pretext of considering and arranging
 Gwendolen's articles of dress, she suddenly roused herself to fetch the
 casket which contained the ornaments.
 
 "Mamma," she began, glancing over the upper layer, "I had forgotten
 these things. Why didn't you remind me of them? Do see about getting
 them sold. You will not mind about parting with them. You gave them all
 to me long ago."
 
 She lifted the upper tray and looked below.
 
 "If we can do without them, darling, I would rather keep them for you,"
 said Mrs. Davilow, seating herself beside Gwendolen with a feeling of
 relief that she was beginning to talk about something. The usual
 relation between them had become reversed. It was now the mother who
 tried to cheer the daughter. "Why, how came you to put that pocket
 handkerchief in here?"
 
 It was the handkerchief with the corner torn off which Gwendolen had
 thrust in with the turquoise necklace.
 
 "It happened to be with the necklace--I was in a hurry." said
 Gwendolen, taking the handkerchief away and putting it in her pocket.
 "Don't sell the necklace, mamma," she added, a new feeling having come
--**--**--
 the mother would send for her back." This sneer slipped off his tongue
 without strict intention.
 
 "Send Hutchins to inquire whether she will be there tomorrow." Lush did
 not move. Like many persons who have thought over beforehand what they
 shall say in given cases, he was impelled by an unexpected irritation
 to say some of those prearranged things before the cases were given.
 Grandcourt, in fact, was likely to get into a scrape so tremendous that
 it was impossible to let him take the first step toward it without
 remonstrance. Lush retained enough caution to use a tone of rational
 friendliness, still he felt his own value to his patron, and was
 prepared to be daring.
 
 "It would be as well for you to remember, Grandcourt, that you are
 coming under closer fire now. There can be none of the ordinary
 flirting done, which may mean everything or nothing. You must make up
 your mind whether you wish to be accepted; and more than that, how you
 would like being refused. Either one or the other. You can't be
 philandering after her again for six weeks."
 
 Grandcourt said nothing, but pressed the newspaper down on his knees
 and began to light another cigar. Lush took this as a sign that he was
 willing to listen, and was the more bent on using the opportunity; he
 wanted, if possible, to find out which would be the more potent cause
 of hesitation--probable acceptance or probable refusal.
 
 "Everything has a more serious look now than it had before. There is
 her family to be provided for. You could not let your wife's mother
 live in beggary. It will be a confoundedly hampering affair. Marriage
 will pin you down in a way you haven't been used to; and in point of
 money you have not too much elbow-room. And after all, what will you
--**--**--
 of forlornness; it was a visibly sterile distance enclosing the dreary
 path at her feet, in which she had no courage to tread. She was in that
 first crisis of passionate youthful rebellion against what is not fitly
 called pain, but rather the absence of joy--that first rage of
 disappointment in life's morning, which we whom the years have subdued
 are apt to remember but dimly as part of our own experience, and so to
 be intolerant of its self-enclosed unreasonableness and impiety. What
 passion seems more absurd, when we have got outside it and looked at
 calamity as a collective risk, than this amazed anguish that I and not
 Thou, He or She, should be just the smitten one? Yet perhaps some who
 have afterward made themselves a willing fence before the breast of
 another, and have carried their own heart-wound in heroic silence--some
 who have made their deeds great, nevertheless began with this angry
 amazement at their own smart, and on the mere denial of their fantastic
 desires raged as if under the sting of wasps which reduced the universe
 for them to an unjust infliction of pain. This was nearly poor
 Gwendolen's condition. What though such a reverse as hers had often
 happened to other girls? The one point she had been all her life
 learning to care for was, that it had happened to _her_: it was what
 _she_ felt under Klesmer's demonstration that she was not remarkable
 enough to command fortune by force of will and merit; it was what _she_
 would feel under the rigors of Mrs. Mompert's constant expectation,
 under the dull demand that she should be cheerful with three Miss
 Momperts, under the necessity of showing herself entirely submissive,
 and keeping her thoughts to herself. To be a queen disthroned is not so
--**--**--
 could she utter this? Even if she had not promised that woman to be
 silent, it would have been impossible for her to enter on the subject
 with Grandcourt. But how could she arrest his wooing by beginning to
 make a formal speech--"I perceive your intention--it is most
 flattering, etc."? A fish honestly invited to come and be eaten has a
 clear course in declining, but how if it finds itself swimming against
 a net? And apart from the network, would she have dared at once to say
 anything decisive? Gwendolen had not time to be clear on that point. As
 it was, she felt compelled to silence, and after a pause, Grandcourt
 said--
 
 "Am I to understand that some one else is preferred?"
 
 Gwendolen, now impatient of her own embarrassment, determined to rush
 at the difficulty and free herself. She raised her eyes again and said
 with something of her former clearness and defiance, "No"--wishing him
 to understand, "What then? I may not be ready to take _you_." There was
 nothing that Grandcourt could not understand which he perceived likely
 to affect his _amour propre_.
 
 "The last thing I would do, is to importune you. I should not hope to
 win you by making myself a bore. If there were no hope for me, I would
 ask you to tell me so at once, that I might just ride away to--no
 matter where."
 
 Almost to her own astonishment, Gwendolen felt a sudden alarm at the
 image of Grandcourt finally riding away. What would be left her then?
 Nothing but the former dreariness. She liked him to be there. She
 snatched at the subject that would defer any decisive answer.
 
 "I fear you are not aware of what has happened to us. I have lately had
 to think so much of my mamma's troubles, that other subjects have been
--**--**--
 "Mamma, if you say that again, I will not marry him," said Gwendolen,
 angrily.
 
 "My dear child, I trust you are not going to marry only for my sake,"
 said Mrs. Davilow, depreciatingly.
 
 Gwendolen tossed her head on the pillow away from her mother, and let
 the ring lie. She was irritated at this attempt to take away a motive.
 Perhaps the deeper cause of her irritation was the consciousness that
 she was not going to marry solely for her mamma's sake--that she was
 drawn toward the marriage in ways against which stronger reasons than
 her mother's renunciation were yet not strong enough to hinder her. She
 had waked up to the signs that she was irrevocably engaged, and all the
 ugly visions, the alarms, the arguments of the night, must be met by
 daylight, in which probably they would show themselves weak. "What I
 long for is your happiness, dear," continued Mrs. Davilow, pleadingly.
 "I will not say anything to vex you. Will you not put on the ring?"
 
 For a few moments Gwendolen did not answer, but her thoughts were
 active. At last she raised herself with a determination to do as she
 would do if she had started on horseback, and go on with spirit,
 whatever ideas might be running in her head.
 
 "I thought the lover always put on the betrothal ring himself," she
 said laughingly, slipping the ring on her finger, and looking at it
 with a charming movement of her head. "I know why he has sent it," she
 added, nodding at her mamma.
 
 "Why?"
 
 "He would rather make me put it on than ask me to let him do it. Aha!
 he is very proud. But so am I. We shall match each other. I should hate
 a man who went down on his knees, and came fawning on me. He really is
--**--**--
 out of his still sleeping comrade, is understood to lack the trained
 motive which makes a character fairly calculable in its actions; but by
 a roundabout course even a gentleman may make of himself a chancy
 personage, raising an uncertainty as to what he may do next, that sadly
 spoils companionship.
 
 Grandcourt's thoughts this evening were like the circlets one sees in a
 dark pool, continually dying out and continually started again by some
 impulse from below the surface. The deeper central impulse came from
 the image of Gwendolen; but the thoughts it stirred would be
 imperfectly illustrated by a reference to the amatory poets of all
 ages. It was characteristic that he got none of his satisfaction from
 the belief that Gwendolen was in love with him; and that love had
 overcome the jealous resentment which had made her run away from him.
 On the contrary, he believed that this girl was rather exceptional in
 the fact that, in spite of his assiduous attention to her, she was not
 in love with him; and it seemed to him very likely that if it had not
 been for the sudden poverty which had come over her family, she would
 not have accepted him. From the very first there had been an
 exasperating fascination in the tricksiness with which she had--not met
 his advances, but--wheeled away from them. She had been brought to
 accept him in spite of everything--brought to kneel down like a horse
 under training for the arena, though she might have an objection to it
 all the while. On the whole, Grandcourt got more pleasure out of this
 notion than he could have done out of winning a girl of whom he was
 sure that she had a strong inclination for him personally. And yet this
 pleasure in mastering reluctance flourished along with the habitual
--**--**--
 "No, not particularly," said Grandcourt, in his most languid way. "He
 thinks a little too much of himself. I thought he had been introduced
 to you."
 
 "No. Some one told me his name the evening before I came away. That was
 all. What is he?"
 
 "A sort of ward of Sir Hugo Mallinger's. Nothing of any consequence."
 
 "Oh, poor creature! How very unpleasant for him!" said Gwendolen,
 speaking from the lip, and not meaning any sarcasm. "I wonder if it has
 left off raining!" she added, rising and going to look out of the
 window.
 
 Happily it did not rain the next day, and Gwendolen rode to Diplow on
 Criterion as she had done on that former day when she returned with her
 mother in the carriage. She always felt the more daring for being in
 her riding-dress; besides having the agreeable belief that she looked
 as well as possible in it--a sustaining consciousness in any meeting
 which seems formidable. Her anger toward Deronda had changed into a
 superstitious dread--due, perhaps, to the coercion he had exercised
 over her thought--lest the first interference of his in her life might
 foreshadow some future influence. It is of such stuff that
 superstitions are commonly made: an intense feeling about ourselves
 which makes the evening star shine at us with a threat, and the
 blessing of a beggar encourage us. And superstitions carry consequences
 which often verify their hope or their foreboding.
 
 The time before luncheon was taken up for Gwendolen by going over the
 rooms with Mrs. Torrington and Mrs. Davilow; and she thought it likely
 that if she saw Deronda, there would hardly be need for more than a bow
 between them. She meant to notice him as little as possible.
 
 And after all she found herself under an inward compulsion too strong
--**--**--
 only natural and desirable. As to her, it was thought that a woman who
 was understood to have forsaken her child along with her husband had
 probably sunk lower. Grandcourt had of course got weary of her. He was
 much given to the pursuit of women: but a man in his position would by
 this time desire to make a suitable marriage with the fair young
 daughter of a noble house. No one talked of Mrs. Glasher now, any more
 than they talked of the victim in a trial for manslaughter ten years
 before: she was a lost vessel after whom nobody would send out an
 expedition of search; but Grandcourt was seen in harbor with his colors
 flying, registered as seaworthy as ever.
 
 Yet, in fact, Grandcourt had never disentangled himself from Mrs.
 Glasher. His passion for her had been the strongest and most lasting he
 had ever known; and though it was now as dead as the music of a cracked
 flute, it had left a certain dull disposedness, which, on the death of
 her husband three years before, had prompted in him a vacillating
 notion of marrying her, in accordance with the understanding often
 expressed between them during the days of his first ardor. At that
 early time Grandcourt would willingly have paid for the freedom to be
 won by a divorce; but the husband would not oblige him, not wanting to
 be married again himself, and not wishing to have his domestic habits
 printed in evidence.
 
 The altered poise which the years had brought in Mrs. Glasher was just
 the reverse. At first she was comparatively careless about the
 possibility of marriage. It was enough that she had escaped from a
 disagreeable husband and found a sort of bliss with a lover who had
 completely fascinated her--young, handsome, amorous, and living in the
--**--**--
 Henleigh's head, that energetic scion began to beat the friend's arm
 away with his fists. The little girls submitted bashfully to be patted
 under the chin and kissed, but on the whole it seemed better to send
 them into the garden, where they were presently dancing and chatting
 with the dogs on the gravel.
 
 "How far are you come?" said Mrs. Glasher, as Grandcourt put away his
 hat and overcoat.
 
 "From Diplow," he answered slowly, seating himself opposite her and
 looking at her with an unnoting gaze which she noted.
 
 "You are tired, then."
 
 "No, I rested at the Junction--a hideous hole. These railway journeys
 are always a confounded bore. But I had coffee and smoked."
 
 Grandcourt drew out his handkerchief, rubbed his face, and in returning
 the handkerchief to his pocket looked at his crossed knee and blameless
 boot, as if any stranger were opposite to him, instead of a woman
 quivering with a suspense which every word and look of his was to
 incline toward hope or dread. But he was really occupied with their
 interview and what it was likely to include. Imagine the difference in
 rate of emotion between this woman whom the years had worn to a more
 conscious dependence and sharper eagerness, and this man whom they were
 dulling into a more neutral obstinacy.
 
 "I expected to see you--it was so long since I had heard from you. I
 suppose the weeks seem longer at Gadsmere than they do at Diplow," said
 Mrs. Glasher. She had a quick, incisive way of speaking that seemed to
 go with her features, as the tone and _timbre_ of a violin go with its
 form.
 
 "Yes," drawled Grandcourt. "But you found the money paid into the bank."
 
 "Oh, yes," said Mrs. Glasher, curtly, tingling with impatience. Always
--**--**--
 
 At last they were alone again, with the candles above them, face to
 face with each other. Grandcourt looked at his watch, and then said, in
 an apparently indifferent drawl, "There is one thing I had to mention,
 Lydia. My diamonds--you have them."
 
 "Yes, I have them," she answered promptly, rising and standing with her
 arms thrust down and her fingers threaded, while Grandcourt sat still.
 She had expected the topic, and made her resolve about it. But she
 meant to carry out her resolve, if possible, without exasperating him.
 During the hours of silence she had longed to recall the words which
 had only widened the breach between them.
 
 "They are in this house, I suppose?"
 
 "No; not in this house."
 
 "I thought you said you kept them by you."
 
 "When I said so it was true. They are in the bank at Dudley."
 
 "Get them away, will you? I must make an arrangement for your
 delivering them to some one."
 
 "Make no arrangement. They shall be delivered to the person you
 intended them for. _I_ will make the arrangement."
 
 "What do you mean?"
 
 "What I say. I have always told you that I would give them up to your
 wife. I shall keep my word. She is not your wife yet."
 
 "This is foolery," said Grandcourt, with undertoned disgust. It was too
 irritating that this indulgence of Lydia had given her a sort of
 mastery over him in spite of dependent condition.
 
 She did not speak. He also rose now, but stood leaning against the
 mantle-piece with his side-face toward her.
 
 "The diamonds must be delivered to me before my marriage," he began
 again.
 
 "What is your wedding-day?"
 
 "The tenth. There is no time to be lost."
 
 "And where do you go after the marriage?"
 
 He did not reply except by looking more sullen. Presently he said, "You
--**--**--
 whose life he had allowed to send such deep suckers into his, had a
 terrible power of annoyance in her; and the rash hurry of his
 proceedings had left her opportunities open. His pride saw very ugly
 possibilities threatening it, and he stood for several minutes in
 silence reviewing the situation--considering how he could act upon her.
 Unlike himself she was of a direct nature, with certain simple
 strongly-colored tendencies, and there was one often-experienced effect
 which he thought he could count upon now. As Sir Hugo had said of him,
 Grandcourt knew how to play his cards upon occasion.
 
 He did not speak again, but looked at his watch, rang the bell, and
 ordered the vehicle to be brought round immediately. Then he removed
 farther from her, walked as if in expectation of a summons, and
 remained silent without turning his eyes upon her.
 
 She was suffering the horrible conflict of self-reproach and tenacity.
 She saw beforehand Grandcourt leaving her without even looking at her
 again--herself left behind in lonely uncertainty--hearing nothing from
 him--not knowing whether she had done her children harm--feeling that
 she had perhaps made him hate her;--all the wretchedness of a creature
 who had defeated her own motives. And yet she could not bear to give up
 a purpose which was a sweet morsel to her vindictiveness. If she had
 not been a mother she would willingly have sacrificed herself to her
 revenge--to what she felt to be the justice of hindering another from
 getting happiness by willingly giving her over to misery. The two
 dominant passions were at struggle. She must satisfy them both.
 
 "Don't let us part in anger, Henleigh," she began, without changing her
 voice or attitude: "it is a very little thing I ask. If I were refusing
 to give anything up that you call yours it would be different: that
--**--**--
 Mrs. Meyrick's, where he was about to pay his first visit since his
 arrival from Leubronn. For Mirah was certainly a creature in whom it
 was difficult not to show a tender kind of interest both by looks and
 speech.
 
 Mrs. Meyrick had not failed to send Deronda a report of Mirah's
 well-being in her family. "We are getting fonder of her every day," she
 had written. "At breakfast-time we all look toward the door with
 expectation to see her come in; and we watch her and listen to her as
 if she were a native from a new country. I have not heard a word from
 her lips that gives me a doubt about her. She is quite contented and
 full of gratitude. My daughters are learning from her, and they hope to
 get her other pupils; for she is anxious not to eat the bread of
 idleness, but to work, like my girls. Mab says our life has become like
 a fairy tale, and all she is afraid of is that Mirah will turn into a
 nightingale again and fly away from us. Her voice is just perfect: not
 loud and strong, but searching and melting, like the thoughts of what
 has been. That is the way old people like me feel a beautiful voice."
 
 But Mrs. Meyrick did not enter into particulars which would have
 required her to say that Amy and Mab, who had accompanied Mirah to the
 synagogue, found the Jewish faith less reconcilable with their wishes
 in her case than in that of Scott's Rebecca. They kept silence out of
 delicacy to Mirah, with whom her religion was too tender a subject to
 be touched lightly; but after a while Amy, who was much of a practical
 reformer, could not restrain a question.
--**--**--
 thinking of vulgar Jews with a sort of personal alarm. But a little
 comparison will often diminish our surprise and disgust at the
 aberrations of Jews and other dissidents whose lives do not offer a
 consistent or lovely pattern of their creed; and this evening Deronda,
 becoming more conscious that he was falling into unfairness and
 ridiculous exaggeration, began to use that corrective comparison: he
 paid his thaler too much, without prejudice to his interests in the
 Hebrew destiny, or his wish to find the _Rabbinische Schule_, which he
 arrived at by sunset, and entered with a good congregation of men.
 
 He happened to take his seat in a line with an elderly man from whom he
 was distant enough to glance at him more than once as rather a
 noticeable figure--his ample white beard and felt hat framing a profile
 of that fine contour which may as easily be Italian as Hebrew. He
 returned Deronda's notice till at last their eyes met; an undesirable
 chance with unknown persons, and a reason to Deronda for not looking
 again; but he immediately found an open prayer-book pushed toward him
 and had to bow his thanks. However, the congregation had mustered, the
 reader had mounted to the _almemor_ or platform, and the service began.
 Deronda, having looked enough at the German translation of the Hebrew
 in the book before him to know that he was chiefly hearing Psalms and
 Old Testament passages or phrases, gave himself up to that strongest
 effect of chanted liturgies which is independent of detailed verbal
 meaning--like the effect of an Allegri's _Miserere_ or a Palestrina's
 _Magnificat_. The most powerful movement of feeling with a liturgy is
 the prayer which seeks for nothing special, but is a yearning to escape
 from the limitations of our own weakness and an invocation of all Good
--**--**--
 grand scale, or of reasons that lay very far off. This was the point of
 strongest difference between him and Deronda, who rarely ate at
 breakfast without some silent discursive flight after grounds for
 filling up his day according to the practice of his contemporaries.
 
 This halt at Frankfort was taken on their way home, and its impressions
 were kept the more actively vibrating in him by the duty of caring for
 Mirah's welfare. That question about his parentage, which if he had not
 both inwardly and outwardly shaken it off as trivial, would have seemed
 a threat rather than a promise of revelation, and reinforced his
 anxiety as to the effect of finding Mirah's relatives and his resolve
 to proceed with caution. If he made any unpleasant discovery, was he
 bound to a disclosure that might cast a new net of trouble around her?
 He had written to Mrs. Meyrick to announce his visit at four o'clock,
 and he found Mirah seated at work with only Mrs. Meyrick and Mab, the
 open piano, and all the glorious company of engravings. The dainty
 neatness of her hair and dress, the glow of tranquil happiness in a
 face where a painter need have changed nothing if he had wanted to put
 it in front of the host singing "peace on earth and good will to men,"
 made a contrast to his first vision of her that was delightful to
 Deronda's eyes. Mirah herself was thinking of it, and immediately on
 their greeting said--
 
 "See how different I am from the miserable creature by the river! all
 because you found me and brought me to the very best."
 
 "It was my good chance to find you," said Deronda. "Any other man would
 have been glad to do what I did."
 
 "That is not the right way to be thinking about it," said Mirah,
--**--**--
 
 "I will sing it if you like," said Mirah, "but I don't sing real
 words--only here and there a syllable like hers--the rest is lisping.
 Do you know Hebrew? because if you do, my singing will seem childish
 nonsense."
 
 Deronda shook his head. "It will be quite good Hebrew to me."
 
 Mirah crossed her little feet and hands in her easiest attitude, and
 then lifted up her head at an angle which seemed to be directed to some
 invisible face bent over her, while she sang a little hymn of quaint
 melancholy intervals, with syllables that really seemed childish
 lisping to her audience; the voice in which she gave it forth had
 gathered even a sweeter, more cooing tenderness than was heard in her
 other songs.
 
 "If I were ever to know the real words, I should still go on in my old
 way with them," said Mirah, when she had repeated the hymn several
 times.
 
 "Why not?" said Deronda. "The lisped syllables are very full of
 meaning."
 
 "Yes, indeed," said Mrs. Meyrick. "A mother hears something of a lisp
 in her children's talk to the very last. Their words are not just what
 everybody else says, though they may be spelled the same. If I were to
 live till my Hans got old, I should still see the boy in him. A
 mother's love, I often say, is like a tree that has got all the wood in
 it, from the very first it made."
 
 "Is not that the way with friendship, too?" said Deronda, smiling. "We
 must not let the mothers be too arrogant."
 
 The little woman shook her head over her darning.
 
 "It is easier to find an old mother than an old friend. Friendships
 begin with liking or gratitude--roots that can be pulled up. Mother's
--**--**--
 
 "I'll tell you what, Dan," said Sir Hugo, "a man who sets his face
 against every sort of humbug is simply a three-cornered, impracticable
 fellow. There's a bad style of humbug, but there is also a good
 style--one that oils the wheels and makes progress possible. If you are
 to rule men, you must rule them through their own ideas; and I agree
 with the Archbishop at Naples who had a St. Januarius procession
 against the plague. It's no use having an Order in Council against
 popular shallowness. There is no action possible without a little
 acting."
 
 "One may be obliged to give way to an occasional necessity," said
 Deronda. "But it is one thing to say, 'In this particular case I am
 forced to put on this foolscap and grin,' and another to buy a pocket
 foolscap and practice myself in grinning. I can't see any real public
 expediency that does not keep an ideal before it which makes a limit of
 deviation from the direct path. But if I were to set up for a public
 man I might mistake my success for public expediency."
 
 It was after this dialogue, which was rather jarring to him, that
 Deronda set out on his meditated second visit to Ezra Cohen's. He
 entered the street at the end opposite to the Holborn entrance, and an
 inward reluctance slackened his pace while his thoughts were
 transferring what he had just been saying about public expediency to
 the entirely private difficulty which brought him back again into this
 unattractive thoroughfare. It might soon become an immediate practical
 question with him how far he could call it a wise expediency to conceal
 the fact of close kindred. Such questions turning up constantly in life
 are often decided in a rough-and-ready way; and to many it will appear
--**--**--
 see what I can do for you."
 
 Deronda thus left the most favorable impression behind him, as a
 preparation for more easy intercourse. But for his own part those
 amenities had been carried on under the heaviest spirits. If these were
 really Mirah's relatives, he could not imagine that even her fervid
 filial piety could give the reunion with them any sweetness beyond such
 as could be found in the strict fulfillment of a painful duty. What did
 this vaunting brother need? And with the most favorable supposition
 about the hypothetic mother, Deronda shrank from the image of a first
 meeting between her and Mirah, and still more from the idea of Mirah's
 domestication with this family. He took refuge in disbelief. To find an
 Ezra Cohen when the name was running in your head was no more
 extraordinary than to find a Josiah Smith under like circumstances; and
 as to the coincidence about the daughter, it would probably turn out to
 be a difference. If, however, further knowledge confirmed the more
 undesirable conclusion, what would be wise expediency?--to try and
 determine the best consequences by concealment, or to brave other
 consequences for the sake of that openness which is the sweet fresh air
 of our moral life.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXIV.
 
         "Er ist geheissen
   Israel. Ihn hat verwandelt
   Hexenspruch in elnen Hund.
        *       *       *       *       *
   Aber jeden Freitag Abend,
   In der Dmmrungstunde, pltzlich
   Weicht der Zauber, und der Hund
   Wird aufs Neu' ein menschlich Wesen."
                     --HEINE: _Prinzessin Sabbaz_.
 
 
 When Deronda arrived at five o'clock, the shop was closed and the door
 was opened for him by the Christian servant. When she showed him into
 the room behind the shop he was surprised at the prettiness of the
 scene. The house was old, and rather extensive at the back: probably
--**--**--
 it on demand, saying,--
 
 "Is that the sort of thing you want, Jacob?"
 
 It was subjected to a severe scrutiny, the hook and blades were opened,
 and the article of barter with the cork-screw was drawn forth for
 comparison.
 
 "Why do you like a hook better than a cork-screw?" said Deronda.
 
 "'Caush I can get hold of things with a hook. A corkscrew won't go into
 anything but corks. But it's better for you, you can draw corks."
 
 "You agree to change, then?" said Deronda, observing that the
 grandmother was listening with delight.
 
 "What else have you got in your pockets?" said Jacob, with deliberative
 seriousness.
 
 "Hush, hush, Jacob, love," said the grandmother. And Deronda, mindful
 of discipline, answered--
 
 "I think I must not tell you that. Our business was with the knives."
 
 Jacob looked up into his face scanningly for a moment or two, and
 apparently arriving at his conclusions, said gravely--
 
 "I'll shwop," handing the cork-screw knife to Deronda, who pocketed it
 with corresponding gravity.
 
 Immediately the small son of Shem ran off into the next room, whence
 his voice was heard in rapid chat; and then ran back again--when,
 seeing his father enter, he seized a little velveteen hat which lay on
 a chair and put it on to approach him. Cohen kept on his own hat, and
 took no notice of the visitor, but stood still while the two children
 went up to him and clasped his knees: then he laid his hands on each in
 turn and uttered his Hebrew benediction; whereupon the wife, who had
 lately taken baby from the cradle, brought it up to her husband and
 held it under his outstretched hands, to be blessed in its sleep. For
 the moment, Deronda thought that this pawnbroker, proud of his
 vocation, was not utterly prosaic.
--**--**--
 delivered himself alone at some length, in a solemn chanting tone, with
 his chin slightly uplifted and his thin hands clasped easily before
 him. Not only in his accent and tone, but in his freedom from the
 self-consciousness which has reference to others' approbation, there
 could hardly have been a stronger contrast to the Jew at the other end
 of the table. It was an unaccountable conjunction--the presence among
 these common, prosperous, shopkeeping types, of a man who, in an
 emaciated threadbare condition, imposed a certain awe on Deronda, and
 an embarrassment at not meeting his expectations.
 
 No sooner had Mordecai finished his devotional strain, than rising,
 with a slight bend of his head to the stranger, he walked back into his
 room, and shut the door behind him.
 
 "That seems to be rather a remarkable man," said Deronda, turning to
 Cohen, who immediately set up his shoulders, put out his tongue
 slightly, and tapped his own brow. It was clearly to be understood that
 Mordecai did not come up to the standard of sanity which was set by Mr.
 Cohen's view of men and things.
 
 "Does he belong to your family?" said Deronda.
 
 This idea appeared to be rather ludicrous to the ladies as well as to
 Cohen, and the family interchanged looks of amusement.
 
 "No, no," said Cohen. "Charity! charity! he worked for me, and when he
 got weaker and weaker I took him in. He's an incumbrance; but he brings
 a blessing down, and he teaches the boy. Besides, he does the repairing
 at the watches and jewelry."
 
 Deronda hardly abstained from smiling at this mixture of kindliness and
 the desire to justify it in the light of a calculation; but his
 willingness to speak further of Mordecai, whose character was made the
 more enigmatically striking by these new details, was baffled. Mr.
--**--**--
 
 "I suppose he will be glad of it for the sake of his wife, else I dare
 say he would not have minded keeping at a distance," said Deronda.
 
 "It's a sort of troubadour story," said Lady Pentreath, an easy,
 deep-voiced old lady; "I'm glad to find a little romance left among us.
 I think our young people now are getting too worldly wise."
 
 "It shows the Arrowpoints' good sense, however, to have adopted the
 affair, after the fuss in the paper," said Sir Hugo. "And disowning
 your own child because of a _msalliance_ is something like disowning
 your one eye: everybody knows it's yours, and you have no other to make
 an appearance with."
 
 "As to _msalliance_, there's no blood on any side," said Lady
 Pentreath. "Old Admiral Arrowpoint was one of Nelson's men, you know--a
 doctor's son. And we all know how the mother's money came."
 
 "If they were any _msalliance_ in the case, I should say it was on
 Klesmer's side," said Deronda.
 
 "Ah, you think it is a case of the immortal marrying the mortal. What
 is your opinion?" said Sir Hugo, looking at Gwendolen.
 
 "I have no doubt that Herr Klesmer thinks himself immortal. But I dare
 say his wife will burn as much incense before him as he requires," said
 Gwendolen. She had recovered any composure that she might have lost.
 
 "Don't you approve of a wife burning incense before her husband?" said
 Sir Hugo, with an air of jocoseness.
 
 "Oh, yes," said Gwendolen, "if it were only to make others believe in
 him." She paused a moment and then said with more gayety, "When Herr
 Klesmer admires his own genius, it will take off some of the absurdity
 if his wife says Amen."
 
 "Klesmer is no favorite of yours, I see," said Sir Hugo.
--**--**--
 thought their exchange of looks as cold or official as if it had been a
 ceremony to keep up a charter. Still, the English fondness for reserve
 will account for much negation; and Grandcourt's manners with an extra
 veil of reserve over them might be expected to present the extreme type
 of the national taste.
 
 "Who else is inclined to make the tour of the house and premises?" said
 Sir Hugo. "The ladies must muffle themselves; there is only just about
 time to do it well before sunset. You will go, Dan, won't you?"
 
 "Oh, yes," said Deronda, carelessly, knowing that Sir Hugo would think
 any excuse disobliging.
 
 "All meet in the library, then, when they are ready--say in half an
 hour," said the baronet. Gwendolen made herself ready with wonderful
 quickness, and in ten minutes came down into the library in her sables,
 plume, and little thick boots. As soon as she entered the room she was
 aware that some one else was there: it was precisely what she had hoped
 for. Deronda was standing with his back toward her at the far end of
 the room, and was looking over a newspaper. How could little thick
 boots make any noise on an Axminster carpet? And to cough would have
 seemed an intended signaling which her pride could not condescend to;
 also, she felt bashful about walking up to him and letting him know
 that she was there, though it was her hunger to speak to him which had
 set her imagination on constructing this chance of finding him, and had
 made her hurry down, as birds hover near the water which they dare not
 drink. Always uneasily dubious about his opinion of her, she felt a
 peculiar anxiety to-day, lest he might think of her with contempt, as
--**--**--
 swell of its central rib. "When I was a little fellow these capitals
 taught me to observe and delight in the structure of leaves."
 
 "I suppose you can see every line of them with your eyes shut," said
 Juliet Fenn.
 
 "Yes. I was always repeating them, because for a good many years this
 court stood for me as my only image of a convent, and whenever I read
 of monks and monasteries, this was my scenery for them."
 
 "You must love this place very much," said Miss Fenn, innocently, not
 thinking of inheritance. "So many homes are like twenty others. But
 this is unique, and you seem to know every cranny of it. I dare say you
 could never love another home so well."
 
 "Oh, I carry it with me," said Deronda, quietly, being used to all
 possible thoughts of this kind. "To most men their early home is no
 more than a memory of their early years, and I'm not sure but they have
 the best of it. The image is never marred. There's no disappointment in
 memory, and one's exaggerations are always on the good side."
 
 Gwendolen felt sure that he spoke in that way out of delicacy to her
 and Grandcourt--because he knew they must hear him; and that he
 probably thought of her as a selfish creature who only cared about
 possessing things in her own person. But whatever he might say, it must
 have been a secret hardship to him that any circumstances of his birth
 had shut him out from the inheritance of his father's position; and if
 he supposed that she exulted in her husband's taking it, what could he
 feel for her but scornful pity? Indeed it seemed clear to her that he
 was avoiding her, and preferred talking to others--which nevertheless
--**--**--
 distinction into an amazed perception of her former ignorance about the
 possible mental attitude of a man toward the woman he sought in
 marriage--of her present ignorance as to what their life with each
 other might turn into. For novelty gives immeasurableness to fear, and
 fills the early time of all sad changes with phantoms of the future.
 Her little coquetries, voluntary or involuntary, had told on Grandcourt
 during courtship, and formed a medium of communication between them,
 showing him in the light of a creature such as she could understand and
 manage: But marriage had nulified all such interchange, and Grandcourt
 had become a blank uncertainty to her in everything but this, that he
 would do just what he willed, and that she had neither devices at her
 command to determine his will, nor any rational means of escaping it.
 
 What had occurred between them and her wearing the diamonds was
 typical. One evening, shortly before they came to the Abbey, they were
 going to dine at Brackenshaw Castle. Gwendolen had said to herself that
 she would never wear those diamonds: they had horrible words clinging
 and crawling about them, as from some bad dream, whose images lingered
 on the perturbed sense. She came down dressed in her white, with only a
 streak of gold and a pendant of emeralds, which Grandcourt had given
 her, round her neck, and the little emerald stars in her ears.
 
 Grandcourt stood with his back to the fire and looked at her as she
 entered.
 
 "Am I altogether as you like?" she said, speaking rather gaily. She was
 not without enjoyment in this occasion of going to Brackenshaw Castle
 with her new dignities upon her, as men whose affairs are sadly
 involved will enjoy dining out among persons likely to be under a
--**--**--
 
 "Well, since her voice is too weak for her to scream much, I'll tell
 Lady Clementina to set her on my nine granddaughters," said Lady
 Pentreath; "and I hope she'll convince eight of them that they have not
 voice enough to sing anywhere but at church. My notion is, that many of
 our girls nowadays want lessons not to sing."
 
 "I have had my lessons in that," said Gwendolen, looking at Deronda.
 "You see Lady Pentreath is on my side."
 
 While she was speaking, Sir Hugo entered with some of the other
 gentlemen, including Grandcourt, and standing against the group at the
 low tea-table said--
 
 "What imposition is Deronda putting on you, ladies--slipping in among
 you by himself?"
 
 "Wanting to pass off an obscurity on us as better than any celebrity,"
 said Lady Pentreath--"a pretty singing Jewess who is to astonish these
 young people. You and I, who heard Catalani in her prime, are not so
 easily astonished."
 
 Sir Hugo listened with his good-humored smile as he took a cup of tea
 from his wife, and then said, "Well, you know, a Liberal is bound to
 think that there have been singers since Catalani's time."
 
 "Ah, you are younger than I am. I dare say you are one of the men who
 ran after Alcharisi. But she married off and left you all in the lurch."
 
 "Yes, yes; it's rather too bad when these great singers marry
 themselves into silence before they have a crack in their voices. And
 the husband is a public robber. I remember Leroux saying, 'A man might
 as well take down a fine peal of church bells and carry them off to the
 steppes," said Sir Hugo, setting down his cup and turning away, while
 Deronda, who had moved from his place to make room for others, and felt
--**--**--
 
 Certain words were gnawing within her. "The wrong you have done me will
 be your own curse." As he closed the door, the bitter tears rose, and
 the gnawing words provoked an answer: "Why did you put your fangs into
 me and not into him?" It was uttered in a whisper, as the tears came up
 silently. But she immediately pressed her handkerchief against her
 eyes, and checked her tendency to sob.
 
 The next day, recovered from the shuddering fit of this evening scene,
 she determined to use the charter which Grandcourt had scornfully given
 her, and to talk as much as she liked with Deronda; but no
 opportunities occurred, and any little devices she could imagine for
 creating them were rejected by her pride, which was now doubly active.
 Not toward Deronda himself--she was singularly free from alarm lest he
 should think her openness wanting in dignity: it was part of his power
 over her that she believed him free from all misunderstanding as to the
 way in which she appealed to him; or rather, that he should
 misunderstand her had never entered into her mind. But the last morning
 came, and still she had never been able to take up the dropped thread
 of their talk, and she was without devices. She and Grandcourt were to
 leave at three o'clock. It was too irritating that after a walk in the
 grounds had been planned in Deronda's hearing, he did not present
 himself to join in it. Grandcourt was gone with Sir Hugo to King's
 Topping, to see the old manor-house; others of the gentlemen were
 shooting; she was condemned to go and see the decoy and the waterfowl,
 and everything else that she least wanted to see, with the ladies, with
 old Lord Pentreath and his anecdotes, with Mr. Vandernoodt and his
--**--**--
 
 Deronda said,--"I should feel something of what you feel--deep sorrow."
 
 "But what would you try to do?" said Gwendolen, with urgent quickness.
 
 "Order my life so as to make any possible amends, and keep away from
 doing any sort of injury again," said Deronda, catching her sense that
 the time for speech was brief.
 
 "But I can't--I can't; I must go on," said Gwendolen, in a passionate
 loud whisper. "I have thrust out others--I have made my gain out of
 their loss--tried to make it--tried. And I must go on. I can't alter
 it."
 
 It was impossible to answer this instantaneously. Her words had
 confirmed his conjecture, and the situation of all concerned rose in
 swift images before him. His feeling for those who had been thrust out
 sanctioned her remorse; he could not try to nullify it, yet his heart
 was full of pity for her. But as soon as he could he answered--taking
 up her last words--
 
 "That is the bitterest of all--to wear the yoke of our own wrong-doing.
 But if you submitted to that as men submit to maiming or life-long
 incurable disease?--and made the unalterable wrong a reason for more
 effort toward a good, that may do something to counterbalance the evil?
 One who has committed irremediable errors may be scourged by that
 consciousness into a higher course than is common. There are many
 examples. Feeling what it is to have spoiled one life may well make us
 long to save other lives from being spoiled."
 
 "But you have not wronged any one, or spoiled their lives," said
 Gwendolen, hastily. "It is only others who have wronged _you_."
 
 Deronda colored slightly, but said immediately--"I suppose our keen
 feeling for ourselves might end in giving us a keen feeling for others,
 if, when we are suffering acutely, we were to consider that others go
--**--**--
 me--perhaps you will, on reflection--that you should choose another
 model."
 
 "Why?" said Hans, standing up, and looking serious again.
 
 "Because she may get into such a position that her face is likely to be
 recognized. Mrs. Meyrick and I are anxious for her that she should be
 known as an admirable singer. It is right, and she wishes it, that she
 should make herself independent. And she has excellent chances. One
 good introduction is secured already, and I am going to speak to
 Klesmer. Her face may come to be very well known, and--well, it is
 useless to attempt to explain, unless you feel as I do. I believe that
 if Mirah saw the circumstances clearly, she would strongly object to
 being exhibited in this way--to allowing herself to be used as a model
 for a heroine of this sort."
 
 As Hans stood with his thumbs in the belt of his blouse, listening to
 this speech, his face showed a growing surprise melting into amusement,
 that at last would have its way in an explosive laugh: but seeing that
 Deronda looked gravely offended, he checked himself to say, "Excuse my
 laughing, Deronda. You never gave me an advantage over you before. If
 it had been about anything but my own pictures, I should have swallowed
 every word because you said it. And so you actually believe that I
 should get my five pictures hung on the line in a conspicuous position,
 and carefully studied by the public? Zounds, man! cider-cup and conceit
 never gave me half such a beautiful dream. My pictures are likely to
 remain as private as the utmost hypersensitiveness could desire."
 
 Hans turned to paint again as a way of filling up awkward pauses.
 Deronda stood perfectly still, recognizing his mistake as to publicity,
 but also conscious that his repugnance was not much diminished. He was
--**--**--
 of Deronda's anticipations.
 
 It was otherwise with the effect of their meeting on Mordecai. For many
 winters, while he had been conscious of an ebbing physical life, and as
 widening spiritual loneliness, all his passionate desire had
 concentrated itself in the yearning for some young ear into which he
 could pour his mind as a testament, some soul kindred enough to accept
 the spiritual product of his own brief, painful life, as a mission to
 be executed. It was remarkable that the hopefulness which is often the
 beneficent illusion of consumptive patients, was in Mordecai wholly
 diverted from the prospect of bodily recovery and carried into the
 current of this yearning for transmission. The yearning, which had
 panted upward from out of over-whelming discouragements, had grown into
 a hope--the hope into a confident belief, which, instead of being
 checked by the clear conception he had of his hastening decline, took
 rather the intensity of expectant faith in a prophecy which has only
 brief space to get fulfilled in.
 
 Some years had now gone since he had first begun to measure men with a
 keen glance, searching for a possibility which became more and more a
 distinct conception. Such distinctness as it had at first was reached
 chiefly by a method of contrast: he wanted to find a man who differed
 from himself. Tracing reasons in that self for the rebuffs he had met
 with and the hindrances that beset him, he imagined a man who would
 have all the elements necessary for sympathy with him, but in an
 embodiment unlike his own: he must be a Jew, intellectually cultured,
 morally fervid--in all this a nature ready to be plenished from
 Mordecai's; but his face and frame must be beautiful and strong, he
 must have been used to all the refinements of social life, his voice
--**--**--
   "Vor den Wissenden sich stellen
   Sicher ist's in alien Fllen!
   Wenn du lange dich gequlet
   Weiss er gleich wo dir es fehlet;
   Auch auf Beifall darfst du hoffen,
   Denn er weiss wo du's getroffen,"
            --GOETHE: _West-stlicker Divan_.
 
 
 Momentous things happened to Deronda the very evening of that visit to
 the small house at Chelsea, when there was the discussion about Mirah's
 public name. But for the family group there, what appeared to be the
 chief sequence connected with it occurred two days afterward. About
 four o'clock wheels paused before the door, and there came one of those
 knocks with an accompanying ring which serve to magnify the sense of
 social existence in a region where the most enlivening signals are
 usually those of the muffin-man. All the girls were at home, and the
 two rooms were thrown together to make space for Kate's drawing, as
 well as a great length of embroidery which had taken the place of the
 satin cushions--a sort of _pice de rsistance_ in the courses of
 needlework, taken up by any clever fingers that happened to be at
 liberty. It stretched across the front room picturesquely enough, Mrs.
 Meyrick bending over it on one corner, Mab in the middle, and Amy at
 the other end. Mirah, whose performances in point of sewing were on the
 make-shift level of the tailor-bird's, her education in that branch
 having been much neglected, was acting as reader to the party, seated
 on a camp-stool; in which position she also served Kate as model for a
 title-page vignette, symbolizing a fair public absorbed in the
 successive volumes of the family tea-table. She was giving forth with
 charming distinctness the delightful Essay of Elia, "The Praise of
 Chimney-Sweeps," and all were smiling over the "innocent blackness,"
 when the imposing knock and ring called their thoughts to loftier
--**--**--
 only daring to look at him furtively. If he did say anything severe it
 would be so hard for them all. They could only comfort themselves with
 thinking that Prince Camaralzaman, who had heard the finest things,
 preferred Mirah's singing to any other:--also she appeared to be doing
 her very best, as if she were more instead of less at ease than usual.
 
 The song she had chosen was a fine setting of some words selected from
 Leopardi's grand Ode to Italy:--
 
   "_O patria mia, vedo le mura c gli archi
   E le colonne e i simula-cri e l'erme
   Torridegli avi nostri_"--
 
 This was recitative: then followed--
 
   "_Ma la gloria--non vedo_"--
 
 a mournful melody, a rhythmic plaint. After this came a climax of
 devout triumph--passing from the subdued adoration of a happy Andante
 in the words--
 
   "_Beatissimi voi.
   Che offriste il petto alle nemiche lance
   Per amor di costei che al sol vi diede_"--
 
 to the joyous outburst of an exultant Allegro in--
 
         "_Oh viva, oh viva:
   Beatissimi voi
   Mentre nel monde si favelli o scriva._"
 
 When she had ended, Klesmer said after a moment--
 
 "That is Joseph Leo's music."
 
 "Yes, he was my last master--at Vienna: so fierce and so good," said
 Mirah, with a melancholy smile. "He prophesied that my voice would not
 do for the stage. And he was right."
 
 "_Con_tinue, if you please," said Klesmer, putting out his lips and
 shaking his long fingers, while he went on with a smothered
 articulation quite unintelligible to the audience.
 
 The three girls detested him unanimously for not saying one word of
 praise. Mrs. Meyrick was a little alarmed.
 
 Mirah, simply bent on doing what Klesmer desired, and imagining that he
 would now like to hear her sing some German, went through Prince
 Radzivill's music to Gretchen's songs in the "Faust," one after the
--**--**--
 of a forsaken temple, give already a far-off look as of one getting
 unwillingly out of reach; and imagine it on a Jewish face naturally
 accentuated for the expression of an eager mind--the face of a man
 little above thirty, but with that age upon it which belongs to time
 lengthened by suffering, the hair and beard, still black, throwing out
 the yellow pallor of the skin, the difficult breathing giving more
 decided marking to the mobile nostril, the wasted yellow hands
 conspicuous on the folded arms: then give to the yearning consumptive
 glance something of the slowly dying mother's look, when her one loved
 son visits her bedside, and the flickering power of gladness leaps out
 as she says, "My boy!"--for the sense of spiritual perpetuation in
 another resembles that maternal transference of self.
 
 Seeing such a portrait you would see Mordecai. And opposite to him was
 a face not more distinctively oriental than many a type seen among what
 we call the Latin races; rich in youthful health, and with a forcible
 masculine gravity in its repose, that gave the value of judgment to the
 reverence with which he met the gaze of this mysterious son of poverty
 who claimed him as a long-expected friend. The more exquisite quality
 of Deronda's nature--that keenly perceptive sympathetic emotiveness
 which ran along with his speculative tendency--was never more
 thoroughly tested. He felt nothing that could be called belief in the
 validity of Mordecai's impressions concerning him or in the probability
 of any greatly effective issue: what he felt was a profound sensibility
 to a cry from the depths of another and accompanying that, the summons
 to be receptive instead of superciliously prejudging. Receptiveness is
 a rare and massive power, like fortitude; and this state of mind now
 gave Deronda's face its utmost expression of calm benignant force--an
--**--**--
 to listen with understanding. I was rebuked for error; I was offered a
 small sum in charity. No wonder. I looked poor; I carried a bundle of
 Hebrew manuscript with me; I said, our chief teachers are misleading
 the hope of our race. Scholar and merchant were both too busy to
 listen. Scorn stood as interpreter between me and them. One said, 'The
 book of Mormon would never have answered in Hebrew; and if you mean to
 address our learned men, it is not likely you can teach them anything.'
 He touched a truth there."
 
 The last words had a perceptible irony in their hoarsened tone.
 
 "But though you had accustomed yourself to write in Hebrew, few,
 surely, can use English better," said Deronda, wanting to hint
 consolation in a new effort for which he could smooth the way.
 
 Mordecai shook his head slowly, and answered--
 
 "Too late--too late. I can write no more. My writing would be like this
 gasping breath. But the breath may wake the fount of pity--the writing
 not. If I could write now and used English, I should be as one who
 beats a board to summon those who have been used to no signal but a
 bell. My soul has an ear to hear the faults of its own speech. New
 writing of mine would be like this body"--Mordecai spread his
 arms--"within it there might be the Ruach-ha-kodesh--the breath of
 divine thought--but, men would smile at it and say, 'A poor Jew!' and
 the chief smilers would be of my own people."
 
 Mordecai let his hands fall, and his head sink in melancholy: for the
 moment he had lost hold of his hope. Despondency, conjured up by his
 own words, had floated in and hovered above him with eclipsing wings.
 He had sunk into momentary darkness,
--**--**--
 would become if it were made a part of yours."
 
 Mordecai had folded his arms again while Deronda was speaking, and now
 answered with equal firmness, though with difficult breathing--
 
 "You _shall_ know. What are we met for, but that you should know. Your
 doubts lie as light as dust on my belief. I know the philosophies of
 this time and of other times; if I chose I could answer a summons
 before their tribunals. I could silence the beliefs which are the
 mother-tongue of my soul and speak with the rote-learned language of a
 system, that gives you the spelling of all things, sure of its alphabet
 covering them all. I could silence them: may not a man silence his awe
 or his love, and take to finding reasons, which others demand? But if
 his love lies deeper than any reasons to be found? Man finds his
 pathways: at first they were foot tracks, as those of the beast in the
 wilderness: now they are swift and invisible: his thought dives through
 the ocean, and his wishes thread the air: has he found all the pathways
 yet? What reaches him, stays with him, rules him: he must accept it,
 not knowing its pathway. Say, my expectation of you has grown but as
 false hopes grow. That doubt is in your mind? Well, my expectation was
 there, and you are come. Men have died of thirst. But I was thirsty,
 and the water is on my lips? What are doubts to me? In the hour when
 you come to me and say, 'I reject your soul: I know that I am not a
 Jew: we have no lot in common'--I shall not doubt. I shall be
 certain--certain that I have been deluded. That hour will never come!"
 
 Deronda felt a new chord sounding in his speech: it was rather
--**--**--
 disappointments--that which presents itself as final."
 
 Deronda's ear caught all these negative whisperings; nay, he repeated
 them distinctly to himself. It was not the first but it was the most
 pressing occasion on which he had had to face this question of the
 family likeness among the heirs of enthusiasm, whether prophets or
 dreamers of dreams, whether the
 
   "Great benefactors of mankind, deliverers,"
 
 or the devotees of phantasmal discovery--from the first believer in his
 own unmanifested inspiration, down to the last inventor of an ideal
 machine that will achieve perpetual motion. The kinship of human
 passion, the sameness of mortal scenery, inevitably fill fact with
 burlesque and parody. Error and folly have had their hecatombs of
 martyrs. Reduce the grandest type of man hitherto known to an abstract
 statement of his qualities and efforts, and he appears in dangerous
 company: say that, like Copernicus and Galileo, he was immovably
 convinced in the face of hissing incredulity; but so is the contriver
 of perpetual motion. We cannot fairly try the spirits by this sort of
 test. If we want to avoid giving the dose of hemlock or the sentence of
 banishment in the wrong case, nothing will do but a capacity to
 understand the subject-matter on which the immovable man is convinced,
 and fellowship with human travail, both near and afar, to hinder us
 from scanning and deep experience lightly. Shall we say, "Let the ages
 try the spirits, and see what they are worth?" Why, we are the
 beginning of the ages, which can only be just by virtue of just
 judgments in separate human breasts--separate yet combined. Even
 steam-engines could not have got made without that condition, but must
 have stayed in the mind of James Watt.
 
 This track of thinking was familiar enough to Deronda to have saved him
--**--**--
 and were in the little parlor, hardly much more than fifteen feet
 square, where the gaslight shone through a slight haze of smoke on what
 to Deronda was a new and striking scene. Half-a-dozen men of various
 ages, from between twenty and thirty to fifty, all shabbily dressed,
 most of them with clay pipes in their mouths, were listening with a
 look of concentrated intelligence to a man in a pepper-and-salt dress,
 with blonde hair, short nose, broad forehead and general breadth, who,
 holding his pipe slightly uplifted in the left hand, and beating his
 knee with the right, was just finishing a quotation from Shelley (the
 comparison of the avalanche in his "Prometheus Unbound")
 
   "As thought by thought is piled, till some great truth
   Is loosened, and the nations echo round."
 
 The entrance of the new-comers broke the fixity of attention, and
 called for re-arrangement of seats in the too narrow semicircle round
 the fire-place and the table holding the glasses, spare pipes and
 tobacco. This was the soberest of clubs; but sobriety is no reason why
 smoking and "taking something" should be less imperiously needed as a
 means of getting a decent status in company and debate. Mordecai was
 received with welcoming voices which had a slight cadence of compassion
 in them, but naturally all glances passed immediately to his companion.
 
 "I have brought a friend who is interested in our subjects," said
 Mordecai. "He has traveled and studied much."
 
 "Is the gentlemen anonymous? Is he a Great 'Unknown?'" said the
 broad-chested quoter of Shelley, with a humorous air.
 
 "My name is Daniel Deronda. I am unknown, but not in any sense great."
 The smile breaking over the stranger's grave face as he said this was
 so agreeable that there was a general indistinct murmur, equivalent to
--**--**--
 "Not for the world, not for the world.  A cross is the last thing I
 would wear as a trinket." Dorothea shuddered slightly.
 
 "Then you will think it wicked in me to wear it," said Celia, uneasily.
 
 "No, dear, no," said Dorothea, stroking her sister's cheek.  "Souls
 have complexions too: what will suit one will not suit another."
 
 "But you might like to keep it for mamma's sake."
 
 "No, I have other things of mamma's--her sandal-wood box which I am so
 fond of--plenty of things.  In fact, they are all yours, dear.  We need
 discuss them no longer.  There--take away your property."
 
 Celia felt a little hurt.  There was a strong assumption of superiority
 in this Puritanic toleration, hardly less trying to the blond flesh of
 an unenthusiastic sister than a Puritanic persecution.
 
 "But how can I wear ornaments if you, who are the elder sister, will
 never wear them?"
 
 "Nay, Celia, that is too much to ask, that I should wear trinkets to
 keep you in countenance.  If I were to put on such a necklace as that,
 I should feel as if I had been pirouetting.  The world would go round
 with me, and I should not know how to walk."
 
 Celia had unclasped the necklace and drawn it off.  "It would be a
 little tight for your neck; something to lie down and hang would suit
 you better," she said, with some satisfaction.  The complete unfitness
 of the necklace from all points of view for Dorothea, made Celia
 happier in taking it.  She was opening some ring-boxes, which disclosed
 a fine emerald with diamonds, and just then the sun passing beyond a
 cloud sent a bright gleam over the table.
 
 "How very beautiful these gems are!" said Dorothea, under a new current
 of feeling, as sudden as the gleam.  "It is strange how deeply colors
--**--**--
 "But you are such a perfect horsewoman."
 
 "Excuse me; I have had very little practice, and I should be easily
 thrown."
 
 "Then that is a reason for more practice.  Every lady ought to be a
 perfect horsewoman, that she may accompany her husband."
 
 "You see how widely we differ, Sir James.  I have made up my mind that
 I ought not to be a perfect horsewoman, and so I should never
 correspond to your pattern of a lady." Dorothea looked straight before
 her, and spoke with cold brusquerie, very much with the air of a
 handsome boy, in amusing contrast with the solicitous amiability of her
 admirer.
 
 "I should like to know your reasons for this cruel resolution.  It is
 not possible that you should think horsemanship wrong."
 
 "It is quite possible that I should think it wrong for me."
 
 "Oh, why?" said Sir James, in a tender tone of remonstrance.
 
 Mr. Casaubon had come up to the table, teacup in hand, and was
 listening.
 
 "We must not inquire too curiously into motives," he interposed, in his
 measured way.  "Miss Brooke knows that they are apt to become feeble in
 the utterance: the aroma is mixed with the grosser air.  We must keep
 the germinating grain away from the light."
 
 Dorothea colored with pleasure, and looked up gratefully to the
 speaker.  Here was a man who could understand the higher inward life,
 and with whom there could be some spiritual communion; nay, who could
 illuminate principle with the widest knowledge a man whose learning
 almost amounted to a proof of whatever he believed!
 
 Dorothea's inferences may seem large; but really life could never have
 gone on at any period but for this liberal allowance of conclusions,
 which has facilitated marriage under the difficulties of civilization.
 Has any one ever pinched into its pilulous smallness the cobweb of
--**--**--
 
 He stayed a little longer than he had intended, on a slight pressure of
 invitation from Mr. Brooke, who offered no bait except his own
 documents on machine-breaking and rick-burning. Mr. Casaubon was called
 into the library to look at these in a heap, while his host picked up
 first one and then the other to read aloud from in a skipping and
 uncertain way, passing from one unfinished passage to another with a
 "Yes, now, but here!" and finally pushing them all aside to open the
 journal of his youthful Continental travels.
 
 "Look here--here is all about Greece.  Rhamnus, the ruins of
 Rhamnus--you are a great Grecian, now.  I don't know whether you have
 given much study to the topography.  I spent no end of time in making
 out these things--Helicon, now.  Here, now!--'We started the next
 morning for Parnassus, the double-peaked Parnassus.' All this volume is
 about Greece, you know," Mr. Brooke wound up, rubbing his thumb
 transversely along the edges of the leaves as he held the book forward.
 
 Mr. Casaubon made a dignified though somewhat sad audience; bowed in
 the right place, and avoided looking at anything documentary as far as
 possible, without showing disregard or impatience; mindful that this
 desultoriness was associated with the institutions of the country, and
 that the man who took him on this severe mental scamper was not only an
 amiable host, but a landholder and custos rotulorum. Was his endurance
 aided also by the reflection that Mr. Brooke was the uncle of Dorothea?
 
 Certainly he seemed more and more bent on making her talk to him, on
 drawing her out, as Celia remarked to herself; and in looking at her
 his face was often lit up by a smile like pale wintry sunshine.  Before
 he left the next morning, while taking a pleasant walk with Miss Brooke
--**--**--
 had never hinted this before, waiting, from a certain shyness on such
 subjects which was mutual between the sisters, until it should be
 introduced by some decisive event.  Celia blushed, but said at once--
 
 "Pray do not make that mistake any longer, Dodo.  When Tantripp was
 brushing my hair the other day, she said that Sir James's man knew from
 Mrs. Cadwallader's maid that Sir James was to marry the eldest Miss
 Brooke."
 
 "How can you let Tantripp talk such gossip to you, Celia?" said
 Dorothea, indignantly, not the less angry because details asleep in her
 memory were now awakened to confirm the unwelcome revelation.  "You
 must have asked her questions.  It is degrading."
 
 "I see no harm at all in Tantripp's talking to me.  It is better to
 hear what people say.  You see what mistakes you make by taking up
 notions.  I am quite sure that Sir James means to make you an offer;
 and he believes that you will accept him, especially since you have
 been so pleased with him about the plans.  And uncle too--I know he
 expects it.  Every one can see that Sir James is very much in love with
 you."
 
 The revulsion was so strong and painful in Dorothea's mind that the
 tears welled up and flowed abundantly.  All her dear plans were
 embittered, and she thought with disgust of Sir James's conceiving that
 she recognized him as her lover.  There was vexation too on account of
 Celia.
 
 "How could he expect it?" she burst forth in her most impetuous manner.
 "I have never agreed with him about anything but the cottages: I was
 barely polite to him before."
 
 "But you have been so pleased with him since then; he has begun to feel
 quite sure that you are fond of him."
--**--**--
 
 "Hanged, you know," said Mr. Brooke, with a quiet nod.  "Poor Romilly!
 he would have helped us.  I knew Romilly.  Casaubon didn't know
 Romilly.  He is a little buried in books, you know, Casaubon is."
 
 "When a man has great studies and is writing a great work, he must of
 course give up seeing much of the world.  How can he go about making
 acquaintances?"
 
 "That's true.  But a man mopes, you know.  I have always been a
 bachelor too, but I have that sort of disposition that I never moped;
 it was my way to go about everywhere and take in everything.  I never
 moped: but I can see that Casaubon does, you know.  He wants a
 companion--a companion, you know."
 
 "It would be a great honor to any one to be his companion," said
 Dorothea, energetically.
 
 "You like him, eh?" said Mr. Brooke, without showing any surprise, or
 other emotion.  "Well, now, I've known Casaubon ten years, ever since
 he came to Lowick.  But I never got anything out of him--any ideas, you
 know.  However, he is a tiptop man and may be a bishop--that kind of
 thing, you know, if Peel stays in.  And he has a very high opinion of
 you, my dear."
 
 Dorothea could not speak.
 
 "The fact is, he has a very high opinion indeed of you.  And he speaks
 uncommonly well--does Casaubon.  He has deferred to me, you not being
 of age.  In short, I have promised to speak to you, though I told him I
 thought there was not much chance.  I was bound to tell him that.  I
 said, my niece is very young, and that kind of thing.  But I didn't
 think it necessary to go into everything.  However, the long and the
 short of it is, that he has asked my permission to make you an offer of
--**--**--
 "There was no need to think long, uncle.  I know of nothing to make me
 vacillate.  If I changed my mind, it must be because of something
 important and entirely new to me."
 
 "Ah!--then you have accepted him?  Then Chettam has no chance?  Has
 Chettam offended you--offended you, you know?  What is it you don't
 like in Chettam?"
 
 "There is nothing that I like in him," said Dorothea, rather
 impetuously.
 
 Mr. Brooke threw his head and shoulders backward as if some one had
 thrown a light missile at him.  Dorothea immediately felt some
 self-rebuke, and said--
 
 "I mean in the light of a husband.  He is very kind, I think--really
 very good about the cottages.  A well-meaning man."
 
 "But you must have a scholar, and that sort of thing?  Well, it lies a
 little in our family.  I had it myself--that love of knowledge, and
 going into everything--a little too much--it took me too far; though
 that sort of thing doesn't often run in the female-line; or it runs
 underground like the rivers in Greece, you know--it comes out in the
 sons.  Clever sons, clever mothers.  I went a good deal into that, at
 one time.  However, my dear, I have always said that people should do
 as they like in these things, up to a certain point.  I couldn't, as
 your guardian, have consented to a bad match.  But Casaubon stands
 well: his position is good.  I am afraid Chettam will be hurt, though,
 and Mrs. Cadwallader will blame me."
 
 That evening, of course, Celia knew nothing of what had happened.  She
 attributed Dorothea's abstracted manner, and the evidence of further
 crying since they had got home, to the temper she had been in about Sir
 James Chettam and the buildings, and was careful not to give further
--**--**--
 should not see what we are to see."
 
 "What?  Brooke standing for Middlemarch?"
 
 "Worse than that.  I really feel a little responsible.  I always told
 you Miss Brooke would be such a fine match.  I knew there was a great
 deal of nonsense in her--a flighty sort of Methodistical stuff.  But
 these things wear out of girls.  However, I am taken by surprise for
 once."
 
 "What do you mean, Mrs. Cadwallader?" said Sir James.  His fear lest
 Miss Brooke should have run away to join the Moravian Brethren, or some
 preposterous sect unknown to good society, was a little allayed by the
 knowledge that Mrs. Cadwallader always made the worst of things.  "What
 has happened to Miss Brooke?  Pray speak out."
 
 "Very well.  She is engaged to be married." Mrs. Cadwallader paused a
 few moments, observing the deeply hurt expression in her friend's face,
 which he was trying to conceal by a nervous smile, while he whipped his
 boot; but she soon added, "Engaged to Casaubon."
 
 Sir James let his whip fall and stooped to pick it up.  Perhaps his
 face had never before gathered so much concentrated disgust as when he
 turned to Mrs. Cadwallader and repeated, "Casaubon?"
 
 "Even so.  You know my errand now."
 
 "Good God!  It is horrible!  He is no better than a mummy!" (The point
 of view has to be allowed for, as that of a blooming and disappointed
 rival.)
 
 "She says, he is a great soul.--A great bladder for dried peas to
 rattle in!" said Mrs. Cadwallader.
 
 "What business has an old bachelor like that to marry?" said Sir James.
 "He has one foot in the grave."
 
 "He means to draw it out again, I suppose."
 
 "Brooke ought not to allow it: he should insist on its being put off
 till she is of age.  She would think better of it then.  What is a
--**--**--
 more because she believed as unquestionably in birth and no-birth as
 she did in game and vermin.  She would never have disowned any one on
 the ground of poverty: a De Bracy reduced to take his dinner in a basin
 would have seemed to her an example of pathos worth exaggerating, and I
 fear his aristocratic vices would not have horrified her.  But her
 feeling towards the vulgar rich was a sort of religious hatred: they
 had probably made all their money out of high retail prices, and Mrs.
 Cadwallader detested high prices for everything that was not paid in
 kind at the Rectory: such people were no part of God's design in making
 the world; and their accent was an affliction to the ears.  A town
 where such monsters abounded was hardly more than a sort of low comedy,
 which could not be taken account of in a well-bred scheme of the
 universe.  Let any lady who is inclined to be hard on Mrs. Cadwallader
 inquire into the comprehensiveness of her own beautiful views, and be
 quite sure that they afford accommodation for all the lives which have
 the honor to coexist with hers.
 
 With such a mind, active as phosphorus, biting everything that came
 near into the form that suited it, how could Mrs. Cadwallader feel that
 the Miss Brookes and their matrimonial prospects were alien to her?
 especially as it had been the habit of years for her to scold Mr.
 Brooke with the friendliest frankness, and let him know in confidence
 that she thought him a poor creature.  From the first arrival of the
 young ladies in Tipton she had prearranged Dorothea's marriage with Sir
 James, and if it had taken place would have been quite sure that it was
 her doing: that it should not take place after she had preconceived it,
--**--**--
 strongest fellow.  They won't overturn the Constitution with our friend
 Brooke's head for a battering ram."
 
 "Oh, I don't mean that," said Sir James, who, after putting down his
 hat and throwing himself into a chair, had begun to nurse his leg and
 examine the sole of his boot with much bitterness.  "I mean this
 marriage.  I mean his letting that blooming young girl marry Casaubon."
 
 "What is the matter with Casaubon?  I see no harm in him--if the girl
 likes him."
 
 "She is too young to know what she likes.  Her guardian ought to
 interfere.  He ought not to allow the thing to be done in this headlong
 manner.  I wonder a man like you, Cadwallader--a man with daughters,
 can look at the affair with indifference: and with such a heart as
 yours!  Do think seriously about it."
 
 "I am not joking; I am as serious as possible," said the Rector, with a
 provoking little inward laugh.  "You are as bad as Elinor.  She has
 been wanting me to go and lecture Brooke; and I have reminded her that
 her friends had a very poor opinion of the match she made when she
 married me."
 
 "But look at Casaubon," said Sir James, indignantly.  "He must be
 fifty, and I don't believe he could ever have been much more than the
 shadow of a man.  Look at his legs!"
 
 "Confound you handsome young fellows! you think of having it all your
 own way in the world.  You don't under stand women.  They don't admire
 you half so much as you admire yourselves.  Elinor used to tell her
 sisters that she married me for my ugliness--it was so various and
 amusing that it had quite conquered her prudence."
 
 "You! it was easy enough for a woman to love you.  But this is no
--**--**--
 cottager in those double cottages at a low rent but kept a pig, and the
 strips of garden at the back were well tended.  The small boys wore
 excellent corduroy, the girls went out as tidy servants, or did a
 little straw-plaiting at home: no looms here, no Dissent; and though
 the public disposition was rather towards laying by money than towards
 spirituality, there was not much vice.  The speckled fowls were so
 numerous that Mr. Brooke observed, "Your farmers leave some barley for
 the women to glean, I see.  The poor folks here might have a fowl in
 their pot, as the good French king used to wish for all his people.
 The French eat a good many fowls--skinny fowls, you know."
 
 "I think it was a very cheap wish of his," said Dorothea, indignantly.
 "Are kings such monsters that a wish like that must be reckoned a royal
 virtue?"
 
 "And if he wished them a skinny fowl," said Celia, "that would not be
 nice.  But perhaps he wished them to have fat fowls."
 
 "Yes, but the word has dropped out of the text, or perhaps was
 subauditum; that is, present in the king's mind, but not uttered," said
 Mr. Casaubon, smiling and bending his head towards Celia, who
 immediately dropped backward a little, because she could not bear Mr.
 Casaubon to blink at her.
 
 Dorothea sank into silence on the way back to the house.  She felt some
 disappointment, of which she was yet ashamed, that there was nothing
 for her to do in Lowick; and in the next few minutes her mind had
 glanced over the possibility, which she would have preferred, of
 finding that her home would be in a parish which had a larger share of
 the world's misery, so that she might have had more active duties in
--**--**--
 very patient with each other, I think."
 
 "I suppose it is being engaged to be married that has made you think
 patience good," said Celia, as soon as she and Dorothea were alone
 together, taking off their wrappings.
 
 "You mean that I am very impatient, Celia."
 
 "Yes; when people don't do and say just what you like." Celia had
 become less afraid of "saying things" to Dorothea since this
 engagement: cleverness seemed to her more pitiable than ever.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
     "He had catched a great cold, had he had no other clothes
      to wear than the skin of a bear not yet killed."--FULLER.
 
 
 Young Ladislaw did not pay that visit to which Mr. Brooke had invited
 him, and only six days afterwards Mr. Casaubon mentioned that his young
 relative had started for the Continent, seeming by this cold vagueness
 to waive inquiry.  Indeed, Will had declined to fix on any more precise
 destination than the entire area of Europe.  Genius, he held, is
 necessarily intolerant of fetters: on the one hand it must have the
 utmost play for its spontaneity; on the other, it may confidently await
 those messages from the universe which summon it to its peculiar work,
 only placing itself in an attitude of receptivity towards all sublime
 chances.  The attitudes of receptivity are various, and Will had
 sincerely tried many of them.  He was not excessively fond of wine, but
 he had several times taken too much, simply as an experiment in that
 form of ecstasy; he had fasted till he was faint, and then supped on
 lobster; he had made himself ill with doses of opium.  Nothing greatly
 original had resulted from these measures; and the effects of the opium
 had convinced him that there was an entire dissimilarity between his
 constitution and De Quincey's. The superadded circumstance which would
--**--**--
 
 "Certainly; she is fonder of geraniums, and seems more docile, though
 not so fine a figure.  But we were talking of physic.  Tell me about
 this new young surgeon, Mr. Lydgate.  I am told he is wonderfully
 clever: he certainly looks it--a fine brow indeed."
 
 "He is a gentleman.  I heard him talking to Humphrey.  He talks well."
 
 "Yes. Mr. Brooke says he is one of the Lydgates of Northumberland,
 really well connected.  One does not expect it in a practitioner of
 that kind.  For my own part, I like a medical man more on a footing
 with the servants; they are often all the cleverer.  I assure you I
 found poor Hicks's judgment unfailing; I never knew him wrong.  He was
 coarse and butcher-like, but he knew my constitution.  It was a loss to
 me his going off so suddenly.  Dear me, what a very animated
 conversation Miss Brooke seems to be having with this Mr. Lydgate!"
 
 "She is talking cottages and hospitals with him," said Mrs.
 Cadwallader, whose ears and power of interpretation were quick.  "I
 believe he is a sort of philanthropist, so Brooke is sure to take him
 up."
 
 "James," said Lady Chettam when her son came near, "bring Mr. Lydgate
 and introduce him to me.  I want to test him."
 
 The affable dowager declared herself delighted with this opportunity of
 making Mr. Lydgate's acquaintance, having heard of his success in
 treating fever on a new plan.
 
 Mr. Lydgate had the medical accomplishment of looking perfectly grave
 whatever nonsense was talked to him, and his dark steady eyes gave him
 impressiveness as a listener.  He was as little as possible like the
 lamented Hicks, especially in a certain careless refinement about his
 toilet and utterance.  Yet Lady Chettam gathered much confidence in
 him.  He confirmed her view of her own constitution as being peculiar,
--**--**--
 "I don't make myself disagreeable; it is you who find me so.
 Disagreeable is a word that describes your feelings and not my actions."
 
 "I think it describes the smell of grilled bone."
 
 "Not at all.  It describes a sensation in your little nose associated
 with certain finicking notions which are the classics of Mrs. Lemon's
 school.  Look at my mother you don't see her objecting to everything
 except what she does herself.  She is my notion of a pleasant woman."
 
 "Bless you both, my dears, and don't quarrel," said Mrs. Vincy, with
 motherly cordiality.  "Come, Fred, tell us all about the new doctor.
 How is your uncle pleased with him?"
 
 "Pretty well, I think.  He asks Lydgate all sorts of questions and then
 screws up his face while he hears the answers, as if they were pinching
 his toes.  That's his way.  Ah, here comes my grilled bone."
 
 "But how came you to stay out so late, my dear?  You only said you were
 going to your uncle's."
 
 "Oh, I dined at Plymdale's. We had whist.  Lydgate was there too."
 
 "And what do you think of him?  He is very gentlemanly, I suppose.
 They say he is of excellent family--his relations quite county people."
 
 "Yes," said Fred.  "There was a Lydgate at John's who spent no end of
 money.  I find this man is a second cousin of his.  But rich men may
 have very poor devils for second cousins."
 
 "It always makes a difference, though, to be of good family," said
 Rosamond, with a tone of decision which showed that she had thought on
 this subject.  Rosamond felt that she might have been happier if she
 had not been the daughter of a Middlemarch manufacturer.  She disliked
 anything which reminded her that her mother's father had been an
--**--**--
 entire freedom from the necessity of behaving agreeably was included in
 the Almighty's intentions about families.  She rose slowly without any
 sign of resentment, and said in her usual muffled monotone, "Brother, I
 hope the new doctor will be able to do something for you.  Solomon says
 there's great talk of his cleverness.  I'm sure it's my wish you should
 be spared.  And there's none more ready to nurse you than your own
 sister and your own nieces, if you'd only say the word.  There's
 Rebecca, and Joanna, and Elizabeth, you know."
 
 "Ay, ay, I remember--you'll see I've remembered 'em all--all dark and
 ugly.  They'd need have some money, eh?  There never was any beauty in
 the women of our family; but the Featherstones have always had some
 money, and the Waules too.  Waule had money too.  A warm man was Waule.
 Ay, ay; money's a good egg; and if you 've got money to leave behind
 you, lay it in a warm nest.  Good-by, Mrs. Waule." Here Mr.
 Featherstone pulled at both sides of his wig as if he wanted to deafen
 himself, and his sister went away ruminating on this oracular speech of
 his.  Notwithstanding her jealousy of the Vincys and of Mary Garth,
 there remained as the nethermost sediment in her mental shallows a
 persuasion that her brother Peter Featherstone could never leave his
 chief property away from his blood-relations:--else, why had the
 Almighty carried off his two wives both childless, after he had gained
 so much by manganese and things, turning up when nobody expected
 it?--and why was there a Lowick parish church, and the Waules and
 Powderells all sitting in the same pew for generations, and the
 Featherstone pew next to them, if, the Sunday after her brother Peter's
 death, everybody was to know that the property was gone out of the
--**--**--
 at a distance, whose finished manners she could appropriate as
 thoroughly as she had done her school accomplishments, preparing
 herself thus for vaguer elevations which might ultimately come.  There
 was nothing financial, still less sordid, in her previsions: she cared
 about what were considered refinements, and not about the money that
 was to pay for them.
 
 Fred's mind, on the other hand, was busy with an anxiety which even his
 ready hopefulness could not immediately quell.  He saw no way of
 eluding Featherstone's stupid demand without incurring consequences
 which he liked less even than the task of fulfilling it.  His father
 was already out of humor with him, and would be still more so if he
 were the occasion of any additional coolness between his own family and
 the Bulstrodes.  Then, he himself hated having to go and speak to his
 uncle Bulstrode, and perhaps after drinking wine he had said many
 foolish things about Featherstone's property, and these had been
 magnified by report.  Fred felt that he made a wretched figure as a
 fellow who bragged about expectations from a queer old miser like
 Featherstone, and went to beg for certificates at his bidding.
 But--those expectations!  He really had them, and he saw no agreeable
 alternative if he gave them up; besides, he had lately made a debt
 which galled him extremely, and old Featherstone had almost bargained
 to pay it off.  The whole affair was miserably small: his debts were
 small, even his expectations were not anything so very magnificent.
 Fred had known men to whom he would have been ashamed of confessing the
 smallness of his scrapes.  Such ruminations naturally produced a streak
 of misanthropic bitterness.  To be born the son of a Middlemarch
 manufacturer, and inevitable heir to nothing in particular, while such
 men as Mainwaring and Vyan--certainly life was a poor business, when a
--**--**--
 folly in the world."
 
 "But Fred gives me his honor that he has never borrowed money on the
 pretence of any understanding about his uncle's land.  He is not a
 liar.  I don't want to make him better than he is.  I have blown him up
 well--nobody can say I wink at what he does.  But he is not a liar.
 And I should have thought--but I may be wrong--that there was no
 religion to hinder a man from believing the best of a young fellow,
 when you don't know worse.  It seems to me it would be a poor sort of
 religion to put a spoke in his wheel by refusing to say you don't
 believe such harm of him as you've got no good reason to believe."
 
 "I am not at all sure that I should be befriending your son by
 smoothing his way to the future possession of Featherstone's property.
 I cannot regard wealth as a blessing to those who use it simply as a
 harvest for this world.  You do not like to hear these things, Vincy,
 but on this occasion I feel called upon to tell you that I have no
 motive for furthering such a disposition of property as that which you
 refer to.  I do not shrink from saying that it will not tend to your
 son's eternal welfare or to the glory of God.  Why then should you
 expect me to pen this kind of affidavit, which has no object but to
 keep up a foolish partiality and secure a foolish bequest?"
 
 "If you mean to hinder everybody from having money but saints and
 evangelists, you must give up some profitable partnerships, that's all
 I can say," Mr. Vincy burst out very bluntly.  "It may be for the glory
 of God, but it is not for the glory of the Middlemarch trade, that
--**--**--
      To keep it in are dead men's shoes."
 
 
 Mr. Bulstrode's consultation of Harriet seemed to have had the effect
 desired by Mr. Vincy, for early the next morning a letter came which
 Fred could carry to Mr. Featherstone as the required testimony.
 
 The old gentleman was staying in bed on account of the cold weather,
 and as Mary Garth was not to be seen in the sitting-room, Fred went
 up-stairs immediately and presented the letter to his uncle, who,
 propped up comfortably on a bed-rest, was not less able than usual to
 enjoy his consciousness of wisdom in distrusting and frustrating
 mankind.  He put on his spectacles to read the letter, pursing up his
 lips and drawing down their corners.
 
 "Under the circumstances I will not decline to state my
 conviction--tchah! what fine words the fellow puts!  He's as fine as an
 auctioneer--that your son Frederic has not obtained any advance of
 money on bequests promised by Mr. Featherstone--promised? who said I
 had ever promised?  I promise nothing--I shall make codicils as long as
 I like--and that considering the nature of such a proceeding, it is
 unreasonable to presume that a young man of sense and character would
 attempt it--ah, but the gentleman doesn't say you are a young man of
 sense and character, mark you that, sir!--As to my own concern with any
 report of such a nature, I distinctly affirm that I never made any
 statement to the effect that your son had borrowed money on any
 property that might accrue to him on Mr. Featherstone's demise--bless
 my heart! 'property'--accrue--demise!  Lawyer Standish is nothing to
 him.  He couldn't speak finer if he wanted to borrow.  Well," Mr.
 Featherstone here looked over his spectacles at Fred, while he handed
 back the letter to him with a contemptuous gesture, "you don't suppose
--**--**--
 planked out of his sight by that wordy ignorance which he had supposed
 to be knowledge.  From that hour Lydgate felt the growth of an
 intellectual passion.
 
 We are not afraid of telling over and over again how a man comes to
 fall in love with a woman and be wedded to her, or else be fatally
 parted from her.  Is it due to excess of poetry or of stupidity that we
 are never weary of describing what King James called a woman's "makdom
 and her fairnesse," never weary of listening to the twanging of the old
 Troubadour strings, and are comparatively uninterested in that other
 kind of "makdom and fairnesse" which must be wooed with industrious
 thought and patient renunciation of small desires?  In the story of
 this passion, too, the development varies: sometimes it is the glorious
 marriage, sometimes frustration and final parting.  And not seldom the
 catastrophe is bound up with the other passion, sung by the
 Troubadours.  For in the multitude of middle-aged men who go about
 their vocations in a daily course determined for them much in the same
 way as the tie of their cravats, there is always a good number who once
 meant to shape their own deeds and alter the world a little.  The story
 of their coming to be shapen after the average and fit to be packed by
 the gross, is hardly ever told even in their consciousness; for perhaps
 their ardor in generous unpaid toil cooled as imperceptibly as the
 ardor of other youthful loves, till one day their earlier self walked
 like a ghost in its old home and made the new furniture ghastly.
 Nothing in the world more subtle than the process of their gradual
 change!  In the beginning they inhaled it unknowingly: you and I may
--**--**--
 subject for betting, if there were any gentlemen given to that
 amusement who could appreciate the complicated probabilities of an
 arduous purpose, with all the possible thwartings and furtherings of
 circumstance, all the niceties of inward balance, by which a man swims
 and makes his point or else is carried headlong.  The risk would remain
 even with close knowledge of Lydgate's character; for character too is
 a process and an unfolding.  The man was still in the making, as much
 as the Middlemarch doctor and immortal discoverer, and there were both
 virtues and faults capable of shrinking or expanding.  The faults will
 not, I hope, be a reason for the withdrawal of your interest in him.
 Among our valued friends is there not some one or other who is a little
 too self-confident and disdainful; whose distinguished mind is a little
 spotted with commonness; who is a little pinched here and protuberant
 there with native prejudices; or whose better energies are liable to
 lapse down the wrong channel under the influence of transient
 solicitations?  All these things might be alleged against Lydgate, but
 then, they are the periphrases of a polite preacher, who talks of Adam,
 and would not like to mention anything painful to the pew-renters.  The
 particular faults from which these delicate generalities are distilled
 have distinguishable physiognomies, diction, accent, and grimaces;
 filling up parts in very various dramas.  Our vanities differ as our
 noses do: all conceit is not the same conceit, but varies in
 correspondence with the minutiae of mental make in which one of us
 differs from another.  Lydgate's conceit was of the arrogant sort,
 never simpering, never impertinent, but massive in its claims and
 benevolently contemptuous.  He would do a great deal for noodles, being
 sorry for them, and feeling quite sure that they could have no power
--**--**--
 and now, when he had talked a little more to Rosamond, he meant to
 excuse himself and go.
 
 "You will not like us at Middlemarch, I feel sure," she said, when the
 whist-players were settled.  "We are very stupid, and you have been
 used to something quite different."
 
 "I suppose all country towns are pretty much alike," said Lydgate.
 "But I have noticed that one always believes one's own town to be more
 stupid than any other.  I have made up my mind to take Middlemarch as
 it comes, and shall be much obliged if the town will take me in the
 same way.  I have certainly found some charms in it which are much
 greater than I had expected."
 
 "You mean the rides towards Tipton and Lowick; every one is pleased
 with those," said Rosamond, with simplicity.
 
 "No, I mean something much nearer to me."
 
 Rosamond rose and reached her netting, and then said, "Do you care
 about dancing at all?  I am not quite sure whether clever men ever
 dance."
 
 "I would dance with you if you would allow me."
 
 "Oh!" said Rosamond, with a slight deprecatory laugh.  "I was only
 going to say that we sometimes have dancing, and I wanted to know
 whether you would feel insulted if you were asked to come."
 
 "Not on the condition I mentioned."
 
 After this chat Lydgate thought that he was going, but on moving
 towards the whist-tables, he got interested in watching Mr.
 Farebrother's play, which was masterly, and also his face, which was a
 striking mixture of the shrewd and the mild.  At ten o'clock supper was
 brought in (such were the customs of Middlemarch) and there was
 punch-drinking; but Mr. Farebrother had only a glass of water.  He was
 winning, but there seemed to be no reason why the renewal of rubbers
--**--**--
 Energy, capable of bathing even the ethereal atoms in its ideally
 illuminated space.  He for his part had tossed away all cheap
 inventions where ignorance finds itself able and at ease: he was
 enamoured of that arduous invention which is the very eye of research,
 provisionally framing its object and correcting it to more and more
 exactness of relation; he wanted to pierce the obscurity of those
 minute processes which prepare human misery and joy, those invisible
 thoroughfares which are the first lurking-places of anguish, mania, and
 crime, that delicate poise and transition which determine the growth of
 happy or unhappy consciousness.
 
 As he threw down his book, stretched his legs towards the embers in the
 grate, and clasped his hands at the back of his head, in that agreeable
 afterglow of excitement when thought lapses from examination of a
 specific object into a suffusive sense of its connections with all the
 rest of our existence--seems, as it were, to throw itself on its back
 after vigorous swimming and float with the repose of unexhausted
 strength--Lydgate felt a triumphant delight in his studies, and
 something like pity for those less lucky men who were not of his
 profession.
 
 "If I had not taken that turn when I was a lad," he thought, "I might
 have got into some stupid draught-horse work or other, and lived always
 in blinkers.  I should never have been happy in any profession that did
 not call forth the highest intellectual strain, and yet keep me in good
 warm contact with my neighbors.  There is nothing like the medical
 profession for that: one can have the exclusive scientific life that
 touches the distance and befriend the old fogies in the parish too.  It
 is rather harder for a clergyman: Farebrother seems to be an anomaly."
--**--**--
 
 Rosamond, in fact, was entirely occupied not exactly with Tertius
 Lydgate as he was in himself, but with his relation to her; and it was
 excusable in a girl who was accustomed to hear that all young men
 might, could, would be, or actually were in love with her, to believe
 at once that Lydgate could be no exception.  His looks and words meant
 more to her than other men's, because she cared more for them: she
 thought of them diligently, and diligently attended to that perfection
 of appearance, behavior, sentiments, and all other elegancies, which
 would find in Lydgate a more adequate admirer than she had yet been
 conscious of.
 
 For Rosamond, though she would never do anything that was disagreeable
 to her, was industrious; and now more than ever she was active in
 sketching her landscapes and market-carts and portraits of friends, in
 practising her music, and in being from morning till night her own
 standard of a perfect lady, having always an audience in her own
 consciousness, with sometimes the not unwelcome addition of a more
 variable external audience in the numerous visitors of the house.  She
 found time also to read the best novels, and even the second best, and
 she knew much poetry by heart.  Her favorite poem was "Lalla Rookh."
 
 "The best girl in the world!  He will be a happy fellow who gets her!"
 was the sentiment of the elderly gentlemen who visited the Vincys; and
 the rejected young men thought of trying again, as is the fashion in
 country towns where the horizon is not thick with coming rivals.  But
 Mrs. Plymdale thought that Rosamond had been educated to a ridiculous
 pitch, for what was the use of accomplishments which would be all laid
 aside as soon as she was married?  While her aunt Bulstrode, who had a
--**--**--
 they could not bear him, and suspected him of cant.  Really, from his
 point of view, Bulstrode was thoroughly justified.
 
 But whichever way Lydgate began to incline, there was something to make
 him wince; and being a proud man, he was a little exasperated at being
 obliged to wince.  He did not like frustrating his own best purposes by
 getting on bad terms with Bulstrode; he did not like voting against
 Farebrother, and helping to deprive him of function and salary; and the
 question occurred whether the additional forty pounds might not leave
 the Vicar free from that ignoble care about winning at cards.
 Moreover, Lydgate did not like the consciousness that in voting for
 Tyke he should be voting on the side obviously convenient for himself.
 But would the end really be his own convenience?  Other people would
 say so, and would allege that he was currying favor with Bulstrode for
 the sake of making himself important and getting on in the world.  What
 then?  He for his own part knew that if his personal prospects simply
 had been concerned, he would not have cared a rotten nut for the
 banker's friendship or enmity.  What he really cared for was a medium
 for his work, a vehicle for his ideas; and after all, was he not bound
 to prefer the object of getting a good hospital, where he could
 demonstrate the specific distinctions of fever and test therapeutic
 results, before anything else connected with this chaplaincy?  For the
 first time Lydgate was feeling the hampering threadlike pressure of
 small social conditions, and their frustrating complexity.  At the end
 of his inward debate, when he set out for the hospital, his hope was
 really in the chance that discussion might somehow give a new aspect to
 the question, and make the scale dip so as to exclude the necessity for
--**--**--
 grades,--especially against a man who had not been to either of the
 English universities and enjoyed the absence of anatomical and bedside
 study there, but came with a libellous pretension to experience in
 Edinburgh and Paris, where observation might be abundant indeed, but
 hardly sound.
 
 Thus it happened that on this occasion Bulstrode became identified with
 Lydgate, and Lydgate with Tyke; and owing to this variety of
 interchangeable names for the chaplaincy question, diverse minds were
 enabled to form the same judgment concerning it.
 
 Dr. Sprague said at once bluntly to the group assembled when he
 entered, "I go for Farebrother.  A salary, with all my heart.  But why
 take it from the Vicar?  He has none too much--has to insure his life,
 besides keeping house, and doing a vicar's charities.  Put forty pounds
 in his pocket and you'll do no harm.  He's a good fellow, is
 Farebrother, with as little of the parson about him as will serve to
 carry orders."
 
 "Ho, ho!  Doctor," said old Mr. Powderell, a retired iron-monger of
 some standing--his interjection being something between a laugh and a
 Parliamentary disapproval; "we must let you have your say.  But what we
 have to consider is not anybody's income--it's the souls of the poor
 sick people"--here Mr. Powderell's voice and face had a sincere pathos
 in them.  "He is a real Gospel preacher, is Mr. Tyke.  I should vote
 against my conscience if I voted against Mr. Tyke--I should indeed."
 
 "Mr. Tyke's opponents have not asked any one to vote against his
 conscience, I believe," said Mr. Hackbutt, a rich tanner of fluent
 speech, whose glittering spectacles and erect hair were turned with
 some severity towards innocent Mr. Powderell.  "But in my judgment it
 behoves us, as Directors, to consider whether we will regard it as our
--**--**--
 But any answer was dispensed with by the entrance of three gentlemen,
 with whom there were greetings more or less cordial.  These were the
 Reverend Edward Thesiger, Rector of St. Peter's, Mr. Bulstrode, and our
 friend Mr. Brooke of Tipton, who had lately allowed himself to be put
 on the board of directors in his turn, but had never before attended,
 his attendance now being due to Mr. Bulstrode's exertions.  Lydgate was
 the only person still expected.
 
 Every one now sat down, Mr. Bulstrode presiding, pale and
 self-restrained as usual.  Mr. Thesiger, a moderate evangelical, wished
 for the appointment of his friend Mr. Tyke, a zealous able man, who,
 officiating at a chapel of ease, had not a cure of souls too extensive
 to leave him ample time for the new duty.  It was desirable that
 chaplaincies of this kind should be entered on with a fervent
 intention: they were peculiar opportunities for spiritual influence;
 and while it was good that a salary should be allotted, there was the
 more need for scrupulous watching lest the office should be perverted
 into a mere question of salary.  Mr. Thesiger's manner had so much
 quiet propriety that objectors could only simmer in silence.
 
 Mr. Brooke believed that everybody meant well in the matter.  He had
 not himself attended to the affairs of the Infirmary, though he had a
 strong interest in whatever was for the benefit of Middlemarch, and was
 most happy to meet the gentlemen present on any public question--"any
 public question, you know," Mr. Brooke repeated, with his nod of
 perfect understanding.  "I am a good deal occupied as a magistrate, and
 in the collection of documentary evidence, but I regard my time as
 being at the disposal of the public--and, in short, my friends have
 convinced me that a chaplain with a salary--a salary, you know--is a
--**--**--
 Middlemarch had been too strong for him.  How could a man be satisfied
 with a decision between such alternatives and under such circumstances?
 No more than he can be satisfied with his hat, which he has chosen from
 among such shapes as the resources of the age offer him, wearing it at
 best with a resignation which is chiefly supported by comparison.
 
 But Mr. Farebrother met him with the same friendliness as before.  The
 character of the publican and sinner is not always practically
 incompatible with that of the modern Pharisee, for the majority of us
 scarcely see more distinctly the faultiness of our own conduct than the
 faultiness of our own arguments, or the dulness of our own jokes.  But
 the Vicar of St. Botolph's had certainly escaped the slightest tincture
 of the Pharisee, and by dint of admitting to himself that he was too
 much as other men were, he had become remarkably unlike them in
 this--that he could excuse others for thinking slightly of him, and
 could judge impartially of their conduct even when it told against him.
 
 "The world has been to strong for _me_, I know," he said one day to
 Lydgate.  "But then I am not a mighty man--I shall never be a man of
 renown.  The choice of Hercules is a pretty fable; but Prodicus makes
 it easy work for the hero, as if the first resolves were enough.
 Another story says that he came to hold the distaff, and at last wore
 the Nessus shirt.  I suppose one good resolve might keep a man right if
 everybody else's resolve helped him."
 
 The Vicar's talk was not always inspiriting: he had escaped being a
 Pharisee, but he had not escaped that low estimate of possibilities
 which we rather hastily arrive at as an inference from our own failure.
--**--**--
 The fact is unalterable, that a fellow-mortal with whose nature you are
 acquainted solely through the brief entrances and exits of a few
 imaginative weeks called courtship, may, when seen in the continuity of
 married companionship, be disclosed as something better or worse than
 what you have preconceived, but will certainly not appear altogether
 the same.  And it would be astonishing to find how soon the change is
 felt if we had no kindred changes to compare with it.  To share
 lodgings with a brilliant dinner-companion, or to see your favorite
 politician in the Ministry, may bring about changes quite as rapid: in
 these cases too we begin by knowing little and believing much, and we
 sometimes end by inverting the quantities.
 
 Still, such comparisons might mislead, for no man was more incapable of
 flashy make-believe than Mr. Casaubon: he was as genuine a character as
 any ruminant animal, and he had not actively assisted in creating any
 illusions about himself.  How was it that in the weeks since her
 marriage, Dorothea had not distinctly observed but felt with a stifling
 depression, that the large vistas and wide fresh air which she had
 dreamed of finding in her husband's mind were replaced by anterooms and
 winding passages which seemed to lead nowhither?  I suppose it was that
 in courtship everything is regarded as provisional and preliminary, and
 the smallest sample of virtue or accomplishment is taken to guarantee
 delightful stores which the broad leisure of marriage will reveal.  But
 the door-sill of marriage once crossed, expectation is concentrated on
 the present.  Having once embarked on your marital voyage, it is
 impossible not to be aware that you make no way and that the sea is not
 within sight--that, in fact, you are exploring an enclosed basin.
 
 In their conversation before marriage, Mr. Casaubon had often dwelt on
--**--**--
 with her husband's chief interests?
 
 "My judgment _was_ a very superficial one--such as I am capable of
 forming," she answered, with a prompt resentment, that needed no
 rehearsal.  "You showed me the rows of notebooks--you have often spoken
 of them--you have often said that they wanted digesting.  But I never
 heard you speak of the writing that is to be published.  Those were
 very simple facts, and my judgment went no farther.  I only begged you
 to let me be of some good to you."
 
 Dorothea rose to leave the table and Mr. Casaubon made no reply, taking
 up a letter which lay beside him as if to reperuse it.  Both were
 shocked at their mutual situation--that each should have betrayed anger
 towards the other.  If they had been at home, settled at Lowick in
 ordinary life among their neighbors, the clash would have been less
 embarrassing: but on a wedding journey, the express object of which is
 to isolate two people on the ground that they are all the world to each
 other, the sense of disagreement is, to say the least, confounding and
 stultifying.  To have changed your longitude extensively and placed
 yourselves in a moral solitude in order to have small explosions, to
 find conversation difficult and to hand a glass of water without
 looking, can hardly be regarded as satisfactory fulfilment even to the
 toughest minds.  To Dorothea's inexperienced sensitiveness, it seemed
 like a catastrophe, changing all prospects; and to Mr. Casaubon it was
 a new pain, he never having been on a wedding journey before, or found
 himself in that close union which was more of a subjection than he had
 been able to imagine, since this charming young bride not only obliged
 him to much consideration on her behalf (which he had sedulously
--**--**--
 to the studio of his friend Adolf Naumann, whom he mentioned as one of
 the chief renovators of Christian art, one of those who had not only
 revived but expanded that grand conception of supreme events as
 mysteries at which the successive ages were spectators, and in relation
 to which the great souls of all periods became as it were
 contemporaries.  Will added that he had made himself Naumann's pupil
 for the nonce.
 
 "I have been making some oil-sketches under him," said Will.  "I hate
 copying.  I must put something of my own in.  Naumann has been painting
 the Saints drawing the Car of the Church, and I have been making a
 sketch of Marlowe's Tamburlaine Driving the Conquered Kings in his
 Chariot.  I am not so ecclesiastical as Naumann, and I sometimes twit
 him with his excess of meaning.  But this time I mean to outdo him in
 breadth of intention.  I take Tamburlaine in his chariot for the
 tremendous course of the world's physical history lashing on the
 harnessed dynasties.  In my opinion, that is a good mythical
 interpretation."  Will here looked at Mr. Casaubon, who received this
 offhand treatment of symbolism very uneasily, and bowed with a neutral
 air.
 
 "The sketch must be very grand, if it conveys so much," said Dorothea.
 "I should need some explanation even of the meaning you give.  Do you
 intend Tamburlaine to represent earthquakes and volcanoes?"
 
 "Oh yes," said Will, laughing, "and migrations of races and clearings
 of forests--and America and the steam-engine. Everything you can
 imagine!"
 
 "What a difficult kind of shorthand!" said Dorothea, smiling towards
 her husband.  "It would require all your knowledge to be able to read
 it."
 
 Mr. Casaubon blinked furtively at Will.  He had a suspicion that he was
 being laughed at.  But it was not possible to include Dorothea in the
--**--**--
 Naumann's pronunciation of the vowel seemed to stretch the word
 satirically.  Will did not half like it, but managed to laugh: and Mr.
 Casaubon, while he felt some disgust at the artist's German accent,
 began to entertain a little respect for his judicious severity.
 
 The respect was not diminished when Naumann, after drawing Will aside
 for a moment and looking, first at a large canvas, then at Mr.
 Casaubon, came forward again and said--
 
 "My friend Ladislaw thinks you will pardon me, sir, if I say that a
 sketch of your head would be invaluable to me for the St. Thomas
 Aquinas in my picture there.  It is too much to ask; but I so seldom
 see just what I want--the idealistic in the real."
 
 "You astonish me greatly, sir," said Mr. Casaubon, his looks improved
 with a glow of delight; "but if my poor physiognomy, which I have been
 accustomed to regard as of the commonest order, can be of any use to
 you in furnishing some traits for the angelical doctor, I shall feel
 honored.  That is to say, if the operation will not be a lengthy one;
 and if Mrs. Casaubon will not object to the delay."
 
 As for Dorothea, nothing could have pleased her more, unless it had
 been a miraculous voice pronouncing Mr. Casaubon the wisest and
 worthiest among the sons of men.  In that case her tottering faith
 would have become firm again.
 
 Naumann's apparatus was at hand in wonderful completeness, and the
 sketch went on at once as well as the conversation.  Dorothea sat down
 and subsided into calm silence, feeling happier than she had done for a
 long while before.  Every one about her seemed good, and she said to
 herself that Rome, if she had only been less ignorant, would have been
--**--**--
 end prevent the time from seeming long to that gentleman, as was clear
 from his expressing a fear that Mrs. Casaubon would be tired.  Naumann
 took the hint and said--
 
 "Now, sir, if you can oblige me again; I will release the lady-wife."
 
 So Mr. Casaubon's patience held out further, and when after all it
 turned out that the head of Saint Thomas Aquinas would be more perfect
 if another sitting could be had, it was granted for the morrow.  On the
 morrow Santa Clara too was retouched more than once.  The result of all
 was so far from displeasing to Mr. Casaubon, that he arranged for the
 purchase of the picture in which Saint Thomas Aquinas sat among the
 doctors of the Church in a disputation too abstract to be represented,
 but listened to with more or less attention by an audience above.  The
 Santa Clara, which was spoken of in the second place, Naumann declared
 himself to be dissatisfied with--he could not, in conscience, engage
 to make a worthy picture of it; so about the Santa Clara the
 arrangement was conditional.
 
 I will not dwell on Naumann's jokes at the expense of Mr. Casaubon that
 evening, or on his dithyrambs about Dorothea's charm, in all which Will
 joined, but with a difference.  No sooner did Naumann mention any
 detail of Dorothea's beauty, than Will got exasperated at his
 presumption: there was grossness in his choice of the most ordinary
 words, and what business had he to talk of her lips?  She was not a
 woman to be spoken of as other women were.  Will could not say just
 what he thought, but he became irritable.  And yet, when after some
 resistance he had consented to take the Casaubons to his friend's
 studio, he had been allured by the gratification of his pride in being
--**--**--
 ardor of his affection for Mary inclining him the more towards those
 who belonged to her.
 
 Mr. Garth had a small office in the town, and to this Fred went with
 his request.  He obtained it without much difficulty, for a large
 amount of painful experience had not sufficed to make Caleb Garth
 cautious about his own affairs, or distrustful of his fellow-men when
 they had not proved themselves untrustworthy; and he had the highest
 opinion of Fred, was "sure the lad would turn out well--an open
 affectionate fellow, with a good bottom to his character--you might
 trust him for anything." Such was Caleb's psychological argument.  He
 was one of those rare men who are rigid to themselves and indulgent to
 others.  He had a certain shame about his neighbors' errors, and never
 spoke of them willingly; hence he was not likely to divert his mind
 from the best mode of hardening timber and other ingenious devices in
 order to preconceive those errors.  If he had to blame any one, it was
 necessary for him to move all the papers within his reach, or describe
 various diagrams with his stick, or make calculations with the odd
 money in his pocket, before he could begin; and he would rather do
 other men's work than find fault with their doing.  I fear he was a bad
 disciplinarian.
 
 When Fred stated the circumstances of his debt, his wish to meet it
 without troubling his father, and the certainty that the money would be
 forthcoming so as to cause no one any inconvenience, Caleb pushed his
 spectacles upward, listened, looked into his favorite's clear young
 eyes, and believed him, not distinguishing confidence about the future
 from veracity about the past; but he felt that it was an occasion for a
 friendly hint as to conduct, and that before giving his signature he
--**--**--
 useful hack, which would draw upon occasion; being about to marry and
 to give up hunting.  The hunter was in a friend's stable at some little
 distance; there was still time for gentlemen to see it before dark.
 The friend's stable had to be reached through a back street where you
 might as easily have been poisoned without expense of drugs as in any
 grim street of that unsanitary period.  Fred was not fortified against
 disgust by brandy, as his companions were, but the hope of having at
 last seen the horse that would enable him to make money was
 exhilarating enough to lead him over the same ground again the first
 thing in the morning.  He felt sure that if he did not come to a
 bargain with the farmer, Bambridge would; for the stress of
 circumstances, Fred felt, was sharpening his acuteness and endowing him
 with all the constructive power of suspicion.  Bambridge had run down
 Diamond in a way that he never would have done (the horse being a
 friend's) if he had not thought of buying it; every one who looked at
 the animal--even Horrock--was evidently impressed with its merit.  To
 get all the advantage of being with men of this sort, you must know how
 to draw your inferences, and not be a spoon who takes things literally.
 The color of the horse was a dappled gray, and Fred happened to know
 that Lord Medlicote's man was on the look-out for just such a horse.
 After all his running down, Bambridge let it out in the course of the
 evening, when the farmer was absent, that he had seen worse horses go
 for eighty pounds.  Of course he contradicted himself twenty times
 over, but when you know what is likely to be true you can test a man's
--**--**--
 precious men within his own district whom everybody would choose to
 work for them, because he did his work well, charged very little, and
 often declined to charge at all.  It is no wonder, then, that the
 Garths were poor, and "lived in a small way."  However, they did not
 mind it.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV.
 
     "Love seeketh not itself to please,
        Nor for itself hath any care
      But for another gives its ease
        And builds a heaven in hell's despair.
           .    .    .    .    .    .    .
      Love seeketh only self to please,
        To bind another to its delight,
      Joys in another's loss of ease,
        And builds a hell in heaven's despite."
                        --W. BLAKE: Songs of Experience
 
 
 Fred Vincy wanted to arrive at Stone Court when Mary could not expect
 him, and when his uncle was not down-stairs in that case she might be
 sitting alone in the wainscoted parlor.  He left his horse in the yard
 to avoid making a noise on the gravel in front, and entered the parlor
 without other notice than the noise of the door-handle. Mary was in her
 usual corner, laughing over Mrs. Piozzi's recollections of Johnson, and
 looked up with the fun still in her face.  It gradually faded as she
 saw Fred approach her without speaking, and stand before her with his
 elbow on the mantel-piece, looking ill.  She too was silent, only
 raising her eyes to him inquiringly.
 
 "Mary," he began, "I am a good-for-nothing blackguard."
 
 "I should think one of those epithets would do at a time," said Mary,
 trying to smile, but feeling alarmed.
 
 "I know you will never think well of me any more.  You will think me a
 liar.  You will think me dishonest.  You will think I didn't care for
 you, or your father and mother.  You always do make the worst of me, I
--**--**--
 
 "Well, but how--we only want eighteen--here, put the rest back,
 child,--but how did you know about it?" said Caleb, who, in his
 unconquerable indifference to money, was beginning to be chiefly
 concerned about the relation the affair might have to Mary's affections.
 
 "Fred told me this morning."
 
 "Ah!  Did he come on purpose?"
 
 "Yes, I think so.  He was a good deal distressed."
 
 "I'm afraid Fred is not to be trusted, Mary," said the father, with
 hesitating tenderness.  "He means better than he acts, perhaps.  But I
 should think it a pity for any body's happiness to be wrapped up in
 him, and so would your mother."
 
 "And so should I, father," said Mary, not looking up, but putting the
 back of her father's hand against her cheek.
 
 "I don't want to pry, my dear.  But I was afraid there might be
 something between you and Fred, and I wanted to caution you.  You see,
 Mary"--here Caleb's voice became more tender; he had been pushing his
 hat about on the table and looking at it, but finally he turned his
 eyes on his daughter--"a woman, let her be as good as she may, has got
 to put up with the life her husband makes for her.  Your mother has had
 to put up with a good deal because of me."
 
 Mary turned the back of her father's hand to her lips and smiled at him.
 
 "Well, well, nobody's perfect, but"--here Mr. Garth shook his head to
 help out the inadequacy of words--"what I am thinking of is--what it
 must be for a wife when she's never sure of her husband, when he hasn't
 got a principle in him to make him more afraid of doing the wrong thing
 by others than of getting his own toes pinched.  That's the long and
--**--**--
 off on the other side of some iron palisading, and turned round at the
 sudden sound of the sash, before she called to him.  In two minutes he
 was in the room, and Rosamond went out, after waiting just long enough
 to show a pretty anxiety conflicting with her sense of what was
 becoming.
 
 Lydgate had to hear a narrative in which Mrs. Vincy's mind insisted
 with remarkable instinct on every point of minor importance, especially
 on what Mr. Wrench had said and had not said about coming again.  That
 there might be an awkward affair with Wrench, Lydgate saw at once; but
 the ease was serious enough to make him dismiss that consideration: he
 was convinced that Fred was in the pink-skinned stage of typhoid fever,
 and that he had taken just the wrong medicines.  He must go to bed
 immediately, must have a regular nurse, and various appliances and
 precautions must be used, about which Lydgate was particular.  Poor
 Mrs. Vincy's terror at these indications of danger found vent in such
 words as came most easily.  She thought it "very ill usage on the part
 of Mr. Wrench, who had attended their house so many years in preference
 to Mr. Peacock, though Mr. Peacock was equally a friend.  Why Mr.
 Wrench should neglect her children more than others, she could not for
 the life of her understand.  He had not neglected Mrs. Larcher's when
 they had the measles, nor indeed would Mrs. Vincy have wished that he
 should.  And if anything should happen--"
 
 Here poor Mrs. Vincy's spirit quite broke down, and her Niobe throat
 and good-humored face were sadly convulsed.  This was in the hall out
 of Fred's hearing, but Rosamond had opened the drawing-room door, and
 now came forward anxiously.  Lydgate apologized for Mr. Wrench, said
--**--**--
 afterwards wrote to decline further attendance in the case.  The house
 might be a good one, but Mr. Wrench was not going to truckle to anybody
 on a professional matter.  He reflected, with much probability on his
 side, that Lydgate would by-and-by be caught tripping too, and that his
 ungentlemanly attempts to discredit the sale of drugs by his
 professional brethren, would by-and-by recoil on himself.  He threw out
 biting remarks on Lydgate's tricks, worthy only of a quack, to get
 himself a factitious reputation with credulous people.  That cant about
 cures was never got up by sound practitioners.
 
 This was a point on which Lydgate smarted as much as Wrench could
 desire.  To be puffed by ignorance was not only humiliating, but
 perilous, and not more enviable than the reputation of the
 weather-prophet.  He was impatient of the foolish expectations amidst
 which all work must be carried on, and likely enough to damage himself
 as much as Mr. Wrench could wish, by an unprofessional openness.
 
 However, Lydgate was installed as medical attendant on the Vincys, and
 the event was a subject of general conversation in Middlemarch.  Some
 said, that the Vincys had behaved scandalously, that Mr. Vincy had
 threatened Wrench, and that Mrs. Vincy had accused him of poisoning her
 son.  Others were of opinion that Mr. Lydgate's passing by was
 providential, that he was wonderfully clever in fevers, and that
 Bulstrode was in the right to bring him forward.  Many people believed
 that Lydgate's coming to the town at all was really due to Bulstrode;
 and Mrs. Taft, who was always counting stitches and gathered her
 information in misleading fragments caught between the rows of her
 knitting, had got it into her head that Mr. Lydgate was a natural son
 of Bulstrode's, a fact which seemed to justify her suspicions of
--**--**--
 would by-and-by be vacant.  She was quite determined, when she was
 married, to rid herself adroitly of all the visitors who were not
 agreeable to her at her father's; and she imagined the drawing-room in
 her favorite house with various styles of furniture.
 
 Certainly her thoughts were much occupied with Lydgate himself; he
 seemed to her almost perfect: if he had known his notes so that his
 enchantment under her music had been less like an emotional elephant's,
 and if he had been able to discriminate better the refinements of her
 taste in dress, she could hardly have mentioned a deficiency in him.
 How different he was from young Plymdale or Mr. Caius Larcher!  Those
 young men had not a notion of French, and could speak on no subject
 with striking knowledge, except perhaps the dyeing and carrying trades,
 which of course they were ashamed to mention; they were Middlemarch
 gentry, elated with their silver-headed whips and satin stocks, but
 embarrassed in their manners, and timidly jocose: even Fred was above
 them, having at least the accent and manner of a university man.
 Whereas Lydgate was always listened to, bore himself with the careless
 politeness of conscious superiority, and seemed to have the right
 clothes on by a certain natural affinity, without ever having to think
 about them.  Rosamond was proud when he entered the room, and when he
 approached her with a distinguishing smile, she had a delicious sense
 that she was the object of enviable homage.  If Lydgate had been aware
 of all the pride he excited in that delicate bosom, he might have been
 just as well pleased as any other man, even the most densely ignorant
 of humoral pathology or fibrous tissue: he held it one of the prettiest
 attitudes of the feminine mind to adore a man's pre-eminence without
--**--**--
 enable him to dispense with a hired secretary, an aid which Mr.
 Casaubon had never yet employed and had a suspicious dread of.  (Mr.
 Casaubon was nervously conscious that he was expected to manifest a
 powerful mind.)  Providence, in its kindness, had supplied him with the
 wife he needed.  A wife, a modest young lady, with the purely
 appreciative, unambitious abilities of her sex, is sure to think her
 husband's mind powerful.  Whether Providence had taken equal care of
 Miss Brooke in presenting her with Mr. Casaubon was an idea which could
 hardly occur to him.  Society never made the preposterous demand that a
 man should think as much about his own qualifications for making a
 charming girl happy as he thinks of hers for making himself happy.  As
 if a man could choose not only his wife but his wife's husband!  Or as
 if he were bound to provide charms for his posterity in his own
 person!--  When Dorothea accepted him with effusion, that was only
 natural; and Mr. Casaubon believed that his happiness was going to
 begin.
 
 He had not had much foretaste of happiness in his previous life.  To
 know intense joy without a strong bodily frame, one must have an
 enthusiastic soul.  Mr. Casaubon had never had a strong bodily frame,
 and his soul was sensitive without being enthusiastic: it was too
 languid to thrill out of self-consciousness into passionate delight; it
 went on fluttering in the swampy ground where it was hatched, thinking
 of its wings and never flying.  His experience was of that pitiable
 kind which shrinks from pity, and fears most of all that it should be
 known: it was that proud narrow sensitiveness which has not mass enough
 to spare for transformation into sympathy, and quivers thread-like in
 small currents of self-preoccupation or at best of an egoistic
--**--**--
 did, and have a turning-room, make toys, table-legs, and that kind of
 thing.
 
 "In short, you recommend me to anticipate the arrival of my second
 childhood," said poor Mr. Casaubon, with some bitterness.  "These
 things," he added, looking at Lydgate, "would be to me such relaxation
 as tow-picking is to prisoners in a house of correction."
 
 "I confess," said Lydgate, smiling, "amusement is rather an
 unsatisfactory prescription.  It is something like telling people to
 keep up their spirits.  Perhaps I had better say, that you must submit
 to be mildly bored rather than to go on working."
 
 "Yes, yes," said Mr. Brooke.  "Get Dorothea to play backgammon with you
 in the evenings.  And shuttlecock, now--I don't know a finer game than
 shuttlecock for the daytime.  I remember it all the fashion.  To be
 sure, your eyes might not stand that, Casaubon.  But you must unbend,
 you know.  Why, you might take to some light study: conchology, now: it
 always think that must be a light study.  Or get Dorothea to read you
 light things, Smollett--'Roderick Random,' 'Humphrey Clinker:'  they
 are a little broad, but she may read anything now she's married, you
 know.  I remember they made me laugh uncommonly--there's a droll bit
 about a postilion's breeches.  We have no such humor now.  I have gone
 through all these things, but they might be rather new to you."
 
 "As new as eating thistles," would have been an answer to represent Mr.
 Casaubon's feelings.  But he only bowed resignedly, with due respect to
 his wife's uncle, and observed that doubtless the works he mentioned
 had "served as a resource to a certain order of minds."
 
 "You see," said the able magistrate to Lydgate, when they were outside
 the door, "Casaubon has been a little narrow: it leaves him rather at a
--**--**--
 various entanglements, weights, blows, clashings, motions, by which
 things severally go on." Whatever Miss Vincy did must be remarked, and
 she was perhaps the more conspicuous to admirers and critics because
 just now Mrs. Vincy, after some struggle, had gone with Fred to stay a
 little while at Stone Court, there being no other way of at once
 gratifying old Featherstone and keeping watch against Mary Garth, who
 appeared a less tolerable daughter-in-law in proportion as Fred's
 illness disappeared.
 
 Aunt Bulstrode, for example, came a little oftener into Lowick Gate to
 see Rosamond, now she was alone.  For Mrs. Bulstrode had a true
 sisterly feeling for her brother; always thinking that he might have
 married better, but wishing well to the children.  Now Mrs. Bulstrode
 had a long-standing intimacy with Mrs. Plymdale.  They had nearly the
 same preferences in silks, patterns for underclothing, china-ware, and
 clergymen; they confided their little troubles of health and household
 management to each other, and various little points of superiority on
 Mrs. Bulstrode's side, namely, more decided seriousness, more
 admiration for mind, and a house outside the town, sometimes served to
 give color to their conversation without dividing them--well-meaning
 women both, knowing very little of their own motives.
 
 Mrs. Bulstrode, paying a morning visit to Mrs. Plymdale, happened to
 say that she could not stay longer, because she was going to see poor
 Rosamond.
 
 "Why do you say 'poor Rosamond'?" said Mrs. Plymdale, a round-eyed
 sharp little woman, like a tamed falcon.
 
 "She is so pretty, and has been brought up in such thoughtlessness.
 The mother, you know, had always that levity about her, which makes me
 anxious for the children."
 
 "Well, Harriet, if I am to speak my mind," said Mrs. Plymdale, with
 emphasis, "I must say, anybody would suppose you and Mr. Bulstrode
--**--**--
 
 
 The triumphant confidence of the Mayor founded on Mr. Featherstone's
 insistent demand that Fred and his mother should not leave him, was a
 feeble emotion compared with all that was agitating the breasts of the
 old man's blood-relations, who naturally manifested more their sense of
 the family tie and were more visibly numerous now that he had become
 bedridden.  Naturally: for when "poor Peter" had occupied his arm-chair
 in the wainscoted parlor, no assiduous beetles for whom the cook
 prepares boiling water could have been less welcome on a hearth which
 they had reasons for preferring, than those persons whose Featherstone
 blood was ill-nourished, not from penuriousness on their part, but from
 poverty.  Brother Solomon and Sister Jane were rich, and the family
 candor and total abstinence from false politeness with which they were
 always received seemed to them no argument that their brother in the
 solemn act of making his will would overlook the superior claims of
 wealth.  Themselves at least he had never been unnatural enough to
 banish from his house, and it seemed hardly eccentric that he should
 have kept away Brother Jonah, Sister Martha, and the rest, who had no
 shadow of such claims.  They knew Peter's maxim, that money was a good
 egg, and should be laid in a warm nest.
 
 But Brother Jonah, Sister Martha, and all the needy exiles, held a
 different point of view.  Probabilities are as various as the faces to
 be seen at will in fretwork or paper-hangings: every form is there,
 from Jupiter to Judy, if you only look with creative inclination.  To
 the poorer and least favored it seemed likely that since Peter had done
 nothing for them in his life, he would remember them at the last.
 Jonah argued that men liked to make a surprise of their wills, while
--**--**--
 not to boast of, though it was much better than swindling either on
 exchange or turf, but which did not require his presence at Brassing so
 long as he had a good corner to sit in and a supply of food.  He chose
 the kitchen-corner, partly because he liked it best, and partly because
 he did not want to sit with Solomon, concerning whom he had a strong
 brotherly opinion.  Seated in a famous arm-chair and in his best suit,
 constantly within sight of good cheer, he had a comfortable
 consciousness of being on the premises, mingled with fleeting
 suggestions of Sunday and the bar at the Green Man; and he informed
 Mary Garth that he should not go out of reach of his brother Peter
 while that poor fellow was above ground.  The troublesome ones in a
 family are usually either the wits or the idiots.  Jonah was the wit
 among the Featherstones, and joked with the maid-servants when they
 came about the hearth, but seemed to consider Miss Garth a suspicious
 character, and followed her with cold eyes.
 
 Mary would have borne this one pair of eyes with comparative ease, but
 unfortunately there was young Cranch, who, having come all the way from
 the Chalky Flats to represent his mother and watch his uncle Jonah,
 also felt it his duty to stay and to sit chiefly in the kitchen to give
 his uncle company.  Young Cranch was not exactly the balancing point
 between the wit and the idiot,--verging slightly towards the latter
 type, and squinting so as to leave everything in doubt about his
 sentiments except that they were not of a forcible character.  When
 Mary Garth entered the kitchen and Mr. Jonah Featherstone began to
 follow her with his cold detective eyes, young Cranch turning his head
--**--**--
 "I tell you, I'm in my right mind.  Shan't I do as I like at the last?
 I made two wills on purpose.  Take the key, I say."
 
 "No, sir, I will not," said Mary, more resolutely still.  Her repulsion
 was getting stronger.
 
 "I tell you, there's no time to lose."
 
 "I cannot help that, sir.  I will not let the close of your life soil
 the beginning of mine.  I will not touch your iron chest or your will."
 She moved to a little distance from the bedside.
 
 The old man paused with a blank stare for a little while, holding the
 one key erect on the ring; then with an agitated jerk he began to work
 with his bony left hand at emptying the tin box before him.
 
 "Missy," he began to say, hurriedly, "look here! take the money--the
 notes and gold--look here--take it--you shall have it all--do as I
 tell you."
 
 He made an effort to stretch out the key towards her as far as
 possible, and Mary again retreated.
 
 "I will not touch your key or your money, sir.  Pray don't ask me to do
 it again.  If you do, I must go and call your brother."
 
 He let his hand fall, and for the first time in her life Mary saw old
 Peter Featherstone begin to cry childishly.  She said, in as gentle a
 tone as she could command, "Pray put up your money, sir;" and then went
 away to her seat by the fire, hoping this would help to convince him
 that it was useless to say more.  Presently he rallied and said
 eagerly--
 
 "Look here, then.  Call the young chap.  Call Fred Vincy."
 
 Mary's heart began to beat more quickly.  Various ideas rushed through
 her mind as to what the burning of a second will might imply.  She had
--**--**--
 unfitting now to explain that she had not wished her uncle to invite
 Will Ladislaw.  She could not in the least make clear to herself the
 reasons for her husband's dislike to his presence--a dislike painfully
 impressed on her by the scene in the library; but she felt the
 unbecomingness of saying anything that might convey a notion of it to
 others.  Mr. Casaubon, indeed, had not thoroughly represented those
 mixed reasons to himself; irritated feeling with him, as with all of
 us, seeking rather for justification than for self-knowledge. But he
 wished to repress outward signs, and only Dorothea could discern the
 changes in her husband's face before he observed with more of dignified
 bending and sing-song than usual--
 
 "You are exceedingly hospitable, my dear sir; and I owe you
 acknowledgments for exercising your hospitality towards a relative of
 mine."
 
 The funeral was ended now, and the churchyard was being cleared.
 
 "Now you can see him, Mrs. Cadwallader," said Celia.  "He is just like
 a miniature of Mr. Casaubon's aunt that hangs in Dorothea's
 boudoir--quite nice-looking."
 
 "A very pretty sprig," said Mrs. Cadwallader, dryly.  "What is your
 nephew to be, Mr. Casaubon?"
 
 "Pardon me, he is not my nephew.  He is my cousin."
 
 "Well, you know," interposed Mr. Brooke, "he is trying his wings.  He
 is just the sort of young fellow to rise.  I should be glad to give him
 an opportunity.  He would make a good secretary, now, like Hobbes,
 Milton, Swift--that sort of man."
 
 "I understand," said Mrs. Cadwallader.  "One who can write speeches."
 
 "I'll fetch him in now, eh, Casaubon?" said Mr. Brooke.  "He wouldn't
 come in till I had announced him, you know.  And we'll go down and look
 at the picture.  There you are to the life: a deep subtle sort of
--**--**--
 can think no other."
 
 "It'll do him no good where he's gone, that's my belief," said Solomon,
 with a bitterness which was remarkably genuine, though his tone could
 not help being sly.  "Peter was a bad liver, and almshouses won't cover
 it, when he's had the impudence to show it at the last."
 
 "And all the while had got his own lawful family--brothers and sisters
 and nephews and nieces--and has sat in church with 'em whenever he
 thought well to come," said Mrs. Waule.  "And might have left his
 property so respectable, to them that's never been used to extravagance
 or unsteadiness in no manner of way--and not so poor but what they
 could have saved every penny and made more of it.  And me--the trouble
 I've been at, times and times, to come here and be sisterly--and him
 with things on his mind all the while that might make anybody's flesh
 creep.  But if the Almighty's allowed it, he means to punish him for
 it.  Brother Solomon, I shall be going, if you'll drive me."
 
 "I've no desire to put my foot on the premises again," said Solomon.
 "I've got land of my own and property of my own to will away."
 
 "It's a poor tale how luck goes in the world," said Jonah.  "It never
 answers to have a bit of spirit in you.  You'd better be a dog in the
 manger.  But those above ground might learn a lesson.  One fool's will
 is enough in a family."
 
 "There's more ways than one of being a fool," said Solomon.  "I shan't
 leave my money to be poured down the sink, and I shan't leave it to
 foundlings from Africay.  I like Featherstones that were brewed such,
 and not turned Featherstones with sticking the name on 'em."
 
 Solomon addressed these remarks in a loud aside to Mrs. Waule as he
--**--**--
 "This is the first time I ever heard of wedding-clothes being bought
 after marriage."
 
 "But you don't mean to say you would insist on my waiting months for
 the sake of clothes?" said Lydgate, half thinking that Rosamond was
 tormenting him prettily, and half fearing that she really shrank from
 speedy marriage.  "Remember, we are looking forward to a better sort of
 happiness even than this--being continually together, independent of
 others, and ordering our lives as we will.  Come, dear, tell me how
 soon you can be altogether mine."
 
 There was a serious pleading in Lydgate's tone, as if he felt that she
 would be injuring him by any fantastic delays.  Rosamond became serious
 too, and slightly meditative; in fact, she was going through many
 intricacies of lace-edging and hosiery and petticoat-tucking, in order
 to give an answer that would at least be approximative.
 
 "Six weeks would be ample--say so, Rosamond," insisted Lydgate,
 releasing her hands to put his arm gently round her.
 
 One little hand immediately went to pat her hair, while she gave her
 neck a meditative turn, and then said seriously--
 
 "There would be the house-linen and the furniture to be prepared.
 Still, mamma could see to those while we were away."
 
 "Yes, to be sure.  We must be away a week or so."
 
 "Oh, more than that!" said Rosamond, earnestly.  She was thinking of
 her evening dresses for the visit to Sir Godwin Lydgate's, which she
 had long been secretly hoping for as a delightful employment of at
 least one quarter of the honeymoon, even if she deferred her
 introduction to the uncle who was a doctor of divinity (also a pleasing
 though sober kind of rank, when sustained by blood). She looked at her
 lover with some wondering remonstrance as she spoke, and he readily
--**--**--
 happy wife herself, had hardly any feeling but pride in her daughter's
 marriage.  But Rosamond had good reasons for suggesting to Lydgate that
 papa should be appealed to in writing.  She prepared for the arrival of
 the letter by walking with her papa to the warehouse the next morning,
 and telling him on the way that Mr. Lydgate wished to be married soon.
 
 "Nonsense, my dear!" said Mr. Vincy.  "What has he got to marry on?
 You'd much better give up the engagement.  I've told you so pretty
 plainly before this.  What have you had such an education for, if you
 are to go and marry a poor man?  It's a cruel thing for a father to
 see."
 
 "Mr. Lydgate is not poor, papa.  He bought Mr. Peacock's practice,
 which, they say, is worth eight or nine hundred a-year."
 
 "Stuff and nonsense!  What's buying a practice?  He might as well buy
 next year's swallows.  It'll all slip through his fingers."
 
 "On the contrary, papa, he will increase the practice.  See how he has
 been called in by the Chettams and Casaubons."
 
 "I hope he knows I shan't give anything--with this disappointment about
 Fred, and Parliament going to be dissolved, and machine-breaking
 everywhere, and an election coming on--"
 
 "Dear papa! what can that have to do with my marriage?"
 
 "A pretty deal to do with it!  We may all be ruined for what I know--the
 country's in that state!  Some say it's the end of the world, and
 be hanged if I don't think it looks like it!  Anyhow, it's not a time
 for me to be drawing money out of my business, and I should wish
 Lydgate to know that."
 
 "I am sure he expects nothing, papa.  And he has such very high
 connections: he is sure to rise in one way or another.  He is engaged
--**--**--
 wedding journey was being discussed.  "We might perhaps take a
 direction that would allow us to see them as we returned.  Which of
 your uncles do you like best?"
 
 "Oh,--my uncle Godwin, I think.  He is a good-natured old fellow."
 
 "You were constantly at his house at Quallingham, when you were a boy,
 were you not?  I should so like to see the old spot and everything you
 were used to.  Does he know you are going to be married?"
 
 "No," said Lydgate, carelessly, turning in his chair and rubbing his
 hair up.
 
 "Do send him word of it, you naughty undutiful nephew.  He will perhaps
 ask you to take me to Quallingham; and then you could show me about the
 grounds, and I could imagine you there when you were a boy.  Remember,
 you see me in my home, just as it has been since I was a child.  It is
 not fair that I should be so ignorant of yours.  But perhaps you would
 be a little ashamed of me.  I forgot that."
 
 Lydgate smiled at her tenderly, and really accepted the suggestion that
 the proud pleasure of showing so charming a bride was worth some
 trouble.  And now he came to think of it, he would like to see the old
 spots with Rosamond.
 
 "I will write to him, then.  But my cousins are bores."
 
 It seemed magnificent to Rosamond to be able to speak so slightingly of
 a baronet's family, and she felt much contentment in the prospect of
 being able to estimate them contemptuously on her own account.
 
 But mamma was near spoiling all, a day or two later, by saying--
 
 "I hope your uncle Sir Godwin will not look down on Rosy, Mr. Lydgate.
 I should think he would do something handsome.  A thousand or two can
--**--**--
 
 "You must concede that there are abuses, Hawley," said Mr. Hackbutt,
 foreseeing some political disagreement with his family lawyer.  "I
 myself should never favor immoderate views--in fact I take my stand
 with Huskisson--but I cannot blind myself to the consideration that the
 non-representation of large towns--"
 
 "Large towns be damned!" said Mr. Hawley, impatient of exposition.  "I
 know a little too much about Middlemarch elections.  Let 'em quash
 every pocket borough to-morrow, and bring in every mushroom town in the
 kingdom--they'll only increase the expense of getting into Parliament.
 I go upon facts."
 
 Mr. Hawley's disgust at the notion of the "Pioneer" being edited by an
 emissary, and of Brooke becoming actively political--as if a tortoise
 of desultory pursuits should protrude its small head ambitiously and
 become rampant--was hardly equal to the annoyance felt by some members
 of Mr. Brooke's own family.  The result had oozed forth gradually, like
 the discovery that your neighbor has set up an unpleasant kind of
 manufacture which will be permanently under your nostrils without legal
 remedy.  The "Pioneer" had been secretly bought even before Will
 Ladislaw's arrival, the expected opportunity having offered itself in
 the readiness of the proprietor to part with a valuable property which
 did not pay; and in the interval since Mr. Brooke had written his
 invitation, those germinal ideas of making his mind tell upon the world
 at large which had been present in him from his younger years, but had
 hitherto lain in some obstruction, had been sprouting under cover.
 
 The development was much furthered by a delight in his guest which
 proved greater even than he had anticipated.  For it seemed that Will
 was not only at home in all those artistic and literary subjects which
 Mr. Brooke had gone into at one time, but that he was strikingly ready
--**--**--
 seeing his old acquaintance the butler in the hall, he said, "Don't
 mention that I am here, Pratt; I will wait till luncheon; I know Mr.
 Casaubon does not like to be disturbed when he is in the library."
 
 "Master is out, sir; there's only Mrs. Casaubon in the library.  I'd
 better tell her you're here, sir," said Pratt, a red-cheeked man given
 to lively converse with Tantripp, and often agreeing with her that it
 must be dull for Madam.
 
 "Oh, very well; this confounded rain has hindered me from sketching,"
 said Will, feeling so happy that he affected indifference with
 delightful ease.
 
 In another minute he was in the library, and Dorothea was meeting him
 with her sweet unconstrained smile.
 
 "Mr. Casaubon has gone to the Archdeacon's," she said, at once.  "I
 don't know whether he will be at home again long before dinner.  He was
 uncertain how long he should be.  Did you want to say anything
 particular to him?"
 
 "No; I came to sketch, but the rain drove me in.  Else I would not have
 disturbed you yet.  I supposed that Mr. Casaubon was here, and I know
 he dislikes interruption at this hour."
 
 "I am indebted to the rain, then.  I am so glad to see you." Dorothea
 uttered these common words with the simple sincerity of an unhappy
 child, visited at school.
 
 "I really came for the chance of seeing you alone," said Will,
 mysteriously forced to be just as simple as she was.  He could not stay
 to ask himself, why not?  "I wanted to talk about things, as we did in
 Rome.  It always makes a difference when other people are present."
 
 "Yes," said Dorothea, in her clear full tone of assent.  "Sit down."
 She seated herself on a dark ottoman with the brown books behind her,
--**--**--
 becoming dimmed and forever ray-shorn in her eyes.
 
 "I wish you could have stayed," said Dorothea, with a touch of
 mournfulness, as she rose and put out her hand.  She also had her
 thought which she did not like to express:--Will certainly ought to
 lose no time in consulting Mr. Casaubon's wishes, but for her to urge
 this might seem an undue dictation.
 
 So they only said "Good-by," and Will quitted the house, striking
 across the fields so as not to run any risk of encountering Mr.
 Casaubon's carriage, which, however, did not appear at the gate until
 four o'clock. That was an unpropitious hour for coming home: it was too
 early to gain the moral support under ennui of dressing his person for
 dinner, and too late to undress his mind of the day's frivolous
 ceremony and affairs, so as to be prepared for a good plunge into the
 serious business of study.  On such occasions he usually threw into an
 easy-chair in the library, and allowed Dorothea to read the London
 papers to him, closing his eyes the while.  To-day, however, he
 declined that relief, observing that he had already had too many public
 details urged upon him; but he spoke more cheerfully than usual, when
 Dorothea asked about his fatigue, and added with that air of formal
 effort which never forsook him even when he spoke without his waistcoat
 and cravat--
 
 "I have had the gratification of meeting my former acquaintance, Dr.
 Spanning, to-day, and of being praised by one who is himself a worthy
 recipient of praise.  He spoke very handsomely of my late tractate on
 the Egyptian Mysteries,--using, in fact, terms which it would not
 become me to repeat."  In uttering the last clause, Mr. Casaubon leaned
 over the elbow of his chair, and swayed his head up and down,
--**--**--
 "Mrs. Casaubon informs me that a proposal has been made to you, and
 (according to an inference by no means stretched) has on your part been
 in some degree entertained, which involves your residence in this
 neighborhood in a capacity which I am justified in saying touches my
 own position in such a way as renders it not only natural and
 warrantable in me when that effect is viewed under the influence of
 legitimate feeling, but incumbent on me when the same effect is
 considered in the light of my responsibilities, to state at once that
 your acceptance of the proposal above indicated would be highly
 offensive to me.  That I have some claim to the exercise of a veto
 here, would not, I believe, be denied by any reasonable person
 cognizant of the relations between us: relations which, though thrown
 into the past by your recent procedure, are not thereby annulled in
 their character of determining antecedents.  I will not here make
 reflections on any person's judgment.  It is enough for me to point out
 to yourself that there are certain social fitnesses and proprieties
 which should hinder a somewhat near relative of mine from becoming any
 wise conspicuous in this vicinity in a status not only much beneath my
 own, but associated at best with the sciolism of literary or political
 adventurers.  At any rate, the contrary issue must exclude you from
 further reception at my house.
 
                 Yours faithfully,
                         "EDWARD CASAUBON."
 
 
 Meanwhile Dorothea's mind was innocently at work towards the further
 embitterment of her husband; dwelling, with a sympathy that grew to
 agitation, on what Will had told her about his parents and
 grandparents.  Any private hours in her day were usually spent in her
 blue-green boudoir, and she had come to be very fond of its pallid
--**--**--
 entirely.  Celia complains a good deal.  We can hardly get her to dine
 with us, since he had that fit." Sir James ended with a look of pitying
 disgust, and Mrs. Cadwallader shrugged her shoulders as much as to say
 that _she_ was not likely to see anything new in that direction.
 
 "Poor Casaubon!" the Rector said.  "That was a nasty attack.  I thought
 he looked shattered the other day at the Archdeacon's."
 
 "In point of fact," resumed Sir James, not choosing to dwell on "fits,"
 "Brooke doesn't mean badly by his tenants or any one else, but he has
 got that way of paring and clipping at expenses."
 
 "Come, that's a blessing," said Mrs. Cadwallader.  "That helps him to
 find himself in a morning.  He may not know his own opinions, but he
 does know his own pocket."
 
 "I don't believe a man is in pocket by stinginess on his land," said
 Sir James.
 
 "Oh, stinginess may be abused like other virtues: it will not do to
 keep one's own pigs lean," said Mrs. Cadwallader, who had risen to look
 out of the window.  "But talk of an independent politician and he will
 appear."
 
 "What!  Brooke?" said her husband.
 
 "Yes.  Now, you ply him with the 'Trumpet,' Humphrey; and I will put
 the leeches on him.  What will you do, Sir James?"
 
 "The fact is, I don't like to begin about it with Brooke, in our mutual
 position; the whole thing is so unpleasant.  I do wish people would
 behave like gentlemen," said the good baronet, feeling that this was a
 simple and comprehensive programme for social well-being.
 
 "Here you all are, eh?" said Mr. Brooke, shuffling round and shaking
 hands.  "I was going up to the Hall by-and-by, Chettam.  But it's
 pleasant to find everybody, you know.  Well, what do you think of
--**--**--
 political situation," said the Rector, broadening himself by sticking
 his thumbs in his armholes, and laughing towards Mr. Brooke.
 
 "That's a showy sort of thing to do, you know," said Mr. Brooke.  "But
 I should like you to tell me of another landlord who has distressed his
 tenants for arrears as little as I have.  I let the old tenants stay
 on.  I'm uncommonly easy, let me tell you, uncommonly easy.  I have my
 own ideas, and I take my stand on them, you know.  A man who does that
 is always charged with eccentricity, inconsistency, and that kind of
 thing.  When I change my line of action, I shall follow my own ideas."
 
 After that, Mr. Brooke remembered that there was a packet which he had
 omitted to send off from the Grange, and he bade everybody hurriedly
 good-by.
 
 "I didn't want to take a liberty with Brooke," said Sir James; "I see
 he is nettled.  But as to what he says about old tenants, in point of
 fact no new tenant would take the farms on the present terms."
 
 "I have a notion that he will be brought round in time," said the
 Rector.  "But you were pulling one way, Elinor, and we were pulling
 another.  You wanted to frighten him away from expense, and we want to
 frighten him into it.  Better let him try to be popular and see that
 his character as a landlord stands in his way.  I don't think it
 signifies two straws about the 'Pioneer,' or Ladislaw, or Brooke's
 speechifying to the Middlemarchers.  But it does signify about the
 parishioners in Tipton being comfortable."
 
 "Excuse me, it is you two who are on the wrong tack," said Mrs.
 Cadwallader.  "You should have proved to him that he loses money by bad
--**--**--
 fond of pets that must be held in the hands or trodden on, she was
 always attentive to the feelings of dogs, and very polite if she had to
 decline their advances.
 
 Will followed her only with his eyes and said, "I presume you know that
 Mr. Casaubon has forbidden me to go to his house."
 
 "No, I did not," said Dorothea, after a moment's pause.  She was
 evidently much moved.  "I am very, very sorry," she added, mournfully.
 She was thinking of what Will had no knowledge of--the conversation
 between her and her husband in the darkness; and she was anew smitten
 with hopelessness that she could influence Mr. Casaubon's action.  But
 the marked expression of her sorrow convinced Will that it was not all
 given to him personally, and that Dorothea had not been visited by the
 idea that Mr. Casaubon's dislike and jealousy of him turned upon
 herself.  He felt an odd mixture of delight and vexation: of delight
 that he could dwell and be cherished in her thought as in a pure home,
 without suspicion and without stint--of vexation because he was of too
 little account with her, was not formidable enough, was treated with an
 unhesitating benevolence which did not flatter him.  But his dread of
 any change in Dorothea was stronger than his discontent, and he began
 to speak again in a tone of mere explanation.
 
 "Mr. Casaubon's reason is, his displeasure at my taking a position here
 which he considers unsuited to my rank as his cousin.  I have told him
 that I cannot give way on this point.  It is a little too hard on me to
 expect that my course in life is to be hampered by prejudices which I
 think ridiculous.  Obligation may be stretched till it is no better
--**--**--
 
 "Niver do you mind what he's done," said Dagley, more fiercely, "it's
 my business to speak, an' not yourn.  An' I wull speak, too.  I'll hev
 my say--supper or no.  An' what I say is, as I've lived upo' your
 ground from my father and grandfather afore me, an' hev dropped our
 money into't, an' me an' my children might lie an' rot on the ground
 for top-dressin' as we can't find the money to buy, if the King wasn't
 to put a stop."
 
 "My good fellow, you're drunk, you know," said Mr. Brooke,
 confidentially but not judiciously.  "Another day, another day," he
 added, turning as if to go.
 
 But Dagley immediately fronted him, and Fag at his heels growled low,
 as his master's voice grew louder and more insulting, while Monk also
 drew close in silent dignified watch.  The laborers on the wagon were
 pausing to listen, and it seemed wiser to be quite passive than to
 attempt a ridiculous flight pursued by a bawling man.
 
 "I'm no more drunk nor you are, nor so much," said Dagley.  "I can
 carry my liquor, an' I know what I meean.  An' I meean as the King 'ull
 put a stop to 't, for them say it as knows it, as there's to be a
 Rinform, and them landlords as never done the right thing by their
 tenants 'ull be treated i' that way as they'll hev to scuttle off.  An'
 there's them i' Middlemarch knows what the Rinform is--an' as knows
 who'll hev to scuttle.  Says they, 'I know who _your_ landlord is.'
 An' says I, 'I hope you're the better for knowin' him, I arn't.' Says
 they, 'He's a close-fisted un.' 'Ay ay,' says I. 'He's a man for the
 Rinform,' says they.  That's what they says.  An' I made out what the
--**--**--
 ever tasted the flavor of; if you did her a kindness, she would never
 forget it.  Mary admired the keen-faced handsome little Vicar in his
 well-brushed threadbare clothes more than any man she had had the
 opportunity of knowing.  She had never heard him say a foolish thing,
 though she knew that he did unwise ones; and perhaps foolish sayings
 were more objectionable to her than any of Mr. Farebrother's unwise
 doings.  At least, it was remarkable that the actual imperfections of
 the Vicar's clerical character never seemed to call forth the same
 scorn and dislike which she showed beforehand for the predicted
 imperfections of the clerical character sustained by Fred Vincy.  These
 irregularities of judgment, I imagine, are found even in riper minds
 than Mary Garth's: our impartiality is kept for abstract merit and
 demerit, which none of us ever saw.  Will any one guess towards which
 of those widely different men Mary had the peculiar woman's
 tenderness?--the one she was most inclined to be severe on, or the
 contrary?
 
 "Have you any message for your old playfellow, Miss Garth?" said the
 Vicar, as he took a fragrant apple from the basket which she held
 towards him, and put it in his pocket.  "Something to soften down that
 harsh judgment?  I am going straight to see him."
 
 "No," said Mary, shaking her head, and smiling.  "If I were to say that
 he would not be ridiculous as a clergyman, I must say that he would be
 something worse than ridiculous.  But I am very glad to hear that he is
 going away to work."
 
 "On the other hand, I am very glad to hear that _you_ are not going
 away to work.  My mother, I am sure, will be all the happier if you
 will come to see her at the vicarage: you know she is fond of having
--**--**--
 husband's mind.
 
 And there was the shock lately given to his health always sadly present
 with him.  He was certainly much revived; he had recovered all his
 usual power of work: the illness might have been mere fatigue, and
 there might still be twenty years of achievement before him, which
 would justify the thirty years of preparation.  That prospect was made
 the sweeter by a flavor of vengeance against the hasty sneers of Carp &
 Company; for even when Mr. Casaubon was carrying his taper among the
 tombs of the past, those modern figures came athwart the dim light, and
 interrupted his diligent exploration.  To convince Carp of his mistake,
 so that he would have to eat his own words with a good deal of
 indigestion, would be an agreeable accident of triumphant authorship,
 which the prospect of living to future ages on earth and to all
 eternity in heaven could not exclude from contemplation.  Since, thus,
 the prevision of his own unending bliss could not nullify the bitter
 savors of irritated jealousy and vindictiveness, it is the less
 surprising that the probability of a transient earthly bliss for other
 persons, when he himself should have entered into glory, had not a
 potently sweetening effect.  If the truth should be that some
 undermining disease was at work within him, there might be large
 opportunity for some people to be the happier when he was gone; and if
 one of those people should be Will Ladislaw, Mr. Casaubon objected so
 strongly that it seemed as if the annoyance would make part of his
 disembodied existence.
 
 This is a very bare and therefore a very incomplete way of putting the
 case.  The human soul moves in many channels, and Mr. Casaubon, we
 know, had a sense of rectitude and an honorable pride in satisfying the
--**--**--
     That too is costly ware; majolica
     Of deft design, to please a lordly eye:
     The smile, you see, is perfect--wonderful
     As mere Faience! a table ornament
     To suit the richest mounting."
 
 
 Dorothea seldom left home without her husband, but she did occasionally
 drive into Middlemarch alone, on little errands of shopping or charity
 such as occur to every lady of any wealth when she lives within three
 miles of a town.  Two days after that scene in the Yew-tree Walk, she
 determined to use such an opportunity in order if possible to see
 Lydgate, and learn from him whether her husband had really felt any
 depressing change of symptoms which he was concealing from her, and
 whether he had insisted on knowing the utmost about himself.  She felt
 almost guilty in asking for knowledge about him from another, but the
 dread of being without it--the dread of that ignorance which would make
 her unjust or hard--overcame every scruple.  That there had been some
 crisis in her husband's mind she was certain: he had the very next day
 begun a new method of arranging his notes, and had associated her quite
 newly in carrying out his plan.  Poor Dorothea needed to lay up stores
 of patience.
 
 It was about four o'clock when she drove to Lydgate's house in Lowick
 Gate, wishing, in her immediate doubt of finding him at home, that she
 had written beforehand.  And he was not at home.
 
 "Is Mrs. Lydgate at home?" said Dorothea, who had never, that she knew
 of, seen Rosamond, but now remembered the fact of the marriage.  Yes,
 Mrs. Lydgate was at home.
 
 "I will go in and speak to her, if she will allow me.  Will you ask her
 if she can see me--see Mrs. Casaubon, for a few minutes?"
 
 When the servant had gone to deliver that message, Dorothea could hear
--**--**--
 "It is always fatal to have music or poetry interrupted.  May I come
 another day and just finish about the rendering of 'Lungi dal caro
 bene'?"
 
 "I shall be happy to be taught," said Rosamond.  "But I am sure you
 admit that the interruption was a very beautiful one.  I quite envy
 your acquaintance with Mrs. Casaubon.  Is she very clever?  She looks
 as if she were."
 
 "Really, I never thought about it," said Will, sulkily.
 
 "That is just the answer Tertius gave me, when I first asked him if she
 were handsome.  What is it that you gentlemen are thinking of when you
 are with Mrs. Casaubon?"
 
 "Herself," said Will, not indisposed to provoke the charming Mrs.
 Lydgate.  "When one sees a perfect woman, one never thinks of her
 attributes--one is conscious of her presence."
 
 "I shall be jealous when Tertius goes to Lowick," said Rosamond,
 dimpling, and speaking with aery lightness.  "He will come back and
 think nothing of me."
 
 "That does not seem to have been the effect on Lydgate hitherto.  Mrs.
 Casaubon is too unlike other women for them to be compared with her."
 
 "You are a devout worshipper, I perceive.  You often see her, I
 suppose."
 
 "No," said Will, almost pettishly.  "Worship is usually a matter of
 theory rather than of practice.  But I am practising it to excess just
 at this moment--I must really tear myself away."
 
 "Pray come again some evening: Mr. Lydgate will like to hear the music,
 and I cannot enjoy it so well without him."
 
 When her husband was at home again, Rosamond said, standing in front of
 him and holding his coat-collar with both her hands, "Mr. Ladislaw was
 here singing with me when Mrs. Casaubon came in.  He seemed vexed.  Do
 you think he disliked her seeing him at our house?  Surely your
--**--**--
 smells of retail trading which suggested the reduction of cash payments
 to a balance.  And he did not think it worth his while to show Lydgate
 up until he knew how.  He had not indeed great resources of education,
 and had had to work his own way against a good deal of professional
 contempt; but he made none the worse accoucheur for calling the
 breathing apparatus "longs."
 
 Other medical men felt themselves more capable.  Mr. Toller shared the
 highest practice in the town and belonged to an old Middlemarch family:
 there were Tollers in the law and everything else above the line of
 retail trade.  Unlike our irascible friend Wrench, he had the easiest
 way in the world of taking things which might be supposed to annoy him,
 being a well-bred, quietly facetious man, who kept a good house, was
 very fond of a little sporting when he could get it, very friendly with
 Mr. Hawley, and hostile to Mr. Bulstrode.  It may seem odd that with
 such pleasant habits he should have been given to the heroic treatment,
 bleeding and blistering and starving his patients, with a dispassionate
 disregard to his personal example; but the incongruity favored the
 opinion of his ability among his patients, who commonly observed that
 Mr. Toller had lazy manners, but his treatment was as active as you
 could desire: no man, said they, carried more seriousness into his
 profession: he was a little slow in coming, but when he came, he _did_
 something.  He was a great favorite in his own circle, and whatever he
 implied to any one's disadvantage told doubly from his careless
 ironical tone.
 
 He naturally got tired of smiling and saying, "Ah!" when he was told
 that Mr. Peacock's successor did not mean to dispense medicines; and
 Mr. Hackbutt one day mentioning it over the wine at a dinner-party, Mr.
--**--**--
 
 "Nothing to be done there," said Mr. Hawley.  "I looked into it for
 Sprague.  You'd only break your nose against a damned judge's decision."
 
 "Pooh! no need of law," said Mr. Toller.  "So far as practice is
 concerned the attempt is an absurdity.  No patient will like
 it--certainly not Peacock's, who have been used to depletion.  Pass the
 wine."
 
 Mr. Toller's prediction was partly verified.  If Mr. and Mrs. Mawmsey,
 who had no idea of employing Lydgate, were made uneasy by his supposed
 declaration against drugs, it was inevitable that those who called him
 in should watch a little anxiously to see whether he did "use all the
 means he might use" in the case.  Even good Mr. Powderell, who in his
 constant charity of interpretation was inclined to esteem Lydgate the
 more for what seemed a conscientious pursuit of a better plan, had his
 mind disturbed with doubts during his wife's attack of erysipelas, and
 could not abstain from mentioning to Lydgate that Mr. Peacock on a
 similar occasion had administered a series of boluses which were not
 otherwise definable than by their remarkable effect in bringing Mrs.
 Powderell round before Michaelmas from an illness which had begun in a
 remarkably hot August.  At last, indeed, in the conflict between his
 desire not to hurt Lydgate and his anxiety that no "means" should be
 lacking, he induced his wife privately to take Widgeon's Purifying
 Pills, an esteemed Middlemarch medicine, which arrested every disease
 at the fountain by setting to work at once upon the blood.  This
 co-operative measure was not to be mentioned to Lydgate, and Mr.
 Powderell himself had no certain reliance on it, only hoping that it
 might be attended with a blessing.
 
 But in this doubtful stage of Lydgate's introduction he was helped by
 what we mortals rashly call good fortune.  I suppose no doctor ever
--**--**--
 
 Will was not displeased with that complimentary comparison, even from
 Mr. Brooke; for it is a little too trying to human flesh to be
 conscious of expressing one's self better than others and never to have
 it noticed, and in the general dearth of admiration for the right
 thing, even a chance bray of applause falling exactly in time is rather
 fortifying.  Will felt that his literary refinements were usually
 beyond the limits of Middlemarch perception; nevertheless, he was
 beginning thoroughly to like the work of which when he began he had
 said to himself rather languidly, "Why not?"--and he studied the
 political situation with as ardent an interest as he had ever given to
 poetic metres or mediaevalism.  It is undeniable that but for the
 desire to be where Dorothea was, and perhaps the want of knowing what
 else to do, Will would not at this time have been meditating on the
 needs of the English people or criticising English statesmanship: he
 would probably have been rambling in Italy sketching plans for several
 dramas, trying prose and finding it too jejune, trying verse and
 finding it too artificial, beginning to copy "bits" from old pictures,
 leaving off because they were "no good," and observing that, after all,
 self-culture was the principal point; while in politics he would have
 been sympathizing warmly with liberty and progress in general.  Our
 sense of duty must often wait for some work which shall take the place
 of dilettanteism and make us feel that the quality of our action is not
 a matter of indifference.
 
 Ladislaw had now accepted his bit of work, though it was not that
 indeterminate loftiest thing which he had once dreamed of as alone
 worthy of continuous effort.  His nature warmed easily in the presence
 of subjects which were visibly mixed with life and action, and the
--**--**--
 Rosamond looked mildly neutral as she said this, rising to ring the
 bell, and then crossing to her work-table.
 
 "Poor Rosy!" said Lydgate, putting out his hand to her as she was
 passing him.  "Disputation is not amusing to cherubs.  Have some music.
 Ask Ladislaw to sing with you."
 
 When Will was gone Rosamond said to her husband, "What put you out of
 temper this evening, Tertius?"
 
 "Me?  It was Ladislaw who was out of temper.  He is like a bit of
 tinder."
 
 "But I mean, before that.  Something had vexed you before you came in,
 you looked cross.  And that made you begin to dispute with Mr.
 Ladislaw.  You hurt me very much when you look so, Tertius."
 
 "Do I?  Then I am a brute," said Lydgate, caressing her penitently.
 
 "What vexed you?"
 
 "Oh, outdoor things--business."  It was really a letter insisting on
 the payment of a bill for furniture.  But Rosamond was expecting to
 have a baby, and Lydgate wished to save her from any perturbation.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XLVII.
 
     Was never true love loved in vain,
     For truest love is highest gain.
     No art can make it: it must spring
     Where elements are fostering.
         So in heaven's spot and hour
         Springs the little native flower,
         Downward root and upward eye,
         Shapen by the earth and sky.
 
 
 It happened to be on a Saturday evening that Will Ladislaw had that
 little discussion with Lydgate.  Its effect when he went to his own
 rooms was to make him sit up half the night, thinking over again, under
 a new irritation, all that he had before thought of his having settled
 in Middlemarch and harnessed himself with Mr. Brooke.  Hesitations
 before he had taken the step had since turned into susceptibility to
 every hint that he would have been wiser not to take it; and hence came
--**--**--
 
 In the library Dorothea observed that he had newly arranged a row of
 his note-books on a table, and now he took up and put into her hand a
 well-known volume, which was a table of contents to all the others.
 
 "You will oblige me, my dear," he said, seating himself, "if instead of
 other reading this evening, you will go through this aloud, pencil in
 hand, and at each point where I say 'mark,' will make a cross with your
 pencil.  This is the first step in a sifting process which I have long
 had in view, and as we go on I shall be able to indicate to you certain
 principles of selection whereby you will, I trust, have an intelligent
 participation in my purpose."
 
 This proposal was only one more sign added to many since his memorable
 interview with Lydgate, that Mr. Casaubon's original reluctance to let
 Dorothea work with him had given place to the contrary disposition,
 namely, to demand much interest and labor from her.
 
 After she had read and marked for two hours, he said, "We will take the
 volume up-stairs--and the pencil, if you please--and in case of
 reading in the night, we can pursue this task.  It is not wearisome to
 you, I trust, Dorothea?"
 
 "I prefer always reading what you like best to hear," said Dorothea,
 who told the simple truth; for what she dreaded was to exert herself in
 reading or anything else which left him as joyless as ever.
 
 It was a proof of the force with which certain characteristics in
 Dorothea impressed those around her, that her husband, with all his
 jealousy and suspicion, had gathered implicit trust in the integrity of
 her promises, and her power of devoting herself to her idea of the
 right and best.  Of late he had begun to feel that these qualities were
--**--**--
 
 "I am glad to hear it!" said Sir James, his irritation making him
 forget himself a little.  "I am sure Casaubon was not."
 
 "Well, it would have been worse if he had made the codicil to hinder
 her from marrying again at all, you know."
 
 "I don't know that," said Sir James.  "It would have been less
 indelicate."
 
 "One of poor Casaubon's freaks!  That attack upset his brain a little.
 It all goes for nothing.  She doesn't _want_ to marry Ladislaw."
 
 "But this codicil is framed so as to make everybody believe that she
 did.  I don't believe anything of the sort about Dorothea," said Sir
 James--then frowningly, "but I suspect Ladislaw.  I tell you frankly,
 I suspect Ladislaw."
 
 "I couldn't take any immediate action on that ground, Chettam.  In
 fact, if it were possible to pack him off--send him to Norfolk
 Island--that sort of thing--it would look all the worse for Dorothea
 to those who knew about it.  It would seem as if we distrusted
 her--distrusted her, you know."
 
 That Mr. Brooke had hit on an undeniable argument, did not tend to
 soothe Sir James.  He put out his hand to reach his hat, implying that
 he did not mean to contend further, and said, still with some heat--
 
 "Well, I can only say that I think Dorothea was sacrificed once,
 because her friends were too careless.  I shall do what I can, as her
 brother, to protect her now."
 
 "You can't do better than get her to Freshitt as soon as possible,
 Chettam.  I approve that plan altogether," said Mr. Brooke, well
 pleased that he had won the argument.  It would have been highly
 inconvenient to him to part with Ladislaw at that time, when a
 dissolution might happen any day, and electors were to be convinced of